Appendix A. Citations
APPENDIX A
Citations Beck, W. A. and Y. D. Haase.
1974.
Historical atlas of California.
University of Oklahoma Press.
Norman, Oklahoma.
Big Sur Land Trust.
1992.
The Monterey Bay State Seashore: a study for the preservation of the Monterey Bay dunes.
October.
Carmel, CA. Breschini, G. S., T. Haversat, and K. Seavey.
1996.
Identification and evaluation of World War II foundations at the proposed Moss Landing Marine Laboratory, Moss Landing, Monterey County, California.
Breschini, G. S., T. Haversat, and R. P. Hampson.
1983.
A cultural resources overview of the coast and coast-valley study areas.
Salinas, California.
Prepared for U.S. Bureau of Land Management.
Buising, A. V. and J. P. Walker.
1995.
Preliminary palinspastic paleogeographic reconstructions for the greater San Francisco Bay area, 15 Ma­5 Ma.
Pages 141­159 in Sanginés, E. M., D. W. Andersen, and A. V. Buising, eds., 1995.
Recent geologic studies in the San Francisco Bay area.
(Volume 26.)
Pacific Section SEPM.
Fullerton, California.
Burgmann, R., R. Arrowsmith, T. Dumitru, and R. McLaughlin.
1994.
Rise and fall of the southern Santa Cruz Mountains, California, from fission-tracks, geomorphology, and geodesy.
Journal of Geophysical Research 99:20,181­20,202.
California Department of Conservation.
1992.
RMC Lonestar Lapis Sand Plant reclamation plan.
Final environmental impact report.
(State Clearinghouse #89030165.)
State Mining and Geology Board.
Sacramento, CA.
(Also available from the City of Marina Planning Department, Marina, CA).
California Department of Fish and Game.
2002.
Sensitive species.
Habitat Conservation Planning Branch.
Available at: http://www.dfg.ca.gov/hcpb/species/species.shtml.
Accessed: August 2002.
California Native Plant Society.
1992.
Plant list from field survey, dated 2/17/92.
On file at San Francisco Bay National Wildlife Refuge Complex Headquarters, Fremont, CA. California Native Plant Society.
2001.
Inventory of Rare and Endangered Vascular Plants of California (sixth edition).
Rare Plant Scientific Advisory Committee, David P. Tibor, Convening Editor.
Available at: http://www.northcoast.com/~cnps/cgi-bin/cnps/sensinv.cgi) California Native Plant Society.
2001.
Plant list from field survey, June.
On file at San Francisco Bay National Wildlife Refuge Complex, Fremont, CA. California Natural Diversity Database.
2000.
California Department of Fish and Game, Natural Heritage Division.
Sacramento, California.
California Regional Water Quality Control Board.
1998.
Case closure summary, Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge.
Letter report to the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service.
Central Coast Region, San Luis Obispo, California.
California State Parks, Monterey, California.
May 10, 2000.
Facsimile and telephone conversation ­ Office Technician Maureen Hicks.
Cull, R. 1991.
Habitat and land use changes at the Salinas River Wildlife Area 1854­1986.
Unpublished manuscript.
Geography and Environmental Studies Department, San Jose State University.
Comprehensive Conservation Plan
A-1
APPENDIX A ­
Citations
Dietz, S. A., W. Hildebrandt, and T. Jones.
1988.
Archaeological investigations at Elkhorn Slough: CA-MNT-229, a middle period site on the central California coast.
(Papers in Northern California Anthropology.)
Northern California Anthropological Group.
Berkeley, California.
Dondero, S. B. 1984.
Preliminary report on archaeological testing, CA-MNT-229, Elkhorn Slough, Monterey County, California.
California Department of Transportation.
Sacramento, California.
Ellsworth, W. L., 1990, Earthquake history, 1769­1989.
Pages 153­187) in R. E. Wallace, (ed.), The San Andreas fault system.
(Professional Paper 1515.)
U.S. Geological Survey.
Menlo Park, California.
Federal Emergency Management Agency.
1991.
Flood insurance rate map, unincorporated Monterey County ­ Community Panel 60195 0045.
Washington, DC.
Federal Geographic Data Committee.
1997.
National vegetation classification standard.
(FGDC-STD-005.)
June.
Vegetation Subcommittee.
Available at http://www.fgdc.gov/standards/documents/standards/ vegetation/tables19­41.pdf.
Fink, A. 1978.
Monterey County: the dramatic story of its past.
Fresno Valley Publishers.
Fresno, California.
Greenlee, J. M., and J. H. Langenheim.
1990.
Historic fire regimes and their relation to vegetation patterns in the Monterey Bay Area of California.
American Midland Naturalist, 124:239­253.
Hart, J. D. 1978.
A companion to California.
Oxford University Press.
New York, New York.
Hart, E.W., and W. A. Bryant.
1997 (rev., supplements 1 and 2 added 1999).
Fault-rupture hazard zones in California, Alquist-Priolo Earthquake Fault Zoning Act with index to earthquake fault zones maps.
(Special Publication 42.)
California Division of Mines and Geology.
Sacramento, California.
Holland, R. F. 1986.
Preliminary descriptions of the terrestrial natural communities of California.
California Department of Fish and Game.
Sacramento, California.
Hoover, M. B., et al. 1990.
(Revised by Douglas E. Kyle.)
Historic spots in California.
Stanford University Press.
Stanford, California.
Jennings, C. W., and R. G. Strand.
1959.
Geologic map of California ­ Santa Cruz sheet.
Scale 1:250,000.
California Division of Mines and Geology.
Sacramento, California.
John Gilchrist 
1997.
Salinas River Lagoon management and enhancement plan.
Prepared for the Salinas River Lagoon Task Force and the Monterey County Water Resources Agency.
Monterey, California.
Jones, T. L., and K. Hylkema.
1988.
Two proposed projectile point types for the Monterey Bay Area: the Año Nuevo longstem and the Rossi stemmed.
Journal of California and Great Basin Anthropology.
No. 3.
Berkeley, California.
Jones, T. L., and D. A. Jones.
1992.
Elkhorn Slough revisited: reassessing the chronology of CA-MNT-229.
Journal of California and Great Basin Anthropology 14(2):159­179.
Kroeber, A. L. 1925.
Handbook of the Indians of California.
(Bulletin 78).
Bureau of American Ethnology.
Washington, DC.
Levy, R. 1978.
Costanoans.
Pages 485­495 in R. L. Heizer (ed.), Handbook of North American Indians, Volume 8.
Smithsonian Institution.
Washington, DC.
Margolin, M. 1978.
The Ohlone way.
Heyday Books.
Berkeley, California.
A-2 Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge
APPENDIX A ­
Citations
Mattinson, J. M., and E. W. James.
1985.
Salinian block U-Pb age and isotopic variations: implications for origin and emplacement of the Salinian terrane.
Pages 215­226 in Howell, D. G. (ed.), Tectonostratigraphic terranes of the circum-Pacific region.
(Earth Science Series, No. 1.)
Circum-Pacific Council for Energy and Mineral Resources.
Houston, Texas.
Milliken, R. 1988.
Ethnographic context.
Chapter 4 in Dietz, S. A., W. Hildebrandt, and T. Jones.
1988.
Archaeological investigations at Elkhorn Slough: CA-MNT-229, a middle period site on the central California coast.
(Papers in Northern California Anthropology).
Northern California Anthropological Group.
Berkeley, California.
Milliken, R., J. Nelson, W. Hildebrandt, and P. Mikkelsen.
1999.
The Moss Landing Hill site, technical report on archaeological Studies at CA-MNT-234.
Manuscript submitted to California State University.
Seal Beach, California.
Monterey County Agricultural Commissioner's Office.
1999.
Agricultural crop report 1998.
Salinas, California.
Moratto, M. J. 1984.
California archaeology.
Academic Press.
San Diego, California.
Page, G. W., and W. D. Shuford.
2000.
Southern Pacific coast regional shorebird plan.
Point Reyes Bird Observatory, Stinson Beach, CA. Pickart, A. J., and J. O. Sawyer.
1998.
Ecology and restoration of Northern California Coastal Dunes.
California Native Plant Society, Sacramento, CA. Point Reyes Bird Observatory.
July 2000.
Personal communication - Director of Coastal and Estuarine Research Gary Page.
Riparian Habitat Joint Venture.
2000.
Version 1.0.
The riparian bird conservation plan: a strategy for reversing the decline of riparian associated birds in California.
California Partners in Flight.
Available at: http://www.prbo.org/CPIF/Riparian/Riparian.html.
Roberson, D. and C. Tenney, eds. 1993.
Atlas of the Breeding Birds of Monterey County, California.
Monterey Peninsula Audubon Society, Monterey, CA. Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge.
July 2000.
Personal communication ­ Refuge Biologist Ivette Loredo.
Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge.
April 12, 2000.
Telephone conversation ­ Refuge Manager Chris Barr.
Sawyer, J. O., and T. Keeler-Wolf.
1995.
A manual of California vegetation.
California Native Plant Society.
Sacramento, CA. Sedlock, R. L. Tectonic framework, origin, and evolution of the San Francisco Bay region.
Pages 1­17 in Sanginés, E. M., D. W. Andersen, and A. V. Buising, eds., 1995.
Recent geologic studies in the San Francisco Bay area.
(Volume 26.)
Pacific Section SEPM.
Fullerton, California.
Shuford, W. D., G. W. Page, J. G. Evans, and L. E. Stenzel.
1989.
Seasonal abundance of waterbirds at Point Reyes: a coastal California perspective.
Western Birds 20:137­265.
Soil Conservation Service.
1978.
Soil survey of Monterey County, California.
U. S. Department of Agriculture.
Washington, DC.
State of California, Department of Transportation.
1999.
1998 traffic volumes on California state highways.
Sacramento, California.
Comprehensive Conservation Plan
A-3
APPENDIX A ­
Citations
State of California, Employment Development Department.
2000.
Salinas MSA labor market information 1999­2000.
Sacramento, California.
Swernoff, M. 1981.
A reconnaissance cultural resources survey of Fort Ord, California.
Prepared under the direction of the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers, Sacramento District.
Professional Analysts.
Eugene, Oregon.
U.S. Army Corps of Engineers.
1992.
Flora and fauna baseline study of Fort Ord, California.
Prepared with technical assistance from Jones 
Sacramento, California.
U.S. Bureau of the Census.
1992.
1990 census of population and housing.
Washington, DC.
U.S. Department of Defense.
1997.
Real property contaminated with ammunition, explosives or chemical agents.
Chapter 12 in Ammunition and Explosive Safety Standards.
(Standard 6055.9-STD.) Office of the Undersecretary of Defense for Acquisition and Technology.
Washington, DC.
U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service.
1983.
California brown pelican recovery plan.
U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service, Region 1.
Portland, Oregon.
U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service.
1984.
Smith's blue butterfly recovery plan.
U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service, Region 1.
Portland, Oregon.
U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service.
1993a.
Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge predator management plan and final environmental assessment.
Newark, CA. U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service.
1993b.
Endangered and threatened wildlife and plants; determination of threatened status for the Pacific coast populations of the western snowy plover.
U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service, Region 1, Sacramento Field Office.
Sacramento, California.
U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service.
1998.
Seven coastal plants and the Myrtle's silverspot butterfly recovery plan.
U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service, Region 1, Ventura and Sacramento Field Offices.
Portland, OR. U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service.
2000.
Refuge planning policy pursuant to the National Wildlife Refuge System Administration Act as Amended by the National Wildlife Refuge System Improvement Act of 1997.
Final Notice.
Federal Register 65:33892­33919.
U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service.
2001.
Draft Comprehensive Conservation Plan and Environmental Assessment.
Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge, San Francisco Bay National Wildlife Refuge Complex.
Newark, CA. U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service.
2001.
Draft recovery plan for the western snowy plover.
U. S. Fish and Wildlife Service, Ecological Services Office.
Sacramento, California.
U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service.
2002.
Biological Opinion for the Salinas River national Wildlife Refuge Comprehensive Conservation Plan (1-8-01-FW-66).
U. S. Fish and Wildlife Service, Ecological Services Office.
Ventura, California.
Zeiner, D. C., W. F. Laudenslayer, Jr., K. E. Mayer, and M. White, eds. 1990.
California Wildlife, Volume III: Mammals.
California Department of Fish and Game.
Sacramento, CA.
A-4
Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge
Appendix B. Glossary of Terms
Blank page
APPENDIX B
Glossary of Terms Adaptive Management The rigorous application of management, research, and monitoring to gain information and experience necessary to assess and modify management activities.
A process that uses feedback from refuge research and monitoring and evaluation of management actions to support or modify objectives and strategies at all planning levels.
Different sets of objectives and strategies or means of achieving refuge purposes and goals, helping fulfill the Refuge System mission, and resolving issues.
The variety of life, including the variety of living organisms, the genetic differences among them, and the communities in which they occur.
Biotic composition, structure, and function at the genetic, organism, and community levels consistent with natural conditions, including the natural biological processes that shape genomes, organisms, and communities.
Code of Federal Regulations.
A wildlife-dependent recreational use or any other use of a refuge that, in the sound professional judgment of the Director, will not materially interfere with or detract from the fulfillment of the mission of the Refuge System or the purposes of the refuge unit (Service Manual 603 FW 3.6).
A document that: (1) describes the desired future conditions of a refuge or planning unit and provides long-range guidance and management direction to achieve the purposes of the refuge; (2) helps fulfill the mission of the Refuge System; (3) maintains and, where appropriate, restores the ecological integrity of each refuge and the Refuge System; (4) helps achieve the goals of the National Wilderness Preservation System; and (5) meets other mandates.
See Issue.
A wildlife management area made available to a State, by "(A) cooperative agreement between the United States Fish and Wildlife Service and the State fish and game agency pursuant to Section 4 of the Fish and Wildlife Coordination Act (16 U.S.C. 664); or (B) long-term leases or agreements pursuant to the Bankhead-Jones Farm Tenant Act (50 Stat. 525; 7 U.S.C. 1010 et seq.)."
States manage Coordination Areas, but they are part of the Refuge System.
CCPs are not required for Coordination Areas.
A comprehensive document prepared for a field office that discusses, among other things, an area's prehistory and cultural history, the nature and extent of known cultural resources in the area, relevant previous research, management objectives, and resource management conflicts or issues, and provides a general statement on how program objectives should be met and conflicts resolved.
An overview should reference or incorporate information from a field offices background or literature search as described in Section VIII of the Cultural Resource Management Handbook (Service Manual 614 FW 1.7).
Alternatives
Biological Diversity Biological Integrity
CFR Compatible Use
Comprehensive Conservation Plan (CCP)
Concern Coordination Area
Cultural Resource Overview
Comprehensive Conservation Plan
B-1
APPENDIX B ­
Glossary of Terms
Cultural Resource Inventory
A professionally conducted study designed to locate and evaluate evidence of cultural resources present within a defined geographic area.
There are various levels of cultural resources inventories, including background literature search, comprehensive field examination to identify all exposed physical manifestations of cultural resources, and sample inventory to project site distribution and density over a larger area.
Evaluation of identified cultural resources to determine eligibility for the National Register follows the criteria found in 36 CFR 60.4 (Service Manual 614 FW 1.7).
An area designated by the United States Congress for management as part of the National Wilderness Preservation System (Service Manual 610 FW 1.5).
The integration of biological integrity, natural biological diversity, and environmental health; replication of natural ecological conditions.
A biological community together with its environment, functioning as a unit.
For administrative purposes, we have designated 53 ecosystems covering the United States and its possessions.
These ecosystems generally correspond with watershed boundaries, and their sizes and ecological complexity vary.
An approach to conservation and restoration that focuses on protecting or restoring the natural function, structure, and species composition of an ecosystem, recognizing that all components are interrelated.
Abiotic composition, structure, and function of the environment consistent with natural conditions, including the natural abiotic processes that shape the environment.
A detailed written statement, required by section 102(2)(C) of the National Environmental Policy Act, that analyzes the environmental impacts of a proposed action, including unavoidable adverse effects of the project, alternative courses of action, short-term uses of the environment versus the maintenance and enhancement of long-term productivity, and any irreversible and irretrievable commitment of resources (40 CFR 1508.11).
A concise public document, prepared in compliance with the National Environmental Policy Act, that briefly discusses the purpose of and need for an action and the reasonable alternatives to the action, and analyzes the action's potential impacts in sufficient detail to determine whether to prepare an environmental impact statement or finding of no significant impact (40 CFR 1508.9).
A document prepared in compliance with the National Environmental Policy Act and supported by an environmental assessment that briefly explains why a Federal action will have no significant effect on the natural or human environment (40 CFR 1508.13).
Descriptive, open-ended, and often broad statement of desired future conditions that conveys a purpose but does not define measurable units.
Any unsettled matter that requires a management decision, such as an initiative, opportunity, resource management problem, threat to the resources of the unit, conflict between uses, public concern, or the presence of an undesirable resource condition.
Designated Wilderness Area
Ecological Integrity Ecosystem
Ecosystem Approach
Environmental Health
Environmental Impact Statement (EIS)
Environmental Assessment (EA)
Finding of No Significant Impact (FONSI)
Goal Issue
B-2
Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge
APPENDIX B ­
Glossary of Terms
Management Alternative Management Concern Management Opportunity Mission Statement National Wildlife Refuge (refuge)
See Alternative.
See Issue.
See Issue.
Succinct statement of the unit's purpose and reason for being (Region 7 Planning Staff).
A designated area of land or water, or an interest in land or water, within the Refuge System (excluding Coordination Areas).
Find a complete listing of all units of the Refuge System in the current Annual Report of Lands Under Control of the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service.
"The mission of the System is to administer a national network of lands and waters for the conservation, management, and, where appropriate, restoration of the fish, wildlife, and plant resources and their habitats within the United States for the benefit of present and future generations of Americans."
National Wildlife Refuge System Mission (mission)
National Environmental Policy Act Requires all agencies, including the Service, to examine the environmental of 1969 (NEPA). impacts of their actions and to incorporate environmental information and public participation into the planning and implementation of all actions.
Federal agencies must integrate NEPA compliance with other planning requirements, and prepare appropriate NEPA documents to facilitate better environmental decision making (40 CFR 1500).
National Wildlife Refuge System, Refuge System, or System Various categories of lands, waters, and interests therein that are administered by the Secretary of the Interior for the protection, conservation, and where appropriate, restoration of fish and wildlife, including species that are threatened with extinction; includes wildlife ranges, game ranges, and wildlife management or waterfowl production areas.
An alternative under which existing management would be continued.
Any use other than a compatible wildlife-dependent recreational use.
A notice that an environmental impact statement will be prepared and considered (40 CFR 1508.22).
Published in the Federal Register.
A concise statement of what we want to achieve, how much we want to achieve, when and where we want to achieve it, and who is responsible for the work.
Objectives derive from goals and provide the basis for determining strategies, monitoring refuge accomplishments, and evaluating the success of strategies.
Objectives should be attainable, time-specific, and measurable.
Potential solutions to issues.
The area upon which a planning effort will focus.
A planning area may include lands outside existing planning unit boundaries currently under study for future inclusion in the Refuge System and/or partnership planning efforts.
It also may include watersheds or ecosystems that are outside our jurisdiction but affect the planning unit.
At a minimum, the planning area includes all lands within the approved boundary of a refuge.
No Action Alternative Non-Priority Public Uses Notice of Intent (NOI) Objective
Opportunities Planning Area
Comprehensive Conservation Plan
B-3
APPENDIX B ­
Glossary of Terms
Planning Team
Planning teams are interdisciplinary in membership and function.
Teams generally consist of a Planning Team Leader, the Refuge Manager and staff biologists, a state natural resource agency representative, and other appropriate program specialists (e.g., social scientist, ecologist, recreation specialist).
We also will ask other Federal and Tribal natural resource agencies to provide team members, as appropriate.
The planning team prepares the CCP and appropriate NEPA documentation.
A single refuge, an ecologically or administratively related refuge complex, or a distinct unit of a refuge.
The planning unit also may include lands currently outside refuge boundaries.
The Service's selected alternative at the draft CCP stage.
The application of fire to wildland fuels to achieve identified land use objectives (Service Manual 621 FW 1.7).
May be ignited naturally or intentionally.
Compatible wildlife-dependent recreational uses (hunting, fishing, wildlife observation and photography, and environmental education and interpretation) are the priority general public uses of the System and shall receive priority consideration in refuge planning and management.
The Service's proposed action for Comprehensive Conservation Plans is to prepare the CCP and implement the preferred alternative it outlines.
The process by which interested and affected individuals, organizations, agencies, and governmental entities participate in the planning and decision-making process.
Broad long-term guidance for involving the public in the comprehensive planning process.
Individuals, organizations, and groups; officials of Federal, State, and local government agencies; Native American tribes; and foreign nations.
It may include anyone outside the core planning team.
It includes those who may or may not have indicated an interest in Service issues and those who do or do not realize that Service decisions may affect them.
"The purposes specified in or derived from the law, proclamation, executive order, agreement, public land order, donation document, or administrative memorandum establishing, authorizing, or expanding a refuge, refuge unit, or refuge subunit."
For refuges that encompass wilderness designated by Congress, the purposes of the Wilderness Act are additional purposes of the refuge.
The Refuge Operating Needs System is a national database that lists the unfunded operational needs of each refuge.
We include projects required to implement approved plans and meet goals, objectives, and legal mandates.
The purposes specified in or derived from the law, proclamation, executive order, agreement, public land order, donation document, or administrative memorandum establishing, authorizing, or expanding a refuge, a refuge unit, or refuge subunit (Service Manual 602 FW 1.5).
See Goal.
Planning Unit
Preferred Alternative Prescribed Fire
Priority Public Uses
Proposed Action Public Involvement
Public Involvement Plan Public
Purposes of the Refuge
Refuge Operating Needs System (RONS)
Refuge Purposes
Refuge Goal
B-4
Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge
APPENDIX B ­
Glossary of Terms
Step-Down Management Plan
A plan that provides specific guidance on management subjects (e.g., habitat, public use, fire, safety) or groups of related subjects.
It describes strategies and implementation schedules for meeting CCP goals and objectives.
The people who have a direct interest or involvement in something (usually open space or urban lands or a plan for the management of such lands).
Stakeholders in a CCP usually include Service staff and members of the local community.
A specific action, tool, technique, or combination of actions, tools, and techniques used to meet unit objectives.
The practice of covering general matters in broader ("programmatic") environmental impact statements with subsequent narrower ("focused") statements addressing specific issues; focused documents incorporate by reference the general discussions in the broader document (40 CFR 1508.28).
Describes a resource that is committed to the stewardship of a legally responsible agency (trustee agency) to be cared for or preserved in the public interest.
E.g., trust species.
A project or plan initiated or overseen by a Federal agency; roughly equivalent to the NEPA usage of action.
See Objective.
Our mission is working with others to conserve, protect, and enhance fish, wildlife, and plants and their habitats for the continuing benefit of the American people.
A concise statement of the desired future condition of the planning unit, based primarily upon the Refuge System mission, specific refuge purposes, and other relevant mandates (Service Manual 602 FW 1.5).
See Designated Wilderness.
The process we use to determine whether we should recommend Refuge System lands and waters to Congress for wilderness designation.
The wilderness review process consists of three phases: inventory, study, and recommendation.
The inventory is a broad look at the refuge to identify lands and waters that meet the minimum criteria for wilderness.
The study evaluates all values (ecological, recreational, cultural), resources (e.g., wildlife, water, vegetation, minerals, soils), and uses (management and public) within the Wilderness Study Area.
The findings of the study determine whether we will recommend the area for designation as wilderness.
A free-burning fire requiring a suppression response; all fire other than prescribed fire that occurs on wildlands (Service Manual 621 FW 1.7).
Every wildland fire is either a wildfire or a prescribed fire (Service Manual 621 FW 1.3).
Stakeholders
Strategy Tiering
Trust
Undertaking Unit Objective U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service Mission Vision Statement
Wilderness Wilderness Review
Wildfire Wildland Fire
Comprehensive Conservation Plan
B-5
APPENDIX B ­
Glossary of Terms
Wildlife-Dependent Recreational Use
"A use of a refuge involving hunting, fishing, wildlife observation and photography, or environmental education and interpretation."
These are the six priority public uses of the Refuge System as established in the National Wildlife Refuge System Administration Act, as amended.
Wildlife-dependent recreational uses, other than the six priority public uses, are those that depend on the presence of wildlife.
We consider these other uses in the preparation of refuge CCPs; however, the six priority public uses will always take precedence.
A concise statement of what the planning unit should be, or what we hope to do, based primarily upon the Refuge System mission, specific refuge purposes, and other mandates.
We will tie the vision statement for the refuge to the mission of the Refuge System, the purpose(s) of the refuge, the maintenance or restoration of the ecological integrity of each refuge and the Refuge System, and other mandates.
Vision Statement
B-6
Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge
Appendix C. Refuge Plant List and SpecialStatus Species on the Refuge
APPENDIX C
Refuge Plant List and SpecialStatus Species on the Refuge Table C-1.
Refuge Plant List.
This list of plant species was generated by California Native Plant Society during a partial survey of the Refuge in 1992, with a few later additions by Refuge staff.
It is not intended to be a definitive list.
ABRONIA LATIFOLIA - YELLOW SAND VERBENA ABRONIA UMBELLATA - PINK SAND VERBINA/BEACH VERBENA ACER NEGUNDO - BOX ELDER ACHILLEA MILLEFOLIUM VAR. ARENICOLA - (=A. BOREALIS SSP. A.) COAST YARROW/SAND MILFOIL AGOSERIS APARGIOIDES VAR. EASTWOODAE - AGOSERIS ALNUS RHOMBIFOLIA - ALDER AMBROSIA CHAMISSONIS - (=FRANSERIA C./F.
C. SSP. BIPINNATISECTA) BEACH BUR AMMOPHILA ARENARIA - BEACH GRASS AMSINCKIA SPECTABILIS - FIDDLENECK/SEASIDE AMSINCKIA ANAGALLIS ARVENSIS - SCARLET PIMPERNEL ARMERIA MARITIMA SSP. CALIFORNICA - THRIFT ARTEMISIA CALIFORNICA - CALIFORNIA SAGEBRUSH ARTEMISIA DOUGLASIANA - MUGWORT ARTEMISIA PYCNOCEPHALA - BEACH SAGEWORT ASTER SUBSPICATUS - DOUGLAS' ASTER ATRIPLEX CALIFORNICA - SALTBUSH ATRIPLEX LENTIFORMIS - QUAIL BRUSH ATRIPLEX LEUCOPHYLLA - WHITELEAF SALTBUSH ATRIPLEX PATULA SSP. HASTATA - ORACHE/FAT HEN BACCHARIS DOUGLASII - DOUGLAS' BACCHARIS BACCHARIS GLUTINOSA - (=B. VIMINEA) WATER-WALLY/MULE FAT/SEEP-WILLOW BACCHARIS PILULARIS VAR. CONSANGUINEA - COYOTE BRUSH BRASSICA RAPA SSP. OLIFERA - (=B. CAMPESTRIS) FIELD MUSTARD BROMUS CARINATUS- BROME CAKILE MARITIMA - SEA ROCKET CALYSTEGIA SOLDANELLA - BEACH MORNING-GLORY CAMISSONIA CHEIRANTHIFOLIA - BEACH PRIMROSE CARDIONEMA RAMOSISSIMUM - SANDMAT CAREX OBNUPTA - SEDGE CARPOBOTUS AEQUILATERUS - (=MESEMBRYANTHEMUM CHILENSIS) SEA FIG CASTILLEJA LATIFOLIA - INDIAN PAINT BRUSH/SEASIDE PAINTED CUP CENTAUREA MELITENSIS - TOCALOTE CHENOPODIUM ALBUM - LAMB'S QUARTERS CHENOPODIUM AMBROSIOIDES - (=C. A. VAR. SUFFRUTICOSUM) MEXICAN TEA CHENOPODIUM CALIFORNICUM - GOOSEFOOT/SOAP PLANT CHLOROGALUM POMERIDIANUM VAR. DIVARICATUM - SOAP ROOT/AMOLE CHORIZANTHE CUSPIDATA VAR. MARGINATA - SAN FRANCISCO SPINE-FLOWER CHORIZANTHE PUNGENS - MONTEREY SPINE-FLOWER CIRSIUM VULGARE - BULL THISTLE CLAYTONIA PERFOLIATA - (=MONTIA P./ C. P. VAR. NUBIGENA) MINERS LETTUCE CORETHROGYNE CALIFORNICA - BEACH ASTER MARAH FABACEUS - MANROOT/WILD CUCUMBER MEDICAGO POLYMORPHA - (=M. HISPIDA/V.CONFINIS/V.
BREVISPINA) BUR-CLOVER MELILOTUS ALBA - WHITE SWEET-CLOVER MELILOTUS INDICA - SWEET-CLOVER CORETHROGYNE LEUCOPHYLLA - BRANCHING BEACH ASTER CORNUS SERICEA - CREEKSIDE DOGWOOD COTULA CORONOPIFOLIA - BRASS BUTTONS CRASSULA ERECTA - (=TILLAEA E.) SAND PIGMYWEED CRYPTANTHA LEIOCARPA - COAST CRYPTANTHA CUSCUTA SALINA - ALKALI DODDER CUSCUTA SP. - DODDER DESCHAMPSIA CAESPITOSA - HAIR GRASS DISTICHLIS SPICATA - (=D. S. V. STOLONIFERA) SALT GRASS DUDLEYA CAESPITOSA - SEA LETTUCE DUDLEYA FARINOSA - LIVE FOREVER/BLUFF LETTUCE ELYMUS GLAUCUS - BLUE WILD RYE ELYMUS MOLLIS - DUNE RYE GRASS ELYMUS PACIFICUS - GOULD'S RYE GRASS EPILOBIUM CILIATHUM SSP. GLANDULOSUM - (=E. ADENOCAULON V. OCCIDENTALE) NORTHERN WILLOW HERB EPILOBIUM CILIATUM SSP. WATSONII - (=E. W./E.
W. V. FRANCISCANUM COAST COTTONWEED ERICAMERIA ERICOIDES - (=HAPLOPAPPUS E.
Comprehensive Conservation Plan
C-1
APPENDIX C ­
Refuge Plant List and Special-Status Species on the Refuge
OENANTHE SARMENTOSA - AMERICAN WATER-LOVAGE OROBANCHE CALIFORNICA - (=O. GRAYANA VAR. NELSONII 
C-2
Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge
APPENDIX C ­
Refuge Plant List and Special-Status Species on the Refuge
Table C-2.
Special-status species on the Refuge.
Legal Statusa Common and Scientific Name Plants Sandmat manzanita Arctostaphylos pumila Monterey spineflower Chorizanthe pungens var. pungens Robust spineflower Chorizanthe robusta var. robusta Seaside bird's-beak Cordylanthus rigidus ssp. littoralis Eastwood's goldenbush Ericameria fasciculata Coast wallflower Erysimum ammophilum Menzies' wallflower Erysimum menziesii ssp. menziesii Yadon's wallflower Erysimum menziesii ssp. yadonii Monterey gilia Gilia tenuiflora ssp. arenaria Tidestrom's lupine Lupinus tidestromii ­/­/1B T/­/1B E/­/1B ­/E/1B ­/­/1B ­/­/1B E/E/1B E/E/1B Not reported to occur at the Refuge but suitable habitat present.
Occurs on the Refuge; suitable habitat abundant on dunes and species also occurs nearby.
No populations known to occur at the Refuge; occurs in dunes immediately north and south of Refuge.
Not reported to occur at the Refuge; suitable habitat present.
Not reported to occur at the Refuge; suitable habitat present.
Not reported to occur at the Refuge; suitable habitat present.
Probably occurred historically at the Refuge; no populations currently known from the site.
A population of this species was located on the Refuge in the 1970s, but was likely extirpated in 1980 by natural disturbance of the central foredune community.
Occurs on the Refuge and at Salinas River State Beach north of the Refuge.
Not reported to occur at the Refuge; suitable habitat present.
Federal/BCC/State/CNPS
Occurrence at Salinas River NWR
E/T/1B E/E/1B
Wildlife Smith's blue butterfly Euphilotes (=Shijimaeoides) enoptes smithi Steelhead Oncorhynchus mykiss Southwestern pond turtle Clemmys marmorata pallida Black legless lizard Anniella pulchra nigra Common loon Gavia immer American white pelican Pelecanus erythrorhynchos California brown pelican Pelecanus occidentalis Double-crested cormorant Phalacrocorax auritus White-faced ibis Plegadis chihi Osprey Pandion haliaetus White-tailed kite Elanus leucurus Bald eagle Haliaeetus leucocephalus Northern harrier Circus cyaneus Sharp-shinned hawk Accipiter striatus E/­ Occurs at the Refuge.
T/­ ­/SSC ­/SSC ­/SSC ­/SSC E/E ­/SSC --/SSC ­/SSC ­/FP T/E ­/SSC ­/SSC
Collected in Salinas River Lagoon in 1963 and 1991.
Small numbers likely occur at the Refuge.
No known occurrences at the Refuge; occurrences have been reported in the vicinity.
Occurs at the Refuge in the central foredune and central dune scrub communities.
Often forages in the Salinas River Lagoon during winter migration.
A small flock often forages and roosts in the Salinas River Lagoon from July through March.
Occurs year-round at the Refuge; most common between April and December.
Roosts and forages around the Salinas River Lagoon.
Has been observed at the Refuge during fall and winter migrations.
Often forages at the Refuge during fall and spring migrations.
Often forages at the Refuge during winter; known to nest in the vicinity.
May forage occasionally at the Salinas River Lagoon during fall, winter, and spring.
Commonly forages at the Refuge; may nest onsite.
Uncommon winter visitor to the area; forages at the Refuge.
Comprehensive Conservation Plan
C-3
APPENDIX C ­
Refuge Plant List and Special-Status Species on the Refuge
Table C-2.
Special-status species on the Refuge.
Legal Statusa Common and Scientific Name Cooper's hawk Accipiter cooperii Golden eagle Aquila chrysaetos Prairie falcon Falco mexicanus Merlin Falco columbarius American peregrine falcon Falco peregrinus anatum Whimbrel Numenius phaeopus California clapper rail Rallus longirostris obsoletus Greater sandhill crane Grus canadensis tabida Western snowy plover Charadrius alexandrinus nivosus Mountain plover Charadrius montanus Long-billed curlew Numenius americanus Red knot Calidris canutus Marbled godwit Limosa fedoa Short-billed dowitcher Limnodromus griseus California gull Larus californicus California least tern Sterna antillarum (=albifrons) browni Elegant tern Sterna elegans Black skimmer Rynchops niger Short-eared owl Asio flammeus Western burrowing owl Athene cunicularia hypugea Willow flycatcher Empidonax traillii Black swift Cypseloides niger Loggerhead shrike Lanius ludovicianus California yellow warbler Dendroica petechia brewsteri Purple martin Progne subis
Federal/BCC/State/CNPS ­/SSC PR/SSC, FP ­/R,C/SSC ­/SSC ­/R,C/E ­/R,C/­ E/E/FP ­/T T/SSC (coastal) C/R,C/SSC ­/R,C/SSC ­/R,C/­ ­/R,C/­ ­/R,C/­ ­/SSC E/E --/R,C/SSC ­/R,C/SSC ­/SSC --/SSC --/E ­/R,C/SSC ­/R,C/SSC ­/SSC ­/SSC
Occurrence at Salinas River NWR Uncommon winter visitor to the area; forages at the Refuge.
May forage occasionally at the Refuge.
Uncommon winter visitor to the area; forages at the Refuge.
Uncommon winter visitor to the area; forages at the Refuge.
Uncommon winter visitor to the area; forages at the Refuge.
Common in the Salinas River Lagoon and in coastal brackish marsh and northern coastal salt marsh communities at the Refuge.
Reported once from the Refuge; no suitable nesting habitat is found onsite.
Very rare spring and fall migrant at the Refuge and in the vicinity.
Year-round resident at the Refuge.
The beach provides one of the most important breeding areas for this species in the Monterey Bay area.
Rare winter visitor to the Refuge.
Common in the Salinas River Lagoon and in coastal brackish marsh and northern coastal salt marsh communities at the Refuge.
Common in the Salinas River Lagoon and in coastal brackish marsh and northern coastal salt marsh communities at the Refuge.
Common in the Salinas River Lagoon and in coastal brackish marsh and northern coastal salt marsh communities at the Refuge.
Common in the Salinas River Lagoon and in coastal brackish marsh and northern coastal salt marsh communities at the Refuge.
Very common visitor to the Refuge.
Historically nested onsite; now an occasional spring migrant.
A large local population roosts and forages at the Refuge.
Occasionally forages in the Salinas River Lagoon.
Potential nesting habitat is present.
Suitable nesting and foraging habitat occurs in tall grassland habitat at the Refuge.
Rare fall migrant and occasional wintering birds in the vicinity of the Refuge.
Rare winter and spring migrant in central coast arroyo willow riparian forest near the Refuge.
Rare spring and fall migrant through the Refuge.
Common resident at the Refuge.
May nest in central coast arroyo willow riparian forest near the Refuge.
Rare spring and late-summer migrant through the Refuge.
C-4
Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge
APPENDIX C ­
Refuge Plant List and Special-Status Species on the Refuge
Table C-2.
Special-status species on the Refuge.
Legal Statusa Common and Scientific Name Common yellowthroat Geothlypis trichas sinuosa Song sparrow Melospiza melodia Bank swallow Riparia riparia Yellow-breasted chat Icteria virens Tricolored blackbird Agelaius tricolor Southern sea otter Enhydra lutris nereis a
Federal/BCC/State/CNPS ­/C/SSC ­/C/­ ­/T ­/SSC ­/R,C/SSC T/FP
Occurrence at Salinas River NWR May nest in central coast arroyo willow riparian forest near the Refuge.
Common resident at the Refuge.
Rare spring and summer migrant through the Refuge.
Rare spring and fall migrant in riparian scrub at the Refuge.
Occasionally forages at the Refuge.
Occasionally observed in offshore areas of the Refuge
Status explanations: Federal E T PE PR PT C ­ = = = = = = = listed as endangered under the Federal Endangered Species Act.
listed as threatened under the Federal Endangered Species Act.
proposed for listing as endangered under the Federal Endangered Species Act.
protected under the Golden Eagle Protection Act.
proposed for listing as threatened under the Federal Endangered Species Act. species for which the Service has sufficient information on file regarding biological vulnerability and threat(s) to support issuance of a proposed rule to list.
no listing.
Birds of Conservation Concern(BCC) Species, subspecies, and populations of all migratory nongame birds that, without additional conservation actions, are likely to become candidates for listing under the Endangered Species Act of 1973.
This is a congressionally mandated list, compiled by USFWS as mandated by the Fish and Wildlife Conservation Act (1988 amendment).
R = Regional.
C = South Pacific Coast California.
State E T R = = = listed as endangered under the California Endangered Species Act.
listed as threatened under the California Endangered Species Act.
listed as rare under the California Native Plant Protection Act.
(This category is no longer used for newly listed plants, but some plants previously listed as rare retain this designation.)
species is a candidate for listing under the California Endangered Species Act.
California State species of special concern.
species is fully protected in California under California Fish and Game Code Section 3511 (birds), 4700 (mammals), or 5050 (reptiles and amphibians). no listing.
C = SSC = FP = ­ =
California Native Plant Society 1A = List 1A (species presumed extinct in California).
1B = List 1B (species rare, threatened, or endangered in California and elsewhere).
2 = List 2 (species rare, threatened, or endangered in California but more common elsewhere).
3 = List 3 (species about which more information is needed to determine their status).
4 = List 4 (species of limited distribution). ­ = no listing.
Sources: California Native Plant Society 2001, California Department of Fish and Game 2002.
Comprehensive Conservation Plan
C-5
APPENDIX C ­
Refuge Plant List and Special-Status Species on the Refuge
C-6
Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge
Appendix D. Relationship between Vegetation Types Used in this CCP and National Vegetation Classification System
Blank page
APPENDIX D
Matrix Showing Relationship between Vegetation Types Used in this CCP and National Vegetation Classification System National Vegetation Classification System (Federal Geographic Data Committee 1997) CCP Vegetation Type (Holland 1986) Northern coastal salt marsh Alliance Salicornia (bigelovii, virginica) tidal herbaceous alliance n/a Formation Tidal temperate perennial forb vegetation Class ­ Subclass ­ Group V.B.2.
Herbaceous ­ Perennial forb ­ Temperate or subpolar perennial forb V.A.5.
Herbaceous ­ Perennial graminoid vegetation ­ Temperate or subpolar grassland III.B.2.
Shrubland ­ Deciduous shrubland ­ Cold deciduous shrubland VII.C.1.
Sparse vegetation ­ Unconsolidated material sparse vegetation ­ Sparsely vegetated sand dunes III.A.2.
Shrubland ­ Evergreen shrubland ­ Temperate broad-leaved evergreen shrubland III.A.4.
Shrubland ­ Evergreen shrubland ­ Microphyllous evergreen shrubland
Coast brackish marsh
Tidal temperate or subpolar grassland
Central coast riparian scrub
Salix lasiolepis temporarily flooded shrubland alliance n/a
Temporarily flooded cold-deciduous shrubland
Central foredunes
Dunes with sparse herbaceous vegetation
Central dune scrub
Lupinus arboreus shrubland alliance
Temperate broad-leaved evergreen shrubland
Coyote brush scrub
Baccharis pilularis shrubland alliance
Microphyllous evergreen shrubland
Comprehensive Conservation Plan
D-1
APPENDIX D ­
Vegetation Types Used in this CCP and National Vegetation Classification System
D-2
Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge
Appendix E. Planning Team Members and Persons Responsible for Preparing this Document
Blank page
APPENDIX E
List of Planning Team Members and Persons Responsible for Preparing this Document U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service Christopher Barr* Don DeLong* Mark Pelz* Ivette Loredo* Matt Gay* Sandy Spakoff Margaret Kolar* Marc Webber* Diane Kodama Leslie Lew Loretta McCorkle Joelle Buffa Charles Houghten Rachel Hurt Refuge Manager, Guadalupe-Nipomo Dunes NWR (Former Refuge Manager, Salinas River NWR) Former Team Leader, CA/NV Refuge Planning Office Refuge Planner, GIS Analyst, CA/NV Refuge Planning Office Refuge Manager, Salinas River NWR Former Chief of Public Use, San Francisco Bay NWR Complex Chief of Public Use, San Francisco Bay NWR Complex Program Manager, San Francisco Bay NWR Complex Former Assistant Program Manager, San Francisco Bay NWR Complex Refuge Biologist, Salinas River NWR Landscape Architect, CA/NV Refuge Planning Office Technical Editor, CA/NV Refuge Planning Office Supervisory Wildlife Biologist, San Francisco Bay NWR Complex Chief, Refuge Planning Division, Region 1 Wildlife Biologist, San Francisco Bay NWR Complex
Jones 
Comprehensive Conservation Plan
E-1
APPENDIX E ­
List of Planning Team Members and Persons Responsible for Preparing this Document
E-2
Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge
Appendix F. Wilderness Review
Blank page
APPENDIX F
Wilderness Review A wilderness review is the process used by the Service to determine whether or not to recommend lands or waters in the National Wildlife Refuge System to Congress for designation as wilderness.
The Service is required to conduct a wilderness review for each refuge as part of the CCP process.
Lands or waters that meet the minimum criteria for wilderness are identified in a CCP and further evaluated to determine whether they merit recommendation for inclusion in the Wilderness System.
According to Section 13 of the Service's Director's Order No. 125 (12 July 2000), in order for a refuge to be considered for wilderness designation, all or part of the refuge must: O Be affected primarily by the forces of nature, with the human imprint substantially unnoticeable; O Have outstanding opportunities for solitude or a primitive and unconfined type of recreation; O Have at least 5,000 contiguous acres (2,000 ha) or be sufficient in size to make practicable its preservation and use in an unimpaired condition, or be capable of restoration to wilderness character through appropriate management, at the time of review; or O Be a roadless island.
The Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge (Refuge) comprises 366 acres, which is much smaller than the area required for designation as wilderness.
Moreover, the Refuge contains much evidence of past human use, including roads, an abandoned bomb shelter, and an early successional plant community that began to develop following the cessation of agriculture on the site.
For these reasons, the Refuge does not meet the criteria for wilderness designation.
Comprehensive Conservation Plan
F-1
Appendix G. Compatibility Determinations
Compatibility Determination
Use: Refuge Name:
Waterfowl Hunting Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge Monterey County, California San Francisco Bay National Wildlife Refuge Complex
Establishing and Acquisition Authority(ies): An Act Authorizing the Transfer of Certain Real Property for Wildlife, or other purposes (16 U.S.C. 667b).
Refuge Purpose(s): "Particular value in carrying out the national migratory bird management program" (16 U.S.C. 667b).
National Wildlife Refuge System Mission: The mission of the National Wildlife Refuge System is "to administer a national network of lands and waters for the conservation, management, and where appropriate, restoration of the fish, wildlife and plant resources and their habitats within the United States for the benefit of present and future generations of Americans" (National Wildlife Refuge System Administration Act of 1966, as amended [16 U.S.C. 668dd-668ee]).
Description of Use(s): The Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge (Refuge) proposes to continue to provide limited opportunities for hunting that are compatible with the Refuge purpose.
Hunting is identified as a priority public use of the National Wildlife Refuge System under the National Wildlife Refuge System Improvement Act of 1997.
Hunting of waterfowl, including Canada geese (Branta canadensis), mallards (Anas platyrhynchos), American coots (Fulica americana), and common moorhens (Gallinula chloropus), would be permitted in the designated hunting area along the south bank of the Salinas River.
The Refuge would remain closed to all other forms of hunting and target shooting.
The Refuge proposes to allow waterfowl hunting along the Salinas River, on approximately 38 acres of the Refuge or approximately 10% of the entire Refuge.
This proposed hunt area represents a 15% reduction from the existing 45 acre hunt area (see Figures 5 and 6 in the Draft CCP).
The existing hunt area along the northern 800 linear feet of the Salinas River would be eliminated to minimize disturbance to brown pelicans roosting along the Salinas River lagoon, the area closest to the rivermouth.
The hunting area is delineated by signs; only pedestrian access is permitted.
During the hunting season, hunting dogs are allowed off leash and under voice control for the purpose of retrieving waterfowl from the river.
All firearms must remain unloaded until hunters are within the designated hunt area.
The size of the existing hunting area currently limits hunting use to approximately 15 hunters per day or 250 hunter visits annually; a maximum count of 16 hunters per day was recorded on G-1
opening day in October 1999.
Refuge staff estimate 4-6 hunters per day on the Refuge during the waterfowl hunt season, typically from October through January.
Hunting use has been, and would be expected to continue to be, heaviest on the weekends and on Wednesdays.
The Association of Monterey Bay Area Governments predicts that Monterey County's population will increase by 27% between 2000 and 2015 (www.ambag.org, accessed 5/24/01).
Overall use of the Refuge will likely increase proportionally, but hunting use is expected to increase less rapidly than nonconsumptive uses, and may decrease because of the proposed decrease in the size of the hunting area.
For additional details about this proposed use, please see the Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge Final Comprehensive Conservation Plan (USFWS 2002) as well as the Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge Draft Comprehensive Conservation Plan and Environmental Assessment (USFWS 2001), which are herein incorporated by reference.
Availability of Resources: Adequate funding and staff exist to manage the waterfowl hunting program at the Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge.
It is estimated that 10% of a full-time employee would be necessary to provide law enforcement support, maintain the trail, and monitor hunting use.
This would be accomplished concurrently with enforcing and monitoring the other priority public uses.
Without additional staff time, existing staff could provide periodic law enforcement.
Law enforcement support would also be provided by California Department of Fish and Game wardens under a cooperative agreement with the Refuge.
Additional staff time would be needed to adequately monitor hunting use on the Refuge.
Additional funding would also be needed for the interpretive signs and materials.
Those costs are incorporated into the Compatibility Determination for environmental education and interpretation.
The Refuge would pursue a variety of funding sources in order to fully support this use, including agreements with other agencies, and grant funding and volunteer assistance for monitoring.
Anticipated Impacts of the Use(s): Impacts are also discussed in Chapter 5 of the Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge Draft Comprehensive Conservation Plan and Environmental Assessment (USFWS 2001).
Endangered and Threatened Species: Human activity, including hunting, can have adverse impacts on rare species that utilize the Refuge for nesting, roosting, or foraging.
The endangered California brown pelican (Pelecanus occidentalis californicus) utilizes the lagoon at the mouth of the Salinas River, islands near the river mouth, and portions of the beach strand as roosting sites, particularly from April through December.
Disturbance to roosting pelicans can occur in the northern 15% of the existing hunting area, where hunters are in close proximity to the mouth of the river and the northernmost, largest island.
Disturbance from hunting dogs and from firearm discharge in close proximity to the roosting area can cause the birds to flush, resulting in stress to roosting birds.
Reoccurring disturbance could ultimately cause the birds to abandon this roost site.
The Refuge's dune habitats are known to support several special-status species, including: two federally listed plants, the Monterey gilia (Gilia tenuiflora ssp. arenaria) and the Monterey G-2
spineflower (Chorizanthe pungens var. pungens); Smith's blue butterfly (Euphilotes enoptes smithi) (federally listed as endangered); and the western snowy plover (Charadrius alexandrinus nivosus) (federally listed as threatened).
Dune habitats on the Refuge are closed to the public, and hunters do not need to walk through dune or beach habitat to access the hunt area.
The most direct route to the hunt area is along a trail through the grassland habitat on the Refuge (see Figures 2 and 3 in the CCP).
Therefore, negative impacts on these species are not expected.
An Intra-Service Section 7 Consultation was conducted on the entire draft CCP.
The resulting Biological Opinion (BO) (USFWS 2002b) concluded that adoption of the preferred alternative is not likely to jeopardize the continued existence of any of the listed species on the Refuge nor adversely modify critical habitat.
With regard to hunting, the BO states that the proposed 7-acre reduction of the hunt area would remove hunting activities from within 650 yards of brown pelican roosting sites and should reduce the frequency at which, or eliminate entirely, the potential adverse effects to listed species.
Riparian and Grassland Habitats: The Refuge is actively involved in the restoration of the riparian and grassland habitats near the hunting area.
Human activity (hunters accessing the hunt area) has the potential to adversely affect the restoration of these habitats.
Migratory Birds: Human activity may disturb nontarget migratory birds in upland, riparian, and aquatic habitats on the Refuge.
Hunters may accidentally take nontarget migratory birds as a result of misidentification.
Select numbers of waterfowl belonging to target species would be taken by hunters each season, but this is not expected to result in a significant adverse effect on their populations because of the small number of hunters expected to use the Refuge.
Flyway hunting limits are set annually.
Other Biological Resources: Litter discarded by hunters can entangle wildlife or be ingested, resulting in injury or death.
Because of the limited number of visitors to the Refuge, this would not pose a significant problem and could be handled with existing staff.
Public Review and Comment: Public review and comment was conducted concurrent with the public review and comment period for the CCP and associated Environmental Assessment.
Please refer to Appendix K in the Final CCP (USFWS 2002) for a review of public comments and Refuge responses.
Determination (check one below): _____ Use is Not Compatible X Use is Compatible With Following Stipulations
G-3
Stipulations Necessary to Ensure Compatibility: Hunters will be permitted to have no more than 25 shells in their possession while on the Refuge.
This will discourage hunters from taking long shots, reducing disturbance and decreasing the possibility of target misidentification.
Hunters will also be required to use approved non-toxic shot while on the Refuge.
As discussed in Description of Use(s) above, hunting use is expected to increase less rapidly than nonconsumptive uses, and may decrease because of the proposed decrease in the size of the hunting area.
Annual monitoring of hunter use and impacts will be implemented.
The information gathered will be used to review and possibly revise hunting regulations to enhance the quality and safety of the Refuge's hunting program, and ensure hunting would continue to be compatible with the Refuge purpose and the mission of the National Wildlife Refuge System (System).
The Refuge will maintain a walking trail through the grassland to the hunt area and will install and maintain signs marking the hunt area boundary.
In addition, by 2007, interpretive signs and an orientation kiosk will be installed on the Refuge to inform visitors about the Refuge's habitats and wildlife and ways of avoiding adverse impacts, including staying on trails.
The walking trail and interpretive signs will minimize disturbance to grassland and riparian habitats by providing easy access to the hunt area and by interpreting the importance and sensitivity of Refuge habitats and restoration efforts.
Additional interpretive materials will be installed in the orientation kiosk to interpret Refuge regulations and the laws governing take of migratory waterfowl and to reduce likelihood of take of nontarget species.
The Refuge will maintain an active law enforcement presence, by using Refuge officers and through a cooperative agreement with California Department of Fish and Game, to ensure public compliance with hunting regulations and the stipulations presented herein.
The Refuge will increase law enforcement patrols, especially during the opening weeks of the season, to document hunter use and ensure compliance with Refuge regulations.
Justification: The Refuge is one of two sites in the local area open for public waterfowl hunting during the hunting season and offers the only local waterfowl hunting area that can be accessed on foot.
The nearest alternative location for public waterfowl hunting is the state-owned Moss Landing Wildlife Area, approximately 10 miles to the north, which can only be accessed by boat.
Other public hunting areas, such as the San Luis National Wildlife Refuge near the community of Los Banos, are located 80 miles or more away.
The Refuge is thus a key resource for local waterfowl hunters.
Hunting is identified as a priority public use of the National Wildlife Refuge System (System) under the National Wildlife Refuge System Improvement Act of 1997, along with fishing, environmental education, interpretation, wildlife observation, and photography.
As an expressed priority use of the Refuge system, this use takes precedence over other potential public uses in Refuge planning and management.
The Service strives to provide priority public uses when compatible with the purpose of the Refuge and the mission of the System.
Approximately 80 G-4
acres of Refuge land along the Salinas River is conducive to permitted in an area of approximately 38 acres (2,800 linear reduction of the hunting area and management conducted in herein, waterfowl hunting would not be expected to result in resources and would be compatible with the Refuge purpose
hunting; hunting would be feet of riverbank).
With the accordance with the stipulations adverse impacts to Refuge and System mission.
Mandatory Reevaluation Date (provide month and year): Dec. 2017 ________ Mandatory 15-Year Reevaluation Date (for priority public uses) Mandatory 10-Year Reevaluation Date (for all uses other than priority public uses)
NEPA Compliance for Refuge Use Decision (check one below): Conducted with Comprehensive Conservation Plan ______Categorical Exclusion without Environmental Action Statement ______Categorical Exclusion and Environmental Action Statement X Environmental Assessment and Finding of No Significant Impact
______Environmental Impact Statement and Record of Decision References Cited: U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service (USFWS).
2002.
Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge Final Comprehensive Conservation Plan, December 2002.
U. S. Fish and Wildlife Service, Portland, Oregon.
U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service (USFWS).
2002b.
Biological Opinion for the Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge Comprehensive Conservation Plan (1-8-01-FW-66).
U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service, Ventura, California.
U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service (USFWS).
2001.
Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge Draft Comprehensive Conservation Plan and Environmental Assessment, August 2001.
U. S. Fish and Wildlife Service, Portland, Oregon.
G-5
Compatibility Determination
Use: Refuge Name:
Surf Fishing Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge Monterey County, California San Francisco Bay National Wildlife Refuge Complex
Establishing and Acquisition Authority: An Act Authorizing the Transfer of Certain Real Property for Wildlife, or other purposes (16 U.S.C. 667b).
Refuge Purpose(s): "Particular value in carrying out the national migratory bird management program" (16 U.S.C. 667b)
National Wildlife Refuge System Mission: The mission of the National Wildlife Refuge System is "to administer a national network of lands and waters for the conservation, management, and where appropriate, restoration of the fish, wildlife and plant resources and their habitats within the United States for the benefit of present and future generations of Americans" (National Wildlife Refuge System Administration Act of 1966, as amended [16 U.S.C. 668dd-668ee]).
Description of Use(s): The Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge (Refuge) is currently open to the public for access to surf fishing every day.
The State Lands Commission has reserved all lands below mean high water (surf zone) for public access; thus, the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service (Service) does not own these tidal lands and does not have the authority to regulate surf fishing or to close the beach to the public.
However, the Refuge does provide access to surf fishing opportunities that are adjacent to our boundary.
Because the Refuge boundary is the mean high water line, visitors who surf fish along the Refuge boundary also likely use Refuge lands while fishing (for example, to set up lines, place their gear, or rest).
Access to the surf zone through the Refuge is by foot only along the 1-mile beach trail.
Fishing is not allowed in other parts of the Refuge, such as the Salinas River and the saline pond.
The Refuge proposes to continue to allow this public access to surf fishing.
The National Wildlife Refuge System Improvement Act of 1997 identifies fishing as a priority public use for national wildlife refuges, along with hunting, environmental education, interpretation, wildlife observation, and photography.
Species of ocean fish caught in waters off the Refuge include surfperch (Amphistichis spp.) and striped bass (Morone saxatilis).
Surf fishing is a year-round use, with an estimated maximum of 6­10 individuals utilizing the Refuge to access the surf zone every day.
Peak periods include weekends and times when striped bass are foraging close to shore.
For additional details about this proposed use, please see the Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge Final Comprehensive Conservation Plan (USFWS 2002) as well as the Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge Draft G-7
Comprehensive Conservation Plan and Environmental Assessment (USFWS 2001), which are herein incorporated by reference.
Availability of Resources: Adequate funding and staff exist to manage for surf fishing access via the Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge.
It is estimated that 10% of a full-time employee would be necessary to provide law enforcement support and maintenance.
This would be accomplished concurrently with enforcing and monitoring the other priority public uses.
Without additional staff time, existing staff can provide periodic law enforcement.
Law enforcement support would also be provided by California Department of Fish and Game wardens under a cooperative agreement with the Refuge.
Additional funding would also be needed for the interpretive signs, interpretive materials, and kiosk.
Those costs are incorporated into the Compatibility Determination for environmental education and interpretation.
The Refuge would pursue a variety of funding sources in order to fully support this use, including agreements with other agencies, and grant funding and volunteer assistance for monitoring.
Anticipated Impacts of the Use(s): Impacts are also discussed in Chapter 5 of the Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge Draft Comprehensive Conservation Plan and Environmental Assessment (USFWS 2001).
Endangered and Threatened Species: Human activity can have adverse impacts on rare shore-nesting birds, especially during nesting and foraging activities.
The western snowy plover (Charadrius alexandrinus nivosus), federally listed as threatened, is of primary concern to the Refuge.
The Service strives to provide optimum breeding conditions for the western snowy plover, whose breeding habitat has become increasingly scarce due to development and heavy public use of beaches throughout its range.
However, in recent years, the number of breeding snowy plovers on the Refuge, and throughout the species' range, has decreased as a result of adverse weather conditions on their wintering grounds and heavy predation by native and nonnative wildlife.
Although current levels of public use are low, human activity in the dunes and beaches during the snowy plover breeding season has the potential to adversely affect plover reproductive success.
Western snowy plovers utilize the entire beach profile, from the foredune through the coastal strand into the intertidal zone (between mean low tide and mean high tide lines) for breeding and foraging.
Pedestrians entering the foredune and coastal strand habitats during the breeding season have the potential to trample well-camouflaged western snowy plover eggs and/or chicks or to disturb adults, keeping them away from the nest for extended periods of time, leaving the eggs or chicks vulnerable to predators, wind, and/or extreme temperatures.
Other federally listed species at the Refuge include: Smith's blue butterfly (Euphilotes enoptes smithi) and the Monterey gilia (Gilia tenuiflora ssp. arenaria), federally listed as endangered; and the Monterey spineflower (Chorizanthe pungens var. pungens), federally listed as threatened.
Visitors walking over the dunes have the potential to damage endangered and threatened dune plants and to introduce invasive species through inadvertent transfer of seeds or other propagules.
They may also disturb Smith's blue butterfly or its host plants.
The potential for illegal collection of rare plants, animals, and insects at the Refuge is an additional concern.
G-8
An Intra-Service Section 7 Consultation was conducted on the entire draft CCP.
The resulting Biological Opinion (BO) (USFWS 2002b) concluded that adoption of the preferred alternative is not likely to jeopardize the continued existence of any of the listed species on the Refuge nor adversely modify critical habitat.
With regard to general public access, the BO states that the proposed installation of interpretive signs and symbolic fencing would reduce effects of human disturbance to listed species, and that public use activities would not reduce the ability of the listed species to survive and recover.
Coastal Dunes and Wetlands: The potential for visitors to trample and destroy native dune and wetland vegetation is of concern.
Riparian and Grassland Habitats: The Refuge is actively involved in the restoration of riparian and grassland habitats.
Off-trail human activity in these habitats can slow restoration efforts.
Migratory Birds: Human activity may disturb migratory birds utilizing the Refuge's habitats for foraging or nesting.
Human activities near the wetland habitats could disturb foraging and nesting migratory birds, including black-necked stilts (Himantopus mexicanus), American avocets (Recurvirostra americana), and black skimmers (Rynchops niger), known to nest along the banks of the saline pond.
Other Biological Resources: Litter discarded by hunters can entangle wildlife or be ingested, resulting in injury or death.
Because of the limited number of visitors to the Refuge, this would not pose a significant problem and could be handled with existing staff.
Surf fishing is allowed on State Beaches immediately north and a few miles south of the Refuge boundary.
Some of the public access the Refuge from the north or south, along the beach.
The ability to limit use of the tidal zone is regulated by the State Lands Commission.
Therefore, should the Refuge close access through the Refuge for surf fishing, the public would still be able to access the tidal zone adjacent to the Refuge by walking along the beach from neighboring properties.
However, concern about protecting rare native plants and animals and the overall integrity of the dune system requires that public use be monitored to avoid adverse impacts.
Public Review and Comment: Public review and comment was conducted concurrent with the public review and comment period for the CCP and associated Environmental Assessment.
Please refer to Appendix K in the Final CCP (USFWS 2002) for a review of public comments and Refuge responses.
Determination (check one below): _____ Use is Not Compatible X Use is Compatible With Following Stipulations G-9
Stipulations Necessary to Ensure Compatibility: To continue to allow public access to the Refuge, the following measurers would be taken.
Western snowy plover breeding activities on the Refuge and throughout the Monterey Bay area have been closely monitored by Point Reyes Bird Observatory (PRBO) since 1984.
The Refuge will continue to partner with PRBO to monitor and document western snowy plover use of the Refuge and document causes of disturbance and mortality, including human disturbance.
Other threatened and endangered species and Refuge resources will also be monitored by Refuge staff as well as public compliance with Refuge regulations.
Clearer "Closed Area" signs would be installed at the boundary of the sensitive dune habitat by 2003.
In coordination with other agencies, such as State Parks and California Department of Fish and Game, the Refuge will develop and implement a docent program by 2006, to educate members of the public who use the Refuge during the snowy plover breeding season on the ecology of the plover and the sensitivity of the species' habitat and nests to disturbance.
The docent program will also collect data on public use and disturbance to nesting shorebirds.
By 2007, interpretive signs and an orientation kiosk will be installed on the Refuge to inform visitors about the Refuge's habitats and wildlife and ways of avoiding adverse impacts, including staying on trails.
The kiosk at the entrance will clearly state that dogs and horses are not allowed on the Refuge (except hunting dogs during the waterfowl season), and will include three signs: (1) a sign providing a trail map, trail information, and regulations; (2) a sign that describes the National Wildlife Refuge System; and (3) an interchangeable sign for hunting season and snowy plover nesting season.
The trail from the parking lot to the beach will be well-marked.
Symbolic fencing will be installed to guide public access through the dunes to the beach at the end of the trail.
This will minimize trespass through closed areas, which has been a problem in the past, and will reduce disturbance to nesting birds and endangered and threatened plants within the dune habitat.
If trespass continues to be a problem in the foredunes, symbolic fencing will also be installed along the foredune-beach boundary.
The Refuge will maintain an active law enforcement presence, by using Refuge officers and through a cooperative agreement with California Department of Fish and Game and California Department of Parks and Recreation, to ensure public compliance with all Refuge rules and regulations.
Refuge law enforcement and other Refuge staff presence will be increased to ensure compliance with Refuge regulations.
Access to the Refuge will be allowed only between sunrise and sunset, unless a permit for alternative hours is acquired from the Refuge Manager in advance.
Although the Refuge manager has the authority to close certain areas to public access, the State Lands Commission G-10
has reserved all lands below mean high water for public access.
Thus, complete closure of the beach profile by the Service is not possible.
However, public access to the Refuge will be restricted to areas where access will put minimal stress on endangered and threatened animal and plant populations.
Visitors will be directed to remain a safe distance from snowy plover nesting areas with signs and barriers, and by Refuge personnel and trained volunteers.
Visitors will be directed away from areas where native plant restoration projects are under way, to prevent damage to fragile plants by trampling or by the introduction of nonnative plant species.
Justification: Currently, the Refuge's visitor use is relatively low; an estimated average of 6­10 visitors per day use the Refuge for access to surf fishing.
Total visitor use of surrounding State Beaches averages 250,000 visitors per year, compared to the estimated annual use of 4,000­6,000 visitors per year on the Refuge.
The Refuge does not anticipate a substantial increase in overall visitor use over the next 15 years, for the following reasons: no public use facilities, such as plumbed restrooms or picnic tables, are available, nor will they be constructed; inland access to the Refuge is via an unpaved road; and beach access is along a walking trail that is approximately 1 mile long.
In addition, many nearby State Beaches will continue to be available that have easier access, offer many public use facilities, and support a wider variety of uses.
At present, the Refuge primarily attracts visitors looking for a quality wildlife-oriented experience, and this is not expected to change in the future.
The National Wildlife Refuge System Improvement Act of 1997 identifies fishing as a priority public use for national wildlife refuges, along with hunting, environmental education, interpretation, wildlife observation, and photography.
As expressed priority uses of the Refuge system, these uses take precedence over other potential public uses in Refuge planning and management.
The Service strives to provide priority public uses when compatible with the purpose of the Refuge and the mission of the National Wildlife Refuge System (System).
The Refuge provides access to the surf zone between sunrise and sunset, while surrounding State Parks open at 8:00 a.m. and close at 6:00 p.m.
The Refuge, therefore, provides fishing opportunities at times when the local fishing population prefers to be out, in the early morning hours and at sunset.
The state-owned beach adjacent to the Refuge is a popular fishing spot for many local residents.
Access to surf fishing as proposed would not be expected to result in adverse impacts to Refuge resources.
With management conducted in accordance with the stipulations herein, access to surf fishing would be compatible with the Refuge purpose and the System mission.
Mandatory Reevaluation Date (provide month and year): Dec. 2017 ________ Mandatory 15-Year Reevaluation Date (for priority public uses) Mandatory 10-Year Reevaluation Date (for all uses other than priority public uses)
G-11
NEPA Compliance for Refuge Use Decision (check one below): Conducted with the Comprehensive Conservation Plan ______Categorical Exclusion without Environmental Action Statement ______Categorical Exclusion and Environmental Action Statement X Environmental Assessment and Finding of No Significant Impact
______Environmental Impact Statement and Record of Decision
References Cited: U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service (USFWS).
2002.
Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge Final Comprehensive Conservation Plan, December 2002.
U. S. Fish and Wildlife Service, Portland, Oregon.
U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service (USFWS).
2002b.
Biological Opinion for the Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge Comprehensive Conservation Plan (1-8-01-FW-66).
U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service, Ventura, California.
U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service (USFWS).
2001.
Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge Draft Comprehensive Conservation Plan and Environmental Assessment, August 2001.
U. S. Fish and Wildlife Service, Portland, Oregon.
G-12
G-14
Compatibility Determination
Use: Refuge Name:
Wildlife Observation 
Establishing and Acquisition Authority: An Act Authorizing the Transfer of Certain Real Property for Wildlife, or other purposes (16 U.S.C. 667b).
Refuge Purpose(s): "Particular value in carrying out the national migratory bird management program" (16 U.S.C. 667b)
National Wildlife Refuge System Mission: The mission of the National Wildlife Refuge System is "to administer a national network of lands and waters for the conservation, management, and where appropriate, restoration of the fish, wildlife and plant resources and their habitats within the United States for the benefit of present and future generations of Americans" (National Wildlife Refuge System Administration Act of 1966, as amended [16 U.S.C. 668dd-668ee]).
Description of Use(s): Wildlife Observation: The Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge (Refuge) is currently open to the public for wildlife observation every day from sunrise to sunset.
Access is by foot only.
There are currently no orientation kiosks or interpretive signs.
Areas closed to public access are delineated by signs, and include the dunes and saline pond.
The beach access trail on the Refuge begins in grassland habitat, skirts the shore of the saline pond and salt marsh habitat, and traverses the dunes, providing quality wildlife observation opportunities in all of these habitats.
A trail also exists through the grasslands to the riparian habitat on the south bank of the Salinas River.
Wildlife Photography: Photography, including other image-capturing activities such as videography, has occurred on the Refuge.
There are no developed photography blinds or platforms on the Refuge and none are proposed at this time.
However, ample opportunities exist for photography on the Refuge.
This Compatibility Determination applies to personal photography only.
Commercial photography or videography, if allowed, would require a Special Use Permit by the Refuge with specific restrictions.
Wildlife observation and photography have been identified as priority public uses for national wildlife refuges by the National Wildlife Refuge System Improvement Act of 1997.
For additional details about this proposed use, please see the Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge G-15
Final Comprehensive Conservation Plan (USFWS 2002) as well as the Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge Draft Comprehensive Conservation Plan and Environmental Assessment (USFWS 2001), which are herein incorporated by reference.
Availability of Resources: Adequate funding and staff exist to manage for wildlife observation and photography at the Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge.
Approximately 10% of a full-time employee would be required to provide law enforcement support, maintenance, and monitoring.
This would be accomplished concurrently with enforcing and monitoring the other priority public uses.
Improved signage, interpretive panels, and kiosk would require additional funding.
Those costs are incorporated into the Compatibility Determination for environmental education and interpretation.
Anticipated Impacts of the Use(s): Impacts are also discussed in Chapter 5 of the Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge Draft Comprehensive Conservation Plan and Environmental Assessment (USFWS 2001).
Endangered and Threatened Species: Human activity can have adverse impacts on rare shore-nesting birds, especially during nesting and foraging activities.
The western snowy plover (Charadrius alexandrinus nivosus), federally listed as threatened, is of primary concern to the Refuge.
The Service strives to provide optimum breeding conditions for the western snowy plover, whose breeding habitat has become increasingly scarce due to development and heavy public use of beaches throughout its range.
However, in recent years, the number of breeding snowy plovers on the Refuge, and throughout the species' range, has decreased as a result of adverse weather conditions on their wintering grounds and heavy predation by native and nonnative wildlife.
Although current levels of public use are low, human activity in the dunes and beaches during the snowy plover breeding season has the potential to adversely affect plover reproductive success.
Western snowy plovers utilize the entire beach profile, from the foredune through the coastal strand into the intertidal zone (between mean low tide and mean high tide lines) for breeding and foraging.
Pedestrians entering the foredune and coastal strand habitats during the breeding season have the potential to trample well-camouflaged western snowy plover eggs and/or chicks or to disturb adults, keeping them away from the nest for extended periods of time, leaving the eggs or chicks vulnerable to predators, wind, and/or extreme temperatures.
Other federally listed species at the Refuge include: Smith's blue butterfly (Euphilotes enoptes smithi) and the Monterey gilia (Gilia tenuiflora ssp. arenaria), federally listed as endangered; and the Monterey spineflower (Chorizanthe pungens var. pungens), federally listed as threatened.
Visitors walking over the dunes have the potential to damage endangered and threatened dune plants and to introduce invasive species through inadvertent transfer of seeds or other propagules.
They may also disturb Smith's blue butterfly or its host plants.
The potential for illegal collection of rare plants, animals, and insects at the Refuge is an additional concern.
G-16
An Intra-Service Section 7 Consultation was conducted on the entire draft CCP.
The resulting Biological Opinion (BO) (USFWS 2002b) concluded that adoption of the preferred alternative is not likely to jeopardize the continued existence of any of the listed species on the Refuge nor adversely modify critical habitat.
With regard to general public access, the BO states that the proposed installation of interpretive signs and symbolic fencing would reduce effects of human disturbance to listed species, and that public use activities would not reduce the ability of the listed species to survive and recover.
Coastal Dunes and Wetlands: The potential for visitors to trample and destroy native dune and wetland vegetation is of concern.
Riparian and Grassland Habitats: The Refuge is actively involved in the restoration of the riparian and grassland habitats.
Off-trail human activity in these habitats can slow restoration efforts.
Migratory Birds: Human activity may disturb migratory birds utilizing the Refuge's habitats for feeding or nesting activities.
Human activities near the wetland habitats could disturb feeding and nesting migratory birds, including black-necked stilts (Himantopus mexicanus), American avocets (Recurvirostra americana), and black skimmers (Rynchops niger), known to nest along the banks of the saline pond.
Other Biological Resources: Litter discarded by hunters can entangle wildlife or be ingested, resulting in injury or death.
Because of the limited number of visitors to the Refuge, this would not pose a significant problem and could be handled with existing staff.
Public Review and Comment: Public review and comment was conducted concurrent with the public review and comment period for the CCP and associated Environmental Assessment.
Please refer to Appendix K in the Final CCP (USFWS 2002) for a review of public comments and Refuge responses.
Determination (check one below): _____ Use is Not Compatible X Use is Compatible With Following Stipulations
Stipulations Necessary to Ensure Compatibility: To continue to allow public access to the Refuge for wildlife observation and photography, the following measurers would be taken.
Western snowy plover breeding activities on the Refuge and throughout the Monterey Bay area have been closely monitored by Point Reyes Bird Observatory (PRBO) since 1984.
The Refuge will continue to partner with PRBO to monitor and document western snowy plover use of the Refuge and document causes of disturbance and mortality, including human disturbance.
Other
G-17
threatened and endangered species and Refuge resources will also be monitored by Refuge staff as well as public compliance with Refuge regulations.
Clearer "Closed Area" signs would be installed at the boundary of the sensitive dune habitat by 2003.
In coordination with other agencies, such as State Parks and California Department of Fish and Game, the Refuge will develop and implement a docent program by 2006, to educate members of the public who use the Refuge during the snowy plover breeding season on the ecology of the plover and the sensitivity of the species' habitat and nests to disturbance.
The docent program will also collect data on public use and disturbance to nesting shorebirds.
By 2007, interpretive signs and an orientation kiosk will be installed on the Refuge to inform visitors about the Refuge's habitats and wildlife and ways of avoiding adverse impacts, including staying on trails.
The kiosk at the entrance will clearly state that dogs and horses are not allowed on the Refuge (except hunting dogs during the waterfowl season), and will include three signs: (1) a sign providing a trail map, trail information, and regulations; (2) a sign that describes the National Wildlife Refuge System; and (3) a interchangeable sign for hunting season and snowy plover nesting season.
The trail from the parking lot to the beach will be well-marked.
Symbolic fencing will be installed to guide public access through the dunes to the beach at the end of the trail.
This will minimize trespass through closed areas, which has been a problem in the past, and will reduce disturbance to nesting birds and endangered and threatened plants within the dune habitat.
If trespass continues to be a problem in the foredunes, symbolic fencing will also be installed along the foredune-beach boundary.
The Refuge will maintain an active law enforcement presence, by using Refuge officers and through a cooperative agreement with California Department of Fish and Game and California Department of Parks and Recreation, to ensure public compliance with all Refuge rules and regulations.
Refuge law enforcement and other Refuge staff presence will be increased to ensure compliance with Refuge regulations.
Access to the Refuge will be allowed only between sunrise and sunset, unless a permit for alternative hours is acquired from the Refuge Manager in advance.
Because the State Lands Commission controls lands below the mean high tide line, complete closure of the beach profile by the Service is not possible.
However, public access to the Refuge will be restricted to areas where access will put minimal stress on endangered and threatened animal and plant populations.
Visitors will be directed to remain a safe distance from snowy plover nesting areas with signs and barriers, and by Refuge personnel and trained volunteers.
Visitors will be directed away from areas where native plant restoration projects are under way, to prevent damage to fragile plants by trampling or by the introduction of nonnative plant species.
G-18
Justification: Currently, the Refuge's visitor use is relatively low; an estimated average of 4­6 visitors per day use the Refuge for wildlife observation and photography.
Total visitor use of surrounding State Beaches averages 250,000 visitors per year compared to the estimated annual use of 4,000­6,000 visitors per year on the Refuge.
The Refuge does not anticipate a substantial increase in overall visitor use over the next 15 years, for the following reasons: no public use facilities, such as plumbed restrooms or picnic tables, are available nor will they be constructed; inland access to the Refuge is via an unpaved road; and beach access is along a walking trail that is approximately 1 mile long.
In addition, many nearby State Beaches will continue to be available that have easier access, offer many public use facilities, and support a wider variety of uses.
At present, the Refuge primarily attracts visitors looking for a quality wildlife-oriented experience, and this is not expected to change in the future.
The National Wildlife Refuge System Improvement Act of 1997 identifies wildlife observation and wildlife photography as priority public uses for national wildlife refuges, along with hunting, fishing, environmental education, and interpretation.
As expressed priority uses of the Refuge system, these uses take precedence over other potential public uses in Refuge planning and management.
The Service strives to provide priority public uses when compatible with the purpose of the Refuge and the mission of the National Wildlife Refuge System (System).
Maintaining the existing level of wildlife observation and photography opportunities would allow the visiting public to continue to experience, enjoy, and learn about native wildlife species in their natural habitats.
There are few coastal public lands available in the Monterey Bay area where the public can view and enjoy wildlife in a relatively undisturbed setting.
Many of the State Beaches are relatively crowded and allow dogs, horses, and various types of non-wildlife oriented recreation.
These uses can detract from the relatively "natural" environment that the Refuge visitor is typically looking for.
However, the Refuge's concern about protecting rare native plants and animals and the overall integrity of the dune system requires that public use be monitored to avoid adverse impacts.
With management conducted in accordance with the stipulations herein, wildlife observation and photography would be compatible with the Refuge purpose and the System mission.
Mandatory Reevaluation Date (provide month and year): Dec. 2017 ________ Mandatory 15-Year Reevaluation Date (for priority public uses) Mandatory 10-Year Reevaluation Date (for all uses other than priority public uses)
NEPA Compliance for Refuge Use Decision (check one below): Conducted with the Comprehensive Conservation Plan ______Categorical Exclusion without Environmental Action Statement
G-19
______Categorical Exclusion and Environmental Action Statement X Environmental Assessment and Finding of No Significant Impact
______Environmental Impact Statement and Record of Decision
References Cited: U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service (USFWS).
2002.
Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge Final Comprehensive Conservation Plan, December 2002.
U. S. Fish and Wildlife Service, Portland, Oregon.
U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service (USFWS).
2002b.
Biological Opinion for the Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge Comprehensive Conservation Plan (1-8-01-FW-66).
U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service, Ventura, California.
U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service (USFWS).
2001.
Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge Draft Comprehensive Conservation Plan and Environmental Assessment, August 2001.
U. S. Fish and Wildlife Service, Portland, Oregon.
G-20
G-22
Compatibility Determination
Use: Refuge Name:
Environmental Education and Interpretation Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge Monterey County, California San Francisco Bay National Wildlife Refuge Complex
Establishing and Acquisition Authority: An Act Authorizing the Transfer of Certain Real Property for Wildlife, or other purposes (16 U.S.C. 667b).
Refuge Purpose(s): "Particular value in carrying out the national migratory bird management program" (16 U.S.C. 667b)
National Wildlife Refuge System Mission: The mission of the National Wildlife Refuge System is "to administer a national network of lands and waters for the conservation, management, and where appropriate, restoration of the fish, wildlife and plant resources and their habitats within the United States for the benefit of present and future generations of Americans" (National Wildlife Refuge System Administration Act of 1966, as amended [16 U.S.C. 668dd-668ee]).
Description of Use(s): The Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge (Refuge) has the opportunity to interpret coastal resources and increase public awareness of the importance of protecting wildlife habitat and threatened and endangered species.
Environmental education and interpretation have been identified as priority public uses for national wildlife refuges by the National Wildlife Refuge System Improvement Act of 1997.
The Refuge supports regionally important populations of special-status species, including western snowy plover (Charadrius alexandrinus nivosus) and Monterey spineflower (Chorizanthe pungens var. pungens) (both federally listed as threatened), and Smith's blue butterfly and Monterey gilia (Gilia tenuiflora ssp. arenaria) (both federally listed as endangered).
Environmental education and interpretation at the Refuge would focus on endangered species and habitat management.
In addition, the Refuge would educate the public about the National Wildlife Refuge System and the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service (Service) mission.
The Refuge is currently open to the public for environmental education and interpretation opportunities on foot.
However, no interpretive or educational displays or materials exist at the Refuge.
Some educational institutions or non-profit groups (such as local Audubon chapters) may currently utilize the Refuge for education; however, the Refuge does not have estimates of this type of use.
The Refuge proposes to enhance existing environmental education partnerships and develop new partnerships with local schools, universities, and organizations.
The Refuge would develop G-23
environmental education and interpretive materials, including: a general Refuge brochure, fact sheets on particular species and habitats, and a guide for educators on endangered species issues.
These materials and programs would serve to interpret the valuable coastal resources of the Refuge and surrounding region, as well as the purpose of the Refuge and the mission of the National Wildlife Refuge System (System).
In coordination with other agencies, such as State Parks and California Department of Fish and Game, the Refuge would develop and implement a docent program by 2006, to educate members of the public who use the Refuge during the snowy plover breeding season on the ecology of the plover and the sensitivity of the species' habitat and nests to disturbance.
Docents would also have information on management activities and resource issues.
By 2007, an orientation kiosk at the Refuge entrance and interpretive signs along the hiking trails would be installed.
The orientation kiosk at the entrance would include three signs: (1) a sign providing a trail map, trail information, and regulations, (2) a sign that describes the National Wildlife Refuge System, and (3) an interchangeable sign for hunting season and snowy plover nesting season.
The kiosk and interpretive signs would provide visitors with information on the various habitat types on the Refuge, including coastal dunes, coastal grassland, riparian, and salt marsh; the species that can be found in these habitats, including threatened and endangered species; and ways of avoiding adverse effects on these resources.
For additional details about this proposed use, please see the Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge Final Comprehensive Conservation Plan (USFWS 2002) as well as the Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge Draft Comprehensive Conservation Plan and Environmental Assessment (USFWS 2001), which are herein incorporated by reference.
Availability of Resources: Approximately $85,000 would be needed for interpretive materials, interpretive panels, kiosk, and signs.
Additionally, managing the uses, implementing the docent program, providing law enforcement, and monitoring the use would require an additional 60% full-time employee (FTE) (park ranger) in addition to the 5-10% FTE that could be devoted by redirecting current staff time.
Upon receiving the increased funding and staff proposed in the CCP, the Refuge would be able to provide interpretation and education opportunities at the Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge, as well as educational materials.
The Refuge would pursue a variety of funding sources in order to support this use, including agreements with other agencies, grant funding, and volunteer assistance.
Until this increased funding is received, the Refuge does not have any resources for environmental education and interpretation.
Anticipated Impacts of the Use(s): Impacts are also discussed in Chapter 5 of the Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge Draft Comprehensive Conservation Plan and Environmental Assessment (USFWS 2001).
G-24
Endangered and Threatened Species: Human activity can have adverse impacts on rare shore-nesting birds, especially during nesting and foraging activities.
The western snowy plover (Charadrius alexandrinus nivosus), federally listed as threatened, is of primary concern to the Refuge.
The Service strives to provide optimum breeding conditions for the western snowy plover, whose breeding habitat has become increasingly scarce due to development and heavy public use of beaches throughout its range.
However, in recent years, the number of breeding snowy plovers on the Refuge, and throughout the species' range, has decreased as a result of adverse weather conditions on their wintering grounds and heavy predation by native and nonnative wildlife.
Although current levels of public use are low, human activity in the dunes and beaches during the snowy plover breeding season has the potential to adversely affect plover reproductive success.
Western snowy plovers utilize the entire beach profile, from the foredune through the coastal strand into the intertidal zone (between mean low tide and mean high tide lines) for breeding and foraging.
Pedestrians entering the foredune and coastal strand habitats during the breeding season have the potential to trample well-camouflaged western snowy plover eggs and/or chicks or to disturb adults, keeping them away from the nest for extended periods of time, leaving the eggs or chicks vulnerable to predators, wind, and/or extreme temperatures.
Other federally listed species at the Refuge include: Smith's blue butterfly (Euphilotes enoptes smithi) and the Monterey gilia (Gilia tenuiflora ssp. arenaria), federally listed as endangered; and the Monterey spineflower (Chorizanthe pungens var. pungens), federally listed as threatened.
Visitors walking over the dunes have the potential to damage endangered and threatened dune plants and to introduce invasive species through inadvertent transfer of seeds or other propagules.
They may also disturb Smith's blue butterfly or its host plants.
The potential for illegal collection of rare plants, animals, and insects at the Refuge is an additional concern.
An Intra-Service Section 7 Consultation was conducted on the entire draft CCP.
The resulting Biological Opinion (BO) (USFWS 2002b) concluded that adoption of the preferred alternative is not likely to jeopardize the continued existence of any of the listed species on the Refuge nor adversely modify critical habitat.
With regard to public access, the BO states that the proposed installation of interpretive signs and symbolic fencing would reduce effects of human disturbance to listed species, and that public use activities would not reduce the ability of the listed species to survive and recover.
In addition, it states that the use of well-trained volunteer docents would benefit listed species at the Refuge.
Coastal Dunes and Wetlands: The potential for visitors to trample and destroy native dune and wetland vegetation is of concern.
Riparian and Grassland Habitats: The Refuge is actively involved in the restoration of the riparian and upland habitats.
Off-trail human activity in these habitats can slow restoration efforts.
Migratory Birds: Human activity may disturb migratory birds utilizing the Refuge's habitats for feeding or nesting activities.
Human activities near the wetland habitats could disturb feeding and nesting migratory birds, including black-necked stilts (Himantopus mexicanus), American G-25
avocets (Recurvirostra americana), and black skimmers (Rynchops niger), known to nest along the banks of the saline pond.
Other Biological Resources: Litter discarded by hunters can entangle wildlife or be ingested, resulting in injury or death.
Because of the limited number of visitors to the Refuge, this would not pose a significant problem and could be handled with existing staff.
Public Review and Comment: Public review and comment was conducted concurrent with the public review and comment period for the CCP and associated Environmental Assessment.
Please refer to Appendix K in the Final CCP (USFWS 2002) for a review of public comments and Refuge responses.
Determination (check one below): _____ Use is Not Compatible X Use is Compatible With Following Stipulations
Stipulations Necessary to Ensure Compatibility: In order to allow public access to the Refuge for environmental education and interpretation, the following measurers will be taken.
Educators or groups who wish to visit or learn about the Refuge would receive interpretive materials from the Refuge staff.
These materials would emphasize endangered species management and would include a general Refuge brochure, a fact sheet on particular species and habitats, and an endangered species guide.
Western snowy plover breeding activities on the Refuge and throughout the Monterey Bay area have been closely monitored by Point Reyes Bird Observatory (PRBO) since 1984.
The Refuge will continue to partner with PRBO to monitor and document western snowy plover use of the Refuge and document causes of disturbance and mortality.
Other threatened and endangered species and Refuge resources will also be monitored by Refuge staff.
Clearer "Closed Area" signs would be installed at the boundary of the sensitive dune habitat by 2003.
In coordination with other agencies, such as State Parks and California Department of Fish and Game, the Refuge will develop and implement a docent program by 2006, to educate members of the public who use the Refuge during the snowy plover breeding season on the ecology of the plover and the sensitivity of the species' habitat and nests to disturbance.
The docent program will also collect data on public use and disturbance to nesting shorebirds.
By 2007, interpretive signs and an orientation kiosk will be installed on the Refuge to inform visitors about the Refuge's habitats and wildlife and ways of avoiding adverse impacts, including staying on trails.
G-26
The trail from the parking lot to the beach will be well-marked.
Symbolic fencing will be installed to guide public access through the dunes to the beach at the end of the trail.
This will minimize trespass through closed areas and reduce disturbance to nesting birds and threatened and endangered plants and butterflies within the dune habitat.
The Refuge will maintain an active law enforcement presence, by using Refuge officers and through a cooperative agreement with California Department of Fish and Game and California Department of Parks and Recreation, to ensure public compliance with all Refuge rules and regulations.
Refuge law enforcement and other Refuge staff presence will be increased to ensure compliance with Refuge regulations.
Access to the Refuge will be allowed only between sunrise and sunset unless a permit for alternative hours is acquired from the Refuge Manager in advance.
The Refuge manager will have the authority to close certain areas to interpretive programs, or to cancel activities as he or she deems necessary to fulfill the Refuge purpose.
Public access will be restricted to areas where access will put minimal stress on endangered and threatened animal and plant populations.
Visitors will be directed to remain a safe distance from snowy plover nesting areas with signs and barriers, and by Refuge personnel and trained volunteers.
Visitors will be directed away from areas where native plant restoration projects are under way, to prevent damage to fragile plants by being crushed underfoot or by the introduction of nonnative plant species.
Concerns about protecting rare native plants and animals, and the overall integrity of the dune ecosystem, require that public use be monitored, and that Refuge staff be closely involved in the development of environmental educational programs.
Justification: The goals of the National Wildlife Refuge System (System) include providing an understanding and appreciation of fish and wildlife ecology and the human role in the environment, and providing Refuge visitors with high-quality, safe, wholesome, and enjoyable recreational experiences oriented toward wildlife, to the extent these activities are compatible with the purpose for which a refuge was established and the mission of the System.
In addition, the National Wildlife Refuge System Improvement Act of 1997 identifies environmental education and interpretation as priority public uses for National Wildlife Refuges, along with hunting, fishing, wildlife observation and photography.
As expressed priority uses of the Refuge system, these uses take precedence over other potential public uses in Refuge planning and management.
The Service strives to provide priority public uses when compatible with the purpose of the Refuge and the mission of the System.
Environmental education and interpretive programs provide opportunities for the visiting public to learn about and experience native plants, fish, and wildlife in their natural habitat.
The Refuge can also educate the public about its role within the agency and the National Wildlife Refuge System, developing better community awareness, volunteer involvement, and advocacy.
The Refuge also has the opportunity to provide meaningful educational information on habitat restoration and on endangered species and their management.
This use, when conducted in accordance with the stipulations, would not be expected to result in adverse impacts to Refuge G-27
resources, and may benefit resources by educating the public to resource issues.
Proposed environmental education and interpretation conducted in accordance with the stipulations herein would be compatible with the Refuge purpose and System mission.
Mandatory Reevaluation Date (provide month and year): Dec. 2017 ________ Mandatory 15-year Reevaluation Date (for priority public uses) Mandatory 10-Year Reevaluation Date (for all uses other than priority public uses)
NEPA Compliance for Refuge Use Decision (check one below): Conducted with Comprehensive Conservation Plan ______Categorical Exclusion without Environmental Action Statement ______Categorical Exclusion and Environmental Action Statement X Environmental Assessment and Finding of No Significant Impact
______Environmental Impact Statement and Record of Decision
References Cited: U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service (USFWS).
2002.
Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge Final Comprehensive Conservation Plan, December 2002.
U. S. Fish and Wildlife Service, Portland, Oregon.
U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service (USFWS).
2002b.
Biological Opinion for the Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge Comprehensive Conservation Plan (1-8-01-FW-66).
U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service, Ventura, California.
U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service (USFWS).
2001.
Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge Draft Comprehensive Conservation Plan and Environmental Assessment, August 2001.
U. S. Fish and Wildlife Service, Portland, Oregon.
G-28
G-30
Compatibility Determination
Use: Refuge Name:
Research Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge Monterey County, California San Francisco Bay National Wildlife Refuge Complex
Establishing and Acquisition Authority: An Act Authorizing the Transfer of Certain Real Property for Wildlife, or other purposes (16 U.S.C. 667b).
Refuge Purpose(s): "Particular value in carrying out the national migratory bird management program" (16 U.S.C. 667b)
National Wildlife Refuge System Mission: The mission of the National Wildlife Refuge System (System) is "to administer a national network of lands and waters for the conservation, management, and where appropriate, restoration of the fish, wildlife and plant resources and their habitats within the United States for the benefit of present and future generations of Americans" (National Wildlife Refuge System Administration Act of 1966, as amended [16 U.S.C. 668dd-668ee]).
Description of Use(s): The Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge (Refuge) receives periodic requests to conduct scientific research.
Although research is not identified as a priority public use by the National Wildlife Refuge System Improvement Act of 1997, scientific research can benefit Refuge resources and support the purpose of the Refuge and mission of the System.
The Refuge proposes to give priority to studies that contribute to the enhancement, protection, use, preservation, and management of native Refuge wildlife populations and their habitats.
Research applicants would be required to submit a proposal summarizing: (1) objectives of the study; (2) justification for the study; (3) detailed study methodology and schedule; (4) potential impacts on Refuge wildlife and/or habitats, including short- and long-term disturbance, injury, and mortality; (5) research personnel required and their qualifications/experience; (6) status of necessary permits (i.e., scientific collecting permits, endangered species permit);
G-31
(7) costs to Refuge and Refuge staff time requested, if any; and (8) anticipated end products (i.e., reports, publications).
Research proposals would be reviewed by Refuge staff or others, as appropriate.
The following criteria, and others as necessary, would be used to assess research proposals: (1) Research that would contribute to Refuge management would have higher priority than other requests.
(2) Research that would conflict with other ongoing research, monitoring, or management programs would not be approved.
(3) Research projects that can be carried out elsewhere (off-Refuge) would be less likely to be approved.
(4) Research that causes undue disturbance or is intrusive would likely not be approved.
The degree and type of disturbance would be carefully weighed when evaluating a research request; many shorebird species are very sensitive to disturbance, and habitats, particularly the dunes that support several threatened and endangered plants and the endangered Smith's blue butterfly (Euphilotes enoptes smithi), are prone to destruction by foot traffic.
(5) Evaluation of research requests would determine whether any effort has been made to minimize disturbance through study design (for example, by considering adjustments in the location, timing, or scope of the study, the number of participants, study methods, the number of study sites, etc.).
(6) If it would be impossible for the Refuge to monitor researcher activities because of staffing or logistical constraints, requests for research may be denied, depending on the circumstances.
(7) The duration of the project would be considered and agreed upon before approval.
Openended projects would not be approved.
All projects would be reviewed annually to assess whether they continue to meet these criteria (and others as necessary), continue to operate as originally proposed, and are contributing to the objectives of the study.
Approved research projects would be conducted under a Refuge-issued Special Use Permit with case-specific stipulations.
For additional details about this proposed use, please see the Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge Final Comprehensive Conservation Plan (USFWS 2002) as well as the Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge Draft Comprehensive Conservation Plan and Environmental Assessment (USFWS 2001), which are herein incorporated by reference.
Availability of Resources: Adequate funding and staff exist to manage for research at the Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge.
As always, discretionary use of staff time would be weighed through a cost-benefit analysis.
G-32
Anticipated Impacts of the Use(s): Impacts are also discussed in Chapter 5 of the Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge Draft Comprehensive Conservation Plan and Environmental Assessment (USFWS 2001).
Endangered and Threatened Species: Human activity can have adverse impacts on rare shore-nesting birds, especially during nesting and foraging activities.
The western snowy plover (Charadrius alexandrinus nivosus), federally listed as threatened, is of primary concern to the Refuge.
The Service strives to provide optimum breeding conditions for the western snowy plover, whose breeding habitat has become increasingly scarce due to development and heavy public use of beaches throughout its range.
However, in recent years, the number of breeding snowy plovers on the Refuge, and throughout the species' range, has decreased as a result of adverse weather conditions on their wintering grounds and heavy predation by native and nonnative wildlife.
Although current levels of public use are low, human activity in the dunes and beaches during the snowy plover breeding season has the potential to adversely affect plover reproductive success.
Western snowy plovers utilize the entire beach profile, from the foredune through the coastal strand into the intertidal zone (between mean low tide and mean high tide lines) for breeding and foraging.
Pedestrians entering the foredune and coastal strand habitats during the breeding season have the potential to trample well-camouflaged western snowy plover eggs and/or chicks or to disturb adults, keeping them away from the nest for extended periods of time, leaving the eggs or chicks vulnerable to predators, wind, and/or extreme temperatures.
Other federally listed species at the Refuge include: Smith's blue butterfly (Euphilotes enoptes smithi) and the Monterey gilia (Gilia tenuiflora ssp. arenaria), federally listed as endangered; and the Monterey spineflower (Chorizanthe pungens var. pungens), federally listed as threatened.
Researchers walking over the dunes have the potential to damage endangered and threatened dune plants and to introduce invasive species through inadvertent transfer of seeds or other propagules.
They may also disturb Smith's blue butterfly or its host plants.
An Intra-Service Section 7 Consultation was conducted on the entire draft CCP.
The resulting Biological Opinion (BO) (USFWS 2002b) concluded that adoption of the preferred alternative is not likely to jeopardize the continued existence of any of the listed species on the Refuge nor adversely modify critical habitat.
With regard to research, the BO states that the evaluation criteria for research proposals contain several criteria that would ensure that research activities are not causing undue adverse effects to listed species.
Coastal Dunes and Wetlands: The potential for researchers to trample and destroy native dune and wetland vegetation is of concern.
Upland and Riparian Habitats: The Refuge is actively involved in the restoration of the riparian and upland habitats.
Off-trail human activity in these habitats can slow restoration efforts.
Migratory Birds: Human activity may disturb migratory birds utilizing the Refuge's habitats for feeding or nesting activities.
Human activities near the wetland habitats could disturb feeding G-33
and nesting migratory birds, including black-necked stilts (Himantopus mexicanus), American avocets (Recurvirostra americana), and black skimmers (Rynchops niger), known to nest along the banks of the saline pond.
Minimal impact on Refuge wildlife and habitats is expected with research studies.
Some level of disturbance is expected with all research activities, because most researchers would be entering areas that are normally closed to the public and may be collecting samples or handling plants or wildlife.
Special Use Permits would include conditions to ensure that impacts on wildlife and habitats are reduced as much as possible.
Public Review and Comment: Public review and comment was conducted concurrent with the public review and comment period for the CCP and associated Environmental Assessment.
Please refer to Appendix K in the Final CCP (USFWS 2002) for a review of public comments and Refuge responses.
Determination (check one below): _____ Use is Not Compatible X Use is Compatible With Following Stipulations
Stipulations Necessary to Ensure Compatibility: Concerns about protecting rare native plants and animals and the overall integrity of the dune ecosystem require that Refuge staff closely review proposed research projects and that research activities and impacts be monitored.
To continue to allow research on the Refuge, the following measurers would be taken.
Western snowy plover breeding activities on the Refuge and throughout the Monterey Bay area have been closely monitored by Point Reyes Bird Observatory (PRBO) since 1984.
The Refuge will continue to partner with PRBO to monitor and document western snowy plover use of the Refuge and document causes of mortality and disturbance.
Other threatened and endangered species and Refuge resources will also be monitored by Refuge staff, and the locations of extremely sensitive wildlife habitat areas will be considered when evaluating requests for research.
If proposed research methods would adversely affect, or would have the potential to adversely affect, Refuge resources (habitat or wildlife), the researcher will be required to demonstrate the need for the research and to identify potential impacts in advance of their occurrence.
The researcher will also be required to develop mitigation measures to minimize potential impacts; mitigation measures will be listed as conditions on the Special Use Permit.
Refuge staff may accompany researchers at any time to assess potential impacts, and may determine that previously approved research and Special Use Permits should be terminated because of impacts.
All Refuge rules and regulations must be followed unless otherwise excepted by Refuge management.
G-34
Justification: Research projects would contribute to the enhancement, protection, use, preservation, and management of native Refuge wildlife populations and their habitats, or they would not be approved.
The anticipated level of research to be conducted on the Refuge at any given time would be compatible because the Refuge would ensure that research proposals support the purpose of the Refuge and mission of the System.
In view of the impacts research activities may have on the Service's ability to achieve the Refuge purpose, sufficient restrictions will be placed on the researcher to ensure that disturbance is kept to a minimum.
Mandatory Reevaluation Date (provide month and year): Mandatory 15-Year Reevaluation Date (for priority public uses) Dec. 2012 Mandatory 10-Year Reevaluation Date (for all uses other than priority public uses)
NEPA Compliance for Refuge Use Decision (check one below): Conducted with Comprehensive Conservation Plan ______Categorical Exclusion without Environmental Action Statement ______Categorical Exclusion and Environmental Action Statement X Environmental Assessment and Finding of No Significant Impact
______Environmental Impact Statement and Record of Decision
References Cited: U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service (USFWS).
2002.
Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge Final Comprehensive Conservation Plan, December 2002.
U. S. Fish and Wildlife Service, Portland, Oregon.
U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service (USFWS).
2002b.
Biological Opinion for the Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge Comprehensive Conservation Plan (1-8-01-FW-66).
U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service, Ventura, California.
U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service (USFWS).
2001.
Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge Draft Comprehensive Conservation Plan and Environmental Assessment, August 2001.
U. S. Fish and Wildlife Service, Portland, Oregon.
G-35
Compatibility Determination
Use: Refuge Name:
Mosquito Control Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge Monterey County, California San Francisco Bay National Wildlife Refuge Complex
Establishing and Acquisition Authority: An Act Authorizing the Transfer of Certain Real Property for Wildlife, or other purposes (16 U.S.C. 667b).
Refuge Purpose(s): "Particular value in carrying out the national migratory bird management program" (16 U.S.C. 667b)
National Wildlife Refuge System Mission: The mission of the National Wildlife Refuge System (System) is "to administer a national network of lands and waters for the conservation, management, and where appropriate, restoration of the fish, wildlife and plant resources and their habitats within the United States for the benefit of present and future generations of Americans" (National Wildlife Refuge System Administration Act of 1966, as amended [16 U.S.C. 668dd-668ee]).
Description of Use(s): Three mosquito species are typically found at the Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge (Refuge):Ochlerotatus washinoi, Culiseta inornata, and Culex tarsalis.
The Northern Salinas Valley Mosquito Abatement District (NSVMAD) has been conducting mosquito control at this site for over forty years, beginning while this land was still owned by the military.
In 1994, the Refuge completed a compatibility determination for this activity which stipulated a stepped approach for mosquito control at the Refuge.
NSVMAD proposes to continue this approach.
The first two steps utilize biorationals: either the bacterium Bacillus thuringiensis israelensis (Bti) or the juvenile hormone analog methoprene.
Although there is no official definition of "biorational," they are generally described as pest control materials of a natural origin that have limited or no adverse effects on the environment or beneficial organisms (Ware 1989).
However, depending on timing and conditions (weather, water temperature, etc.), application of biorationals is not always effective.
As a last resort, Golden Bear 1111 oil (Golden Bear), a petroleum distillate, is applied.
Material selection is based on efficacy, stage of mosquito development, water temperature, and species of mosquito.
NSVMAD prefers to use Bti because it is the most effective treatment; it is also the most selective of the available treatments (i.e. has the fewest nontarget effects).
NSVMAD has only used Golden Bear four times in the past 22 years.
Bti would typically be applied in a liquid formulation known as Teknar HP-D, at a rate of 0.5 - 1.0 pints per acre as specified on the label.
The Refuge proposes to allow the NSVMAD to continue these activities under an annual Special Use Permit (SUP) and the stipulations presented herein.
Mosquito abatement is not identified as a priority public use by the National Wildlife Refuge System Improvement Act of 1997.
G-37
The Refuge is located in the Monterey Bay area.
Located less than 3 miles from the Refuge are the City of Marina and the City of Castroville.
Additionally, approximately half a mile north of the Refuge is the Monterey Dunes Colony housing development of 120 residences.
Finally, the artichoke farms immediately adjacent to the Refuge are worked year-round by approximately 10100 field workers per day.
Residents have expressed their concerns to the NSVMAD about mosquito nuisance as well as the potential for the transmission of mosquito-borne diseases such as West Nile virus and western equine encephalitis (NSVMAD 2002).
Mosquito control applications could occur any time between November and June, depending on environmental conditions.
Mosquito control would more typically occur from December through April in the saline pond and adjacent salt marsh habitat on the Refuge (See Fig. 1).
This area is closed to the public.
The saline pond and marsh are flooded during winter rains and winter high tides, resulting in a potential mosquito breeding site with an area of approximately 80 acres (range 25-130 acres).
In most years, the pond dries in the summer.
NSVMAD would monitor the pond weekly during the winter and spring to detect presence of mosquito larvae and identify to species.
This would involve a monitor walking along the pond and sampling the invertebrates with a 16 ounce dipper.
Treatment would be conducted almost exclusively by aerial application, but on rare occasions, when the treatment area is small, spraying would be done by hand.
Aerial applications would be made using a helicopter flown at an altitude of 5­8 feet at an airspeed of 55 mph.
Flight altitude would be low in order to minimize drift and thus increase efficiency.
Swath width would be 66 feet, so several passes would be made.
Treatment duration would be 10­25 minutes, depending on the size of the treatment area.
An onboard GPS system would be used by the pilot to guide transects and minimize overlap and skips (R
Treatments would usually be conducted in the early morning.
Helicopter application would be utilized because it is more effective and efficient than other methods; it also prevents surface disturbance to sensitive marsh habitat.
In the past, the presence of any Culex tarsalis pupae or larvae on the Refuge triggered control by NSVMAD because this species is a known vector of human disease, including West Nile virus, St. Louis encephalitis, and western equine encephalitis, as well as a moderately aggressive biter with a flight range of 10-15 miles.
Presence of Ochlerotatus washinoi has also triggered control in the past because of its flight range of several miles, its aggressive nature as a daytime biter, and its ability to produce large numbers.
However, the Refuge now proposes to institute a threshold of 0.5 larvae per dip for control of these species.
This new threshold is likely to result in fewer treatments each season, limiting control to occasions when larger numbers of mosquitos would be produced.
In contrast to the previous two species, presence of the less aggressive Culiseta inornata did not necessarily trigger control in the past.
NSVMAD considered environmental conditions including water temperature, density of mosquito larvae, and presence of mosquito predators in deciding whether the mosquitos could become a problem and therefore whether to treat.
In the last twenty-two years, Culiseta has only been treated four times.
The Refuge proposes a minimum threshold of at least 1.0 larvae per dip for control of this species.
Even when this threshold is met, NSVMAD may decide not to treat Culiseta based on other .
G-38
G-39
environmental conditions.
Treatment for general control of mosquitos would be limited to Bti and methoprene The use of Golden Bear or monomolecular films is strongly discouraged and would only be allowed in cases when other larvicides have failed and a human health concern exists.
This would be determined by the Refuge in conjunction with NSVMAD and the appropriate health authorities.
Notification and concurrence by the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service (Service) would be required for use of larvacides other than methoprene or Bti.
Frequent monitoring should preclude the use of oils/films in most cases.
In the event that mosquitos from the Refuge pose a human-health emergency, the most appropriate control technique would be utilized and stipulations herein would be implemented.
The threshold for treatment could be as low as any presence of mosquito larvae, depending on human health risk.
The most appropriate pesticide for effective mosquito control would be utilized, including adulticides.
Notification and concurrence by the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service (Service) would be required for use of adulticides, to treat for human health emergencies.
For the purpose of this compatibility determination, in order to allow use of adulticides, a human-health emergency is defined by the presence of human disease viruspositive mosquitos or virus-positive birds in Monterey County or adjacent counties.
West Nile virus was first detected in California in 2002, and Culex tarsalis is a known vector for the disease.
This disease has quickly spread across the country since first detected on the East Coast in 1999.
Its rapid spread has necessitated the development of increased disease monitoring and mosquito abatement by mosquito abatement districts nationwide.
The Centers for Disease Control and Prevention advocates that mosquito abatement districts conduct surveillance for the virus (including the use of sentinel bird flocks), monitor mosquito populations, and implement control measures prior to the occurrence of West Nile virus infections in humans or domestic animals (CDC 1999).
They note that the "most effective and economical way to control mosquitos is by larval source reduction" (CDC 1999).
In addition to the threat of West Nile virus, Culex tarsalis in Monterey County can also transmit St. Louis encephalitis, and western equine encephalitis.
Mosquito-borne human disease viruses were last recorded in sentinel flocks in Monterey County in 1994 (St. Louis encephalitis), but they have been documented more recently in San Luis Obispo County, immediately south (NSVMAD 2002).
Mosquito populations are related to precipitation amounts.
In years when rainfall is below normal, mosquito populations are low and control has been reduced or nonexistent.
Conversely, when rainfall is above normal, mosquito populations are larger and mosquito control has been increased.
For example, between 1988 and 1991, rainfall was below normal and no mosquito control was conducted at the Refuge these years.
Typically, there have been 2-4 treatments in a season.
In the last twenty-two years, mosquito control applications occurred 2.3 times per season on average.
All mosquito control activities would be conducted by the Northern Salinas Valley Mosquito Abatement District under an annual Refuge-issued Special Use Permit with necessary stipulations.
G-40
For additional details about this proposed use, please see the Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge Final Comprehensive Conservation Plan (USFWS 2002) as well as the Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge Draft Comprehensive Conservation Plan and Environmental Assessment (USFWS 2001), which are herein incorporated by reference.
Availability of Resources: Adequate funding and staff exist to manage for mosquito control at the Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge.
It is estimated that approximately 5% of a full-time employee (FTE) would be needed to monitor treatment of the pond and potential effects to wildlife, to survey the pond for nesting birds, and to develop and administer the required permits and documentation.
This can be accomplished with existing staff and Point Reyes Bird Observatory cooperators.
Additional funding would be necessary to conduct detailed research on potential effects of mosquito control on Refuge resources.
The Refuge would attempt to secure additional funds through a variety of grants as well as cooperative research with universities, United States Geological Survey, and/or the mosquito abatement districts.
Anticipated Impacts of the Use(s): Impacts are also discussed in Chapter 5 of the Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge Draft Comprehensive Conservation Plan and Environmental Assessment (USFWS 2001).
Toxicity and Effects to Nontarget Organisms: Bti is used almost exclusively by the NSVMAD when treating the Refuge.
The bacterium Bti is a microbial insecticide that, when ingested, is toxic to mosquitos, black flies and several other members of the nematocera suborder within the order diptera.
The intact toxin is not active against vertebrates (Boisvert and Boisvert 2000).
The greatest degrees of susceptibility are within a few families: the culicidae (mosquitos), the simuliidae (black flies) and the chironomidae (midges); with mosquitos and black flies being the most susceptible (Boisvert and Boisvert 2000).
Bti is used widely because of its high specificity for target species and environmental safety (Ali 1981; Merritt et a. 1989).
Laboratory and field studies have shown that Bti is toxic to some larval chironomids, but many factors, such as temperature, water depth, aquatic vegetation, and suspended organic matter, reduce its toxicity to chironomids in the environment (Charbonneau et al. 1993; Merritt et al. 1989).
Numerous studies have been conducted on the effects of Bti on nontarget organisms (anything other than mosquitos or black flies).
A recent comprehensive review of 75 of these studies (Boisvert and Boisvert 2000) found that 37 had documented that some nontarget organisms can be effected to a certain extent after a Bti treatment.
The other 38 studies showed no effects to nontarget organisms studied.
Some members of the diptera suborder nematocera have been shown to be the most common species susceptible to Bti.
The susceptibility of chironomid larvae to Bti could be between 15 to 75 times less than mosquito or black fly larvae, but the studies indicated that a high dosage of Bti will affect chironomid populations.
Although most of the studies were done either at overdosage or under laboratory conditions, 9 of the 23 studies reporting an effect on chironomid populations were done using actual operating conditions (in G-41
the field at operational doses).
Apart from chironomidae, seven other dipteran families were affected by Bti.
During many experiments or trials using overdosages some of these families showed significant mortalities.
All these families are dipteran and may possess in "overdosage" conditions the capacity to capture, ingest and digest toxic crystals.
In sufficient quantity, this can produce enough toxic proteins to induce cellular damage that could lead to death.
A highdosage treatment is not necessary to obtain a complete control of mosquitos and black flies, but in "overdosage" conditions, secondary effects can be expected on nontarget organisms.
At the level of treatment proposed for the Refuge (0.5-1.0 pints per acre), overdosages would not be used, so adverse impacts to nontarget species is expected to be negligible or nonexistent.
A study in saline habitats of the San Francisco Bay (Lawler et al. 2000) looked at the effects of methoprene and duplex (Bti and methoprene combined) on nontarget invertebrates.
In these saline habitats, which more closely resembles the Refuge pond, corixids (water boatmen) were the most common invertebrate (corixids are not in the nematocera suborder of diptera whose members were affected by Bti; they are in the order hemiptera).
Lawler et al. (2000) found no evidence that duplex or methoprene affected corixid survival or maturation or on abundances of other invertebrates they studied.
A long-term study on the effects of repeated Bti treatments on nontarget organisms in freshwater wetlands was performed by Hershey et al. (1998) over 4 years in Minnesota.
Bti was applied for 3 consecutive years using 6 applications each year between mid-April and mid-July at recommended label rates.
Boisvert 
Highly significant reductions were observed in several insect groups in the second year and eventually the intensive treatments resulted in wetland communities that were depleted of most insects during the third year.
Since Bti was likely to be directly toxic to only nematoceran diptera, the effects of Bti on other insect groups may have resulted from disruption of the invertebrate food web (Hershey et al. 1998).
Because the application was repeated 6 times per season at 3-week or shorter intervals, nontarget insects were much more likely to have been exposed to the direct or indirect effects of Bti. Boisvert 
Su and Mulla (1999) found that shortly after a single Bti treatment the growth of two species of green algae was inhibited for nearly three weeks.
Considering the type of habitat treated and the frequency of Bti applications by Hershey et al. (1998), it is likely that primary production of algae was almost totally inhibited for three years resulting in the dramatic changes in diversity indices that they observed.
No such food web effects have been documented during "normal" use of these materials or in saline environments (Lawler et al. 1999).
Conditions at the Refuge differ from those of the Hershey study in that the Refuge pond is saline and the frequency of proposed treatments is much lower (currently approximately 0-4 treatments spaced over 6 months; may be fewer with new threshold).
In conclusion, although Bti is the most selective of mosquito control treatments, there may be some effects to chironomids under normal operating conditions.
However, repeating treatments at longer intervals give the nontarget community time to recover in case there are any effects (Mulla et al. 1979).
Although Hershey et al. (1998) provides some evidence that intensive, G-42
frequent, repeated Bti applications can result in a disruption to the invertebrate food web, less frequent applications with longer intervals between them may not show the same results.
In addition, chironomids were the most abundant group in the freshwater wetlands of that study (Hershey et al. 1998).
Thus the results of that study do not necessarily apply to the saline conditions at the Refuge, where applications are fewer and spaced out further.
Therefore, at the level of treatment proposed, adverse impacts to nontargets are expected to be negligible or nonexistent.
However, Hershey's study does demonstrate the need for long-term research to better understand the consequences of Bti application on the invertebrate food web.
NSVMAD has not used methoprene on the Refuge in the past, but certain environmental conditions may warrant its use.
Methoprene, a juvenile hormone analog, is thought to be among the most target-specific of mosquito control agents, but it is also used effectively for control of pest chironomidae (Miura and Takahashi 1974; Mulla et al. 1979; Norland and Mulla 1975).
Methoprene kills larvae during emergence, and thus should not be expected to directly affect larval abundance in short-term studies.
Methoprene is not as specific as Bti (Breaud et al. 1977).
Studies have shown deleterious effects of methoprene for predatory dytiscids (aquatic beetles) (Norland and Mulla 1975), and for notonectids (backswimmers) (Miura and Takahashi 1974), but low toxicity to other organisms such as zooplankton (Niemi et al. 1999; Miura and Takahashi 1973).
Reduction of predators on methoprene-treated sites, including both dipteran and nondipteran predators, may have been due to a combination of direct and indirect effects from methoprene (Hershey 1998).
Because Bti is more selective, it is the Refuge's preferred biorational treatment.
Oils or monomolecular films exhibit pesticide properties by forming a coating on top of water drowning larvae, pupae, and emerging adult mosquitos.
They are derived from petroleum distillates.
Golden Bear 1111, a trade name oil, has been applied on the Refuge by NSVMAD four times since 1981, the last application in 1993.
Field studies on salt marshes in South San Francisco Bay indicated that GB-1111 had an initial significant impact on potential prey (water boatmen, brine flies, and mosquitos) of aquatic birds that dissipated rapidly 3-days post spray (USGS 2001).
Another study found that GB-1111 application was harmless to bottom dwelling macroinvertebrates, including mayflies, dragonflies, and damselflies; however, surface breathing organisms, including diving beetles, notonectids and corixids, were markedly affected, with mortality observed soon after treatment (Mulla and Darwazeh 1981).
In birds exposed to operational levels of Golden Bear, matting of feathers and mild hypothermia may result (USGS 2001).
Clearly, Golden Bear is the least desirable of the larval treatment methods considered herein in terms of effects on nontarget organisms.
Golden Bear would only be allowed in cases when other larvacides have failed and a human health concern exists.
The NSVMAD has never used adulticides at the Refuge.
Mosquito adulticides are commonly synthetic chemicals with lethal effects on a broad spectrum of insect species.
Use of adulticides should not be necessary if monitoring of mosquito populations is conducted properly because mosquitos would be controlled earlier, at the larval stage.
G-43
Although the Refuge's saline pond has not been quantitatively surveyed for aquatic invertebrates, staff from the Moss Landing Marine Lab have surveyed for presence amphipods.
John Oliver of the Marine Lab describes the invertebrates of the saline similar to those of the Salinas River lagoon area (Moss Landing Marine Lab 2002). most abundant species are both amphipods (Eogammarus and Corophium); isopods (Gnorimosphaeroma) and worms (including polychaetes and oligochaetes) are also chironomid and other fly larvae are also present, though not dominant.
of pond as The two common;
Endangered and Threatened Species: The following impacts are those that could potentially occur in the absence of stipulations, which are detailed later in this document.
Human activity can have adverse impacts on rare shore-nesting birds, especially during nesting and foraging activities.
The western snowy plover (Charadrius alexandrinus nivosus), federally listed as threatened, is of primary concern to the Refuge.
The Service strives to provide optimum breeding conditions for the western snowy plover, whose breeding habitat has become increasingly scarce due to development and heavy public use of beaches throughout its range.
However, in recent years, the number of breeding snowy plovers on the Refuge, and throughout the species' range, has decreased as a result of adverse weather conditions on their wintering grounds and heavy predation by native and nonnative wildlife.
Human activity in the dunes and beaches during the snowy plover breeding season has the potential to adversely affect plover reproductive success.
Western snowy plovers utilize the entire beach profile, from the foredune through the coastal strand into the intertidal zone (between mean low tide and mean high tide lines) for breeding and foraging.
In addition, Point Reyes Bird Observatory has documented adult snowy plovers bringing chicks to the saline pond area to brood from May through September, as this area provides excellent cover and a good food source.
The most commonly used brooding site in the area is also located on the Refuge, at the mouth of the Salinas River.
The endangered California brown pelican (Pelecanus occidentalis californicus) also utilizes the lagoon at the mouth of the Salinas River, as well as islands near the rivermouth, and portions of the beach strand as roosting sites, particularly from April through December.
A NSVMAD monitor would walk along the saline pond edge and sample for mosquito larvae with a 16 ounce dipper.
At least ten samples would be taken at different parts of the pond or marsh.
Disturbance to plovers, and other birds, is expected to be minimal because monitoring would be done by one person, the monitor would not walk through the dunes, and the monitor would keep moving, limiting the duration of the disturbance to any particular area.
In addition, monitoring would be more frequent prior to the breeding season when water levels are higher.
As the pond dries down, monitoring frequency would be reduced to once every two weeks.
Both plovers and pelicans may be disturbed by treatment activities.
These effects as well as potential effects to plover food resources are discussed further under the migratory birds heading below.
Other federally listed species at the Refuge include: Smith's blue butterfly (Euphilotes enoptes smithi) and the Monterey gilia (Gilia tenuiflora ssp. arenaria) (federally listed as endangered); and the Monterey spineflower (Chorizanthe pungens var. pungens) (federally listed as
G-44
threatened).
NSVMAD personnel do not enter dune areas, so impacts on these species are not expected.
An Intra-Service Section 7 Consultation was conducted on the entire draft CCP, including the proposed mosquito abatement activities.
The resulting Biological Opinion (BO) (USFWS 2002b) concluded that adoption of the preferred alternative is not likely to jeopardize the continued existence of any of the listed species on the Refuge nor adversely modify critical habitat.
Wetlands and Migratory Birds: The following impacts are those that could potentially occur in the absence of stipulations, which are detailed later in this document.
The saline pond and salt marsh habitats support a variety of migratory birds including shorebirds, raptors, terns, and waterfowl.
The lagoon at the mouth of the Salinas River supports pelicans, waterfowl, terns, gulls, and wading birds.
Shorebirds utilize the saline pond and rivermouth throughout the year.
Peak shorebird numbers occur during the spring (April­May) and fall (September­October) migration periods when hundreds of shorebirds are present at the saline pond and on the mudflats adjacent to the river.
A variety of wintering shorebirds utilize the pond area, including western sandpipers, American avocets, black-necked stilts, dowitchers, sanderlings, and plovers.
In addition several species are known to nest in the pond area including the American avocet, black-necked stilt, Caspian tern, and black skimmers.
The rivermouth lagoon provides important habitat for migrating, wintering, and a few breeding waterfowl as well as a variety of waterbirds including gulls, herons, egrets, cormorants, and pelicans.
The Salinas River and rivermouth lagoon support a wintering waterfowl population of approximately 500­3,000.
The high salinity and comparatively shallow depths of the saline pond attract fewer waterfowl and waterbirds than the rivermouth lagoon (John Gilchrist and Associates et al. 1997).
The Refuge pond is used by dabbling ducks during spring migration as a stopover foraging and roosting site.
Daily winter waterfowl populations in the pond range from 10 to 100, depending on available water.
Helicopter application of mosquito pesticides may result in direct short-term disturbance of birds utilizing the saline pond and salt marsh.
PRBO has observed flushing of nesting plovers and other shorebirds during helicopter treatment, although no nest or chick loss has been documented to this cause.
However, disturbance during the breeding season does have the potential to decrease breeding success.
Shorebirds tend to leave the pond area during applications, potentially resulting in separation of chicks from adults if applications are made after March, when shorebirds are nesting.
Helicopter applications during the nesting season may also result in eggs or chicks being blown from nests by rotor wash.
Pelicans, terns, and gulls roosting on the rivermouth flush when disturbed and then attempt to return to the roost.
Repeated passes by the helicopter near the rivermouth may result in a G-45
majority of these birds leaving the area.
Herons and egrets will also flush from the rivermouth areas when disturbed, moving upstream to undisturbed areas.
These undisturbed areas are adjacent stretches of the Salinas River, both within and outside the Refuge.
Waterfowl species react differently to the disturbance.
Dabblers such as pintails and mallards flush and leave the area.
Diving ducks such as ruddy ducks, buffleheads, and scaups will dive or move to avoid the disturbance but generally do not leave the Refuge.
Birds along the rivermouth can be flushed as the helicopter is entering or exiting the area as well as during treatment if the treatment area is large, approximately 100 acres or more (R
When the treatment area is smaller, the area of marsh near the river mouth is not flooded (see Fig. 1), thus the helicopter does not fly close enough to the river during treatment to flush birds there.
In the past twentytwo years, treatment size has been 100 acres or more only 5 times.
Therefore, birds using the rivermouth lagoon area have been primarily flushed as the helicopter enters and exits the area, not during treatment.
In contrast to helicopter application, hand-treatment of the pond would require several persons walking through the entire marsh over a few days, and treatment by motor-vehicle would require its use throughout the marsh and would damage habitat.
Both hand and motor-vehicle application would prolong the period of treatment and would result in trampling of native vegetation and potentially wildlife.
In addition, there may be secondary impacts on birds utilizing the treated pond.
Birds feed on a wide variety of insects and other invertebrates.
In particular, waterfowl and shorebirds utilize aquatic invertebrates as a source of protein during spring migration.
The food source available in the pond may be reduced for birds and other native wildlife.
However, indirect food-chain effects to vertebrates have not been documented thus far.
Hanowski et al. (1997) collected data 2 years before treatment and 3 years after treatments of either Bti or methoprene were applied.
They found no effect of Bti or methoprene treatments on the bird community or on 19 individual bird species.
The authors believe that other factors, such as predation and weather, were more important influences.
Despite large decreases in insect density and biomass 2 and 3 years after treatment in the Hershey et al. study (1998), a related study at the same study site observed no direct or indirect negative effects of treatment with Bti or methoprene over a 3-year period on zooplankton or breeding birds (Niemi et al. 1999).
There have been numerous studies that have found no effects of Bti treatment on fish, amphibians, crustaceans, molluscs, worms, beetles, dragonflies, damselflies, and many other aquatic invertebrates (see Boisvert and Boisvert 2000 for a review; also Lawler et al. 1999; USFWS 1998; Merritt et al. 1989).
The Refuge's saline pond attracts large numbers of shorebirds including terns (Caspian, Forsters, elegant), snowy plovers, American avocets, and black-necked stilts as well as phalaropes and waterfowl.
Terns primarily eat small fish and crustaceans.
The Refuge's saline pond fills through direct rainfall and runoff as well as periodic wave overwash during winter extreme high tides; it typically dries in the summer.
In addition, salt is concentrated by evaporative loss and can vary extremely from 1 part per thousand (ppt) to 150 ppt (Gilchrist and Associates 1997).
Therefore, although some fish may be washed into the pond from the tides, the pond is not expected to support large numbers fish.
Fish eating species that use the pond, such as terns, G-46
forage along the river and ocean shore.
Other shorebirds are usually considered opportunistic feeders, eating what is available.
Their diets can consist of small fish, small crustaceans (including copepods, amphipods, ostracods), crabs, snails, worms, beetles, mollusks, water bugs including corixids, lepidopterans, as well as flies and other aquatic insects, and seeds.
Because of varied shorebird diets and limited number of mosquito control treatments anticipated, the Refuge does not expect impacts to shorebirds based on food availability.
Diets of ducks are also varied and consist of seeds, other plant material including roots, tubers, and leaves, crustaceans, snails, and aquatic insects including mosquitos, damselflies, mayflies, and midges.
In general duck diets in the winter consist primarily of plant material while breeding-season diets are higher in aquatic invertebrates which provide needed protein (Baldassarre et al. 1994).
Goose diets, on the other hand, consist primarily of plant material.
Most of the waterfowl using the Refuge are migratory and use the Refuge as wintering habitat.
In addition, most mosquito control treatments occur prior to April.
Therefore effects to waterfowl are expected to be negligible.
Public Review and Comment: Public review and comment was conducted concurrent with the public review and comment period for the CCP and associated Environmental Assessment.
Please refer to Appendix K in the Final CCP (USFWS 2002) for a review of public comments and Refuge responses.
Determination (check one below): _____ Use is Not Compatible X Use is Compatible With Following Stipulations
Stipulations Necessary to Ensure Compatibility: To continue to allow the NSVMAD to access the Refuge for mosquito control, the following measures would be taken: A threshold level of 0.5-1.0 larvae per dip will be utilized for mosquito control.
This should decrease frequency of applications.
Bti will be utilized over methoprene due to its higher target-specificity.
Golden Bear or other oils/films will only be allowed in cases when larvicides have failed and a human health concern exists, following a specific request to the Refuge and verbal concurrence.
Prior to any application of Golden Bear, birds will be flushed from the pond by a helicopter flyover immediately before treatment.
Treatment may be allowed only when entomological surveys determine the presence of mosquitos on the Refuge.
Other pesticides, such as more toxic organophospates or mosquito adulticides, will only be allowed in cases of a human health emergency, following a specific request to the Refuge and verbal concurrence.
A human-health emergency is defined by the presence of human disease virus-positive mosquitos or virus-positive birds in Monterey County or adjacent counties.
G-47
Treatment may be allowed only when entomological surveys determine the presence of mosquitos on the Refuge.
As of the date this compatibility determination is signed, the Service has not finalized a contingency plan for dealing with mosquitos in a human, fish, or wildlife health emergency.
However, this is expected to be finalized in 2003.
At that time, it will be attached as an appendix to this determination and will be incorporated into the Refuge's mosquito control program.
If this determination needs to be reassessed once the contingency plan is finalized, it will occur at that time.
Mosquito control will not be allowed during the shorebird nesting season (March 15­August 31) if shorebirds are known to be nesting or if snowy plovers are utilizing the pond, except in cases of a human health emergency.
The helicopter pilot will avoid flying low over the river to access or exit the Refuge, thus minimizing bird flush.
Either the helicopter will access the Refuge without crossing the river or will fly high enough over the river to avoid bird flush.
R
The helicopter will not be allowed to land on the Refuge.
NSVMAD will need to notify the Refuge prior to monitoring or treating the pond.
After March 15th, Refuge staff and cooperators will regularly survey the pond area for nesting birds and will let NSVMAD know if treatment will be allowed.
The Refuge recognizes that a notification period of several days prior to treatment may allow larval development of mosquitos and precipitate the use of more harmful treatment materials.
Therefore, the permittee will be required to notify the Refuge prior to monitoring/sampling efforts so Refuge staff will be aware that treatment may be imminent.
In all cases, the permittee will give as much notice to the Refuge as is possible, and at least 24 hours notice.
Western snowy plover breeding activities on the Refuge and throughout the Monterey Bay area will continue to be monitored by Point Reyes Bird Observatory (PRBO).
PRBO will monitor and document western snowy plover use of the Refuge and document causes of individual bird mortality as well as disturbance.
If PRBO or Refuge staff observe disturbance to plovers caused by NSVMAD activities, the magnitude and frequency of such disturbance will be documented.
Other threatened and endangered species and Refuge resources will also be monitored by Refuge staff.
Terms and conditions of the Special Use Permit will be subject to annual modification if disturbance is considered to interfere with or detract from the fulfillment of the purpose of the Refuge or System mission.
For example, if bird surveys determine that an unacceptable level of flushing or disturbance occurs during helicopter treatment, the Refuge may require modifications to treatment activities.
Mosquito control will be authorized annually by Special Use Permit.
Permit conditions will stipulate that all control work will be carried out in conformance with pre-approved Pesticide Use Proposals and Section 7 Endangered Species consultations.
G-48
Justification: After assessing the potential impacts from mosquito abatement activities, the Refuge has found that allowing these uses would not materially interfere with or detract from the purpose for which the Refuge was established or the mission of the National Wildlife Refuge System.
The Refuge is within a few miles of two communities, Castroville and Marina.
In addition, a 120-unit housing complex is located approximately half a mile north of the Refuge, and approximately 6,000 visitors come to the Refuge each year.
To protect Refuge visitors and be a good neighbor to the surrounding communities, mosquito control will continue to be allowed subject to the stipulations herein.
These communities have been essentially mosquito-free since the NSVMAD began operations and any mosquitos encountered result in a large number of complaints to the district.
However, the Refuge has determined that a threshold limit for mosquito control is appropriate and has thus incorporated that threshold into the stipulations herein.
Mosquito control for human health emergencies does not necessitate thresholds.
The most appropriate and effective control technique will be utilized.
Because frequency of treatment is expected to remain low and intervals between treatments long, overall effects to nontarget organisms are not expected to be significant.
Two to three treatments per year spaced about 7 weeks apart have been the norm for the last seven years, and treatments may further decrease with the new threshold limits.
Treatment by helicopter is preferred because the short duration of the flight (10-25 minutes) minimizes disturbance to wildlife and no effects to vegetation are expected.
Because pilots will no longer be able to fly low over the river to enter or exit the Refuge, disturbance to birds using the river and rivermouth lagoon will be minimized.
In contrast, hand-treatment would require several persons walking through the entire marsh over a few days and motor-vehicle use through the marsh would damage habitat.
Both hand and motor-vehicle application would prolong the period of treatment and would result in trampling of native vegetation and potentially wildlife.
Shorebird diets are varied, opportunistic, and do not rely heavily on dipterans, therefore, occasional reductions of mosquito larvae and potentially chironomids are not expected to impact their populations.
Waterfowl diets are similarly varied, with invertebrates forming a large part of their diet only during the breeding season; thus they are also not expected to be impacted.
Mosquito abatement practices cause some temporary disturbances to wildlife.
However, the number of treatment days per year is low, and if the applicator follows the stipulations herein and in the SUP, mosquito abatement practices should not materially interfere with or detract from the refuge purpose or System mission.
Should further biological monitoring of this activity document a substantial prolonged reduction of bird use, direct destruction of shorebird nests, or other deleterious effects, this determination would be reanalyzed on the basis of the new data.
As mentioned in the Stipulations section, the Service is currently developing new national policy regarding mosquito control on refuges.
This compatibility determination will be reviewed once the new policy is finalized.
G-49
Mandatory Reevaluation Date (provide month and year): Mandatory 15-Year Reevaluation Date (for priority public uses) Dec. 2012 Mandatory 10-Year Reevaluation Date (for all uses other than priority public uses)
NEPA Compliance for Refuge Use Decision (check one below): Conducted with Comprehensive Conservation Plan ______Categorical Exclusion without Environmental Action Statement ______Categorical Exclusion and Environmental Action Statement X Environmental Assessment and Finding of No Significant Impact
______Environmental Impact Statement and Record of Decision
G-50
References Cited: Ali, A. 1981.
Bacillus thuringiensis var. israelensis (ABG-6108) against chironomids and some nontarget aquatic invertebrates.
Journal of Invertebrate Pathology 38:264-272.
Baldassarre, G.A. and E.G. Bolen.
1994.
Waterfowl Ecology and Management.
John Wiley and Sons, Inc., New York. pp. 165-197.
Boisvert, M. and J. Boisvert.
2000.
Effects of Bacillus thuringiensis var. israelensis on target and nontarget organisms: a review of laboratory and field experiments.
Biocontrol Science and Technology 10:517-561.
Breaud, T.P., J.E. Farlow, C.D. Steelman, and P.E. Schilling.
1977.
Effects of the insect growth regulator methoprene on natural populations of aquatic organisms in Louisiana intermediate marsh habitats.
Mosquito News 37:704-712.
Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.
1999.
Epidemic/Epizootic West Nile virus in the United States: Guidelines for Surveillance, Prevention, and Control.
From a workshop cosponsored by Department of Health and Human Services, CDC and the U.S. Department of Agriculture.
Held in Fort Collins, Colorado, Nov. 8-9, 1999.
Charbonneau, C.S., R.D. Drobney, and C.F. Rabeni.
1994.
Effects of Bacillus thuringiensis var. israelensis on nontarget benthic organisms in a lentic habitat and factors affecting the efficacy of the larvicide.
Environmental Toxicology and Chemistry 13 Vol. 2:267279.
Hanowski, J. M., G.J. Niemi, A.R. Lima, and R.R. Regal.
1997.
Response of breeding birds to mosquito control treatments of wetlands.
Wetlands 17:485-492.
Hershey, A. E., A.R. Lima, G.J. Niemi, and R.R. Regal.
1998.
Effects of Bacillus thuringiensis israelensis (Bti) and methoprene on nontarget macroinvertebrates in Minnesota wetlands.
Ecological Applications 8:41-60.
John Gilchrist 
1997.
Salinas River Lagoon management and enhancement plan.
Prepared for the Salinas River Lagoon Task Force and the Monterey County Water Resources Agency.
Monterey, California.
Lawler, S.P., D. A. Dritz, and T. Jensen.
2000.
Effects of Sustained-Release Methoprene and a Combined Formulation of Liquid Methoprene and Bacillus thuringiensis israelensis on Insects in Salt Marshes.
Archives of Environmental Contamination and Toxicology 39:177-182.
Lawler, S.P., T. Jensen, D.A. Dritz, and G. Wichterman.
1999.
Field efficacy and nontarget effects of the mosquito larvicides temephos, methoprene, and Bacillus thuringiensis G-51
var. israelensis in Florida mangrove swamps.
Journal of the American Mosquito Control Association 15:446-452.
Merritt, R. W., E.D. Walker, M.A. Wilzbach, K.W. Cummins, and W.T. Morgan.
1989.
A broad evaluation of Bti for black fly (Diptera:Simuliidae) control in a Michigan River: efficacy, carry and nontarget effects on invertebrates and fish.
Journal of the American Mosquito Control Association 5:397-415.
Miura, T. and R.M. Takahashi.
1974.
Insect developmental inhibitors.
Effects of candidate mosquito control agents on nontarget aquatic organisms.
Environmental Entomology 3:631-636.
Miura, T. and R.M. Takahashi.
1973.
Insect developmental inhibitors.
Effects on nontarget organisms.
Journal of Economic Entomology 66:917-922.
Moss Landing Marine Lab. September 2002.
Personal communication - Researcher John Oliver.
Mulla, M. S. and H. A. Darwzeh.
1981.
Efficacy of Petroleum Larvididal Oils and Their Impact on Some Aquatic Nontarget Organisms.
Proceedings of the California Mosquito and Vector Control Association 49:84-87 Mulla, M.S., G. Majori, and A.A. Arata.
1979.
Impact of biological and chemical mosquito control agents on nontarget biota in aquatic ecosystems.
Residue Reviews 71:121-173.
Niemi, G.J., A.E. Hershey, L. Shannon, J.M. Hanowski, A. Lima, R.P. Axler, and R.R. Regal.
1999.
Environmental Toxicology and Chemistry 18:549-559.
Norland, R.L. and M.S. Mulla.
1975.
Impact of Altosid on selected members of an aquatic ecosystem.
Environmental Entomology 4:145-152.
Northern Salinas Valley Mosquito Abatement District.
September 2002.
Personal communication - Manager/Zoologist Peter Ghormley.
R 
September 2002.
Personal communication - Pilot Shelton Brown.
Su, T. and Mulla, M.S. 1999.
Microbial agents Bacillus thuringiensis ssp. israelensis and Bacillus sphaericus suppress eutrophication, enhance water quality, and control mosquitos in microcosms.
Environmental Entomology 28:761-767.
U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service (USFWS).
2002.
Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge Final Comprehensive Conservation Plan, December 2002.
U. S. Fish and Wildlife Service, Portland, Oregon.
G-52
U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service (USFWS).
2002b.
Biological Opinion for the Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge Comprehensive Conservation Plan (1-8-01-FW-66).
U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service, Ventura, California.
U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service (USFWS).
2001.
Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge Draft Comprehensive Conservation Plan and Environmental Assessment, August 2001.
U. S. Fish and Wildlife Service, Portland, Oregon.
U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service 1998.
Nontarget effects of the mosquito larvicides, temephos and methoprene, at Bombay Hook and Prime Hook National Wildlife Refuges.
Unpublished Manuscript.
Annapolis, Maryland.
U.S. Geological Survey 2001.
Experimental Assessment of the toxicity of the mosquito larvicide Golden Bear Oil (GB-1111).
Unpublished Report.
Davis, California.
Ware, G.W. 1989.
The pesticide book, 3rd edition.
Thomas Publications, Fresno, Calif.
G-53
Appendix H. Salinas River NWR Avian Predator Management Plan
Blank page
SALINAS RIVER NATIONAL WILDLIFE REFUGE AVIAN PREDATOR MANAGEMENT PLAN I. OVERVIEW In conjunction with its existing mammalian predator management program and other wildlife and habitat management programs, the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service proposes to implement an avian predator management program at the Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge (hereafter, Refuge).
The goal of the program is to increase the production of the Refuge's population of western snowy plovers (Charadrius alexandrinus nivosus, federally listed as threatened) by selectively removing problem avian predators that pose a threat to western snowy plover adults, chicks, or eggs.
Removal will be accomplished by live trapping and translocation or, in rare cases, lethal control.
Likely target predators include northern harriers (Circus cyaneus), American kestrels (Falco sparverius), loggerhead shrikes (Lanius ludovicianus), common ravens (Corvus corax) and American crows (Corvus brachyrhynchos).
II.
PURPOSE The avian predator management program is intended to accomplish the following.
· · · Maintain a 5-year average population of 35­40 breeding western snowy plover adults on the Refuge.
Maintain a 5-year average productivity of at least 1.0 fledged chick per male.
Reduce the number of problem avian predators in localized areas.
Problem predators are defined as individuals that belong to species known to prey on western snowy plovers and are exhibiting hunting behavior in western snowy plover nesting areas.
The program was developed to support the Refuge's management objective of recovering and maintaining a stable snowy plover population; the numerical targets reflect the best available data on the numbers of individuals necessary for a self-sustaining western snowy plover population.
The avian predator management program was designed to operate in concert with existing management efforts, including the Monterey Integrated Predator Management Program.
III.
BACKGROUND AND DESCRIPTION OF PROBLEM The Pacific coast population of the western snowy plover (hereafter, snowy plover) breeds primarily on coastal beaches over a range that extends from southern Washington to southern Baja California.
In 1993, the species was listed as threatened under the federal Endangered Species Act throughout this range.
Threats to the snowy plover include increasing habitat loss, predation, and human disturbance of nesting grounds.
H-1
Significant loss of breeding habitat in southern California has made the state's remaining breeding areas crucial to maintaining a stable snowy plover population.
The Monterey Bay region of California's central coast is particularly important, and the Refuge currently supports one of the state's most productive breeding populations of snowy plovers.
IV.
EXISTING PREDATOR MANAGEMENT EFFORTS IN THE MONTEREY BAY AREA The Point Reyes Bird Observatory (PRBO) has monitored the breeding success of snowy plovers throughout the Monterey Bay area since 1984.
PRBO bands chicks and conducts a monitoring program that results in yearly estimates of · · · · breeding population size, number of nesting attempts, nesting success rate, and fledging success rate.
These studies make it possible to assess the status of the population, quantify impacts such as predation, and evaluate the success of various management programs.
Information gathered by PRBO has been instrumental in the development of cooperative snowy plover management strategies involving various land management agencies in the Monterey Bay area, including the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service (Service), the California Department of Parks and Recreation1 (CDPR), and the California Department of Fish and Game2 (CDFG).
The Monterey Integrated Predator Management Program was initiated in 1993 by the Service, CDPR, and CDFG, in response to low snowy plover reproductive success rates.
It integrates a variety of techniques, including: · · removal of mammalian predators, primarily non-native red foxes (Vulpes vulpes), feral cats (Felis catus), and skunks (Mephitis mephitis); installation of nest exclosures and symbolic fencing (cable and post structures used to keep humans out of nesting areas); temporary closure of sensitive beach areas; and posting of informational signs.
· ·
The program has been very successful in increasing snowy plover hatch rates.
Snowy 1
California Department of Parks and Recreation has management responsibility for the area's State California Department of Fish and Game manages the Moss Landing Wildlife Area.
Beaches.
2
H-2
plover hatch rates were high in 1999, 2000, and 2001; the 2000 hatch rate of 86% was the highest recorded since monitoring began in 1984.
In addition, it was possible to use fewer exclosures around snowy plover nests in the Monterey Bay area in 2000 and 2001 than in the previous eight years because of the success of the mammalian predator management program.
It is desirable to minimize the use of nest exclosures because avian predators learn to recognize them and use them as perches from which to prey on snowy plover chicks and adults; fledge rates decrease and adult loss increases when nests are exclosed.
Although recent hatch rates have been high and mammalian predation of snowy plovers appears to have decreased, in the late 1990's PRBO observed an increase in avian predation of snowy plover chicks in the Monterey Bay area, resulting in decreased fledge rates.
In 1998, PRBO staff found 12 plover chick bands in a kestrel nest box adjacent to the Moss Landing Wildlife Area; PRBO has documented shrike, harrier, and kestrel predation on snowy plover chicks.
Several incidents of avian predation on adult snowy plovers have also been recorded.
Finally, PRBO has documented a positive correlation between sightings of avian predators and chick loss at study sites.
Although there have not yet been documented instances of crow or raven (corvids) predation of snowy plover nests on the Refuge, in the last few years PRBO has observed that the range of the raven in Monterey Bay has expanded to include coastal beach areas.
Ravens have been documented preying on snowy plover nests in northern Santa Cruz County, Point Reyes National Seashore, San Francisco Bay, coastal Sonoma County, San Diego County, Mono Lake, Humboldt County and Coos Bay Oregon (CDFG 2001; USFWS 2001).
Crows have been documented preying on snowy plover nests at Vandenberg Air Force Base, Atascadero Beach in San Luis Obispo County, and along the Oregon Coast (CDFG 2001; USFWS 2001).
Therefore, there is a strong possibility that ravens and/or crows could become problem predators at the Refuge sometime in the future.
V. RELEVANCE TO REFUGE PURPOSE AND GOALS The Refuge was established in 1974 for its "particular value in carrying out the national migratory bird management program," and one of the Refuge's three stated goals is to protect and enhance endangered species populations and their habitats.
Snowy plovers have benefitted by management of mammalian predators since 1993, but monitoring results suggest that management of selected avian predators is also necessary to protect and maintain the snowy plover breeding population.
Thus, the new plan has direct bearing on the Refuge's ability to fulfill its purpose and goals.
VI. COOPERATORS This plan will be implemented in cooperation with the following agencies and organizations.
H-3
· · · · · · ·
Point Reyes Bird Observatory (PRBO) Santa Cruz Predatory Bird Research Group (SCPBRG) California Department of Fish and Game (CDFG) California Department of Parks and Recreation (CDPR) U.S. Department of Agriculture ­ Wildlife Services (USDA ­ WS) U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service, Ventura Field Office (USFWS) U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service, San Francisco Bay NWR Complex (USFWS) VII.
EXPERIMENTAL AVIAN PREDATOR MANAGEMENT STUDY
Because of decreased snowy plover fledge rates and continued adult loss believed to be primarily the result of avian predation, the Service and the Santa Cruz Predatory Bird Research Group, in cooperation with CDFG, CDPR, and PRBO, implemented a small-scale 3-year experimental avian predator relocation study at the Refuge and the Moss Landing Wildlife Area in 1999.
The purpose of the study was to document the effects of avian predators on snowy plovers and to assess the efficacy of translocating avian predators.
The pilot year of the study (1999) provided initial data on the effects of avian predators on snowy plover reproductive success.
A pair of northern harriers was removed from the Moss Landing Wildlife Area early in the 1999 breeding season, and plover fledging success during the first portion of the breeding season was 72%.
However, a second pair of harriers nesting on private property approximately 3 miles away was not trapped, and fledge rates of plovers at the Wildlife Area decreased to 32% after heavy visitation by the second pair of harriers.
A pair of harriers is also believed to have contributed significantly to the reproductive failure of snowy plovers at the Refuge in 1999.
Though hatch rates were high, not a single chick fledged at the Refuge in 1999.
During the period when the harrier pair were seen hunting at the Refuge, significant snowy plover chick loss was documented.
The harrier pair could not be trapped in time to prevent chick losses.
The second year of the study (2000) saw improved protocols and increased funding, contributing to quicker and more efficient predator translocation and an overall increase in effectiveness.
In addition, during the second study year, Zmudowski State Beach was included in the experiment based on evidence that shrikes were contributing to the low snowy plover fledge rates documented at this site (14% in 1999).
Fledge rates were relatively high at all three Monterey Bay area study sites in 2000.
At the Refuge, where three female harriers were translocated, the fledge rate increased from a 1997­1999 average of 14% to a value of 28% in 2000.
A male harrier remained at the Refuge the entire season and could not be trapped, but removal of the females prevented harrier nesting and the consequent increase in food demands.
At Zmudowski State Beach, where three shrikes were translocated, the fledge rate increased from a 1997­1999 average of 29% to a value of 57% in 2000, the highest fledge rate recorded there since 1984.
At the Moss Landing Wildlife Area, where five harriers were translocated, the 2000 fledge rate was 42%.
This is similar to the 1997­1999 average of 49%.
Fledge rates at the Wildlife Area probably would have been higher, but two harriers arrived in the area in July.
Because it was late in the season, cooperators initially felt that trapping was unnecessary.
However, at least one of the late-arriving harriers was documented preying on snowy plover H-4
chicks, and fledge rates decreased.
Both late-arriving harriers were eventually trapped and relocated.
In 2001, one male harrier was trapped at the Refuge in May.
Intermittent female harriers were sighted in April and throughout July but they either left or were not determined to be problem birds.
This was the first year at the Refuge that problem predator(s) were able to be captured immediately, and the fledge rate was the highest recorded at 57%.
At the Moss Landing Wildlife Area, an early female harrier left on her own.
A nesting pair of harriers were allowed to remain because they were not determined to be problem predators.
A second nesting pair was later found; the female was trapped and translocated but the male evaded trapping attempts and subsequently left the area.
With no problem harriers remaining at the Wildlife Area, overall fledge success was also very high at 59%.
Finally, at Zmudowski no shrikes nested and no birds had to be removed.
Fledging success was an all-time record of 70%.
At all three sites, snowy plover productivity reached record levels in the 2001 season and avian predator management was successful and timely.
During the three year study, cooperators learned a lot about the behavior of avian predators and the effectiveness of trapping devices and techniques.
The experimental study also provided information on the effectiveness of translocation.
Two harriers were equipped with radio transmitters in 1999 and were periodically checked for several months after their release.
They survived and stayed in the general area of release.
In addition, all translocated birds were banded in the three study years, so it was possible to determine that no birds returned to the capture area within the same season.
And only one bird of the 14 total captures in 1999 and 2000 returned on subsequent years.
This male harrier was originally trapped near the Moss Landing Wildlife Area and translocated in 1999.
It was recaptured in 2000 in the same area., fitted with a radio transmitter and translocated again in 2000 to the Sutter Buttes, north of Sacramento.
Once again, it returned to the same area near the Moss Landing Wildlife Area in 2001.
Although this is the only bird that has returned from its translocation site, it may become necessary to adjust translocation distances in the future.
Based on analysis of the results of the 3-year experimental study, the Service and its cooperators concluded that avian predation is adversely affecting snowy plover reproductive success at the three study sites, and that trapping and translocation of problem avian predators is an effective strategy for reducing predation-related mortality and increasing fledge rates.
VIII.
MANAGEMENT PLAN Avian predator management may occur year-round but will be concentrated immediately prior to and during the snowy plover breeding season (March­September).
Management strategies included in this plan will be implemented within the Refuge, or, with the consent of the appropriate agency or landowner, on adjacent public or private properties.
Under the avian predator management plan, the Refuge and its cooperators will continue to monitor snowy plovers to determine hatch and fledge rates as well as adult survivorship and population size.
In addition, avian predators on the Refuge and adjacent lands will be H-5
monitored; information recorded will include species observed and their behavior and habits.
If an individual noncorvid predator is evaluated as posing a threat to snowy plovers at the Refuge, it will be trapped, banded, and relocated.
The determination that relocation is necessary will be made by Refuge staff in consultation with PRBO biologists and monitors; CDFG and CDPR staff will be responsible for monitoring and managing avian predators on their respective lands, in cooperation with PRBO.
Trapped birds will be removed from the wild and held in a licensed and permitted rehabilitation/holding facility until they can be relocated and released in the wild.
All translocated birds will be released in an area with suitable habitat at a distance from which they would not be expected to return (generally, more than 150 miles away).
Release distances may be adjusted in the future based on documented return rates of translocated birds.
All releases will be carried out with the permission of the landowner or land management agency.
Only licensed and authorized agencies or individuals will implement predator management actions; all activities will be conducted in a humane manner, under the direction of the Refuge manager and in close coordination with PRBO.
Management actions will be carried out by the Santa Cruz Predatory Bird Research Group, USDA Wildlife Services, or other such qualified agencies or individuals.
Refuge personnel and their cooperators may assist with capture efforts.
Non-lethal techniques will be used whenever possible for noncorvids.
A combination of live-trapping techniques will be used, including bal-chatri traps, dho gaza nets, bow nets, net launchers with bait, and lures.
Knowledge of the avian predator's habits will determine which trapping technique to employ.
Hazing or lethal control will only be used on extremely rare occasions when it is demonstrably necessary, for example, when repeated trapping attempts have failed and there is an immediate threat to snowy plover chicks.
The decision to lethally remove an avian predator will be determined on a case-by-case basis, and will be based on the degree of threat, the breeding phase of the snowy plovers, professional judgment of the situation, and knowledge regarding the species involved.
Lethal methods may include euthanasia and shooting, and will be implemented as humanely and selectively as possible.
Shooting will be conducted only by government personnel trained and certified in firearm safety.
In order to avoid human safety hazards, shooting will take place only when members of the public are not in the area.
If a problem raven or crow is found on the Refuge, it would likely be controlled lethally.
The ability of crows and ravens to adapt and thrive in human-altered landscapes, both rural and urban/suburban, has led to dramatic increases in range and population sizes in western North America, including California (CDFG 2001; Johnston, 2001; Marzluff et al, 2001; USFWS 2001).
Because they are effective predators on the nests and young of some threatened and endangered species, including snowy plovers, there is concern among management agencies that increases in corvid populations are having a negative impact on populations of some listed species (CDFG 2001).
Translocation of corvids to other areas may negatively impact wildlife or agriculture in those areas.
In some areas, ravens have been termed a "pest" and are causing economic damage as well as harming native wildlife (CDFG 2001).
Farmers and ranchers are H-6
able to obtain depredation permits to kill corvids that are feeding on crops or cattle feed (CDFG 2001).
In addition, the small number of individual corvids that would potentially be taken by this project each year would not impact their overall populations.
Selective control of problem mammalian predators will continue as described in the Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge Predator Management Plan and Final Environmental Assessment (U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service 1993).
The Refuge and its cooperators will continue to explore avian predator management alternatives that will protect the snowy plover while minimizing disturbance to avian predators.
There is particular interest in developing management techniques that would permit problem predators to remain on the Refuge but would prevent them from hunting in snowy plover nesting areas.
For example, cooperators have expressed interest in conducting research to develop new types of radio collars and transmitters that would send a loud sound and/or vibration to the predator when it enters plover nesting habitat.
Additional measures to discourage avian predator use of snowy plover breeding areas will include continuing to attach metal spikes to signs on the refuge and removing two abandoned posts on the Refuge which serve as perching sites.
IX. ALTERNATIVES CONSIDERED In addition to the management strategy described above, the Refuge and its cooperators considered several alternatives for avian predator management, including: 1) 2) 3) 4) no action, visual/auditory repellents, lethal control only, and use of physical barriers.
Cooperators agreed that the proposed management plan represents the most effective, most humane, and least disruptive alternative.
If no action is taken, snowy plover fledge rates are expected to be too low to sustain the Refuge population; ultimately, snowy plovers may stop breeding on the Refuge, or the Refuge may act as a population "sink."
Repellents, either visual repellents such as kites, flagging and streamers or auditory repellents such as cannons, shotguns, or other sonic devices were determined to be too disruptive to non-target wildlife.
In addition, they are often effective for only short time periods until animals become accustomed to them (CDFG 2001).
Lethal control only, while efficient and effective, was rejected for non-corvids because of its impact on the individual avian predators; cooperators judged it to be a less desirable option.
For problem corvids, however, lethal control would likely be used.
Raven and crow populations have increased substantially in the past 50 years along with agriculture and human habitation (CDFG 2001), and impacts to their overall population would be negligible.
Finally, physical barriers (such as exclosures around snowy plover nests) have been used for a number of years at the Refuge and elsewhere throughout the snowy plover breeding range.
While they are effective at reducing mammalian and corvid predation on eggs, they are H-7
ineffective against chick and adult predators.
Once chicks leave the exclosure, they are vulnerable to avian predation.
In addition, adult snowy plovers in exclosed nests have been shown to be more vulnerable to loss than adults in unexclosed nests.
Avian predators in the Refuge area as well as other parts of California have learned to target exclosures and wait until an adult or chick emerges (CDFG 2001).
X. JUSTIFICATION The predator management program will result in small, localized reductions in populations of some native avian predator species around the Refuge.
In most years, an estimated 2­6 birds or fewer will be affected, and impacts on individual birds will be minimized by the use of humane and selective techniques.
Nonlethal methods will be used almost exclusively.
Avian predators will be trapped and released into suitable habitat elsewhere.
Populations of avian predators using grassland and riparian habitats will not be affected.
The program proposes to remove only avian predators using the beach or salt pan areas, where snowy plovers nest.
Without effective predator management, large losses of chicks and adults of the western snowy plover will continue to threaten the recovery of this listed species.
With predator management, including avian predator management, the Refuge snowy plover population is expected, at a minimum, to sustain its current size of approximately 35 breeding adults, and ideally, to increase to 40 breeding adults.
Snowy plover reproductive success is expected to increase to 1.0 fledglings per male per year.
H-8
REFERENCES California Department of Fish and Game.
2001.
Draft Summary of Predation by Corvids on Threatened and Endangered Species in California and Management Recommendations to Reduce Corvid Predation.
Sacramento, California.
103 pp. Johnston, R. F. 2001.
Synanthropic birds of North America, p. 49-67.
In J. M. Marzluff, R. Bowman, and R. Donnelly [eds.], Avian ecology and conservation in an urbanizing world.
Kluwer Academic, Norwell, MA. Marzluff, J. M., K. J. McGowan, R. Donnelly, and R. L. Knight.
2001.
Causes and consequences of expanding American Crow populations, p. 331-363.
In J. M. Marzluff, R. Bowman, and R. Donnelly [eds.], Avian ecology and conservation in an urbanizing world.
Kluwer Academic, Norwell, MA. U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service.
2001.
Western Snowy Plover (Chardrius alexandrinus nivosus) Pacific Coast Population Draft Recovery Plan.
Portland, Oregon.
630 pp.
H-9
Appendix I. Salinas River NWR Wildland Fire Management Plan
SALINAS RIVER NATIONAL WILDLIFE REFUGE WILDLAND FIRE MANAGEMENT PLAN
2002
TABLE OF CONTENTS
EXECUTIVE SUMMARY . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
I-1 INTRODUCTION . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
I-3 COMPLIANCE WITH USFWS POLICY . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
I-4 FIRE MANAGEMENT OBJECTIVES . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
I-6 DESCRIPTION OF REFUGE .
Cultural Resources . . .
Fish and Wildlife . . . . .
Vegetation . . . . . . . . . .
Structures and Facilities . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
I-6 .
I-6 .
I-6 I-1 0 I-1 2 I-1 3 I-1 3 I-1 3 I-1 3 I-1 3 I-1 3 I-1 3 I-1 4 I-1 4 I-1 4 I-1 4 I-1 5 I-1 5 I-1 6 I-1 6 I-1 6 I-1 7 I-2 I-2 I-2 I-2 I-2 I-2 I-2 I-2 I-2 I-2 0 0 1 1 2 2 2 3 3 3
WILDLAND FIRE MANAGEMENT SITUATION . . .
Historic Role of Fire . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Pre-settlement Fires . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Post-settlement Fire History . . . . . . . . . .
Prescribed Fire History . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Responsibilities . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Agency Administrator/ Project Leader (P Deputy Project Leader (DPL) . . . . . . . .
Refuge Manager (RM) ......
Biologist . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Zone Fire Management Officer (FMO) .
Prescribed Fire Specialist (PFS) . . . . . .
Fire Management/Suppression Personnel Incident Commander . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Initial Attack Teams . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Interagency Operations . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Protection of Sensitive Resources . . . . . . . . . . . .
WILDLAND FIRE ACTIVITIES . . . . . .
Fire Management Strategies . . . .
Preparedness . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Historical Weather Analy Fire Prevention . . . . . . . .
Staffing Priority Levels .
Training . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Supplies and Equipment Detection . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Communications . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . si . . . . . . . . . s . . . . . .
....
....
.... ... ....
....
....
....
....
.... . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
..
..
..
..
..
..
L) ..
..
..
..
.. .
..
..
..
.. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
I-i
Pre-Attack Plan . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Fire Management Units . . . . . . . . .
Vegetation Type . . . . . . . .
Fuel Types . . . . . . . . . . . .
Suppression Tactics . . . . . . . . . . .
Suppression Conditions . .
Wildland Fire Situation An Aircraft Operations . . . . .
Rehabilitation and Restoration . . .
Required Reporting . . . . . . . . . . . .
Fire Investigation . . . . . . . . . . . . .
....
....
....
....
....
.... alysi ....
....
....
....
.. .
..
..
..
..
..
..
..
.. . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . s . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
I-2 I-2 I-2 I-2 I-2 I-2 I-2 I-2 I-2 I-2 I-2 I-2 I-2 I-2 I-2 I-2 I-2 I-2 I-3 I-3 I-3
3 4 4 4 4 5 5 5 5 6 6 7 7 7 8 8 8 9 0 1 1
PRESCRIBED FIRE ACTIVITIES . . . . . . .
Prescribed Burn Program Objectives Fire Management Strategies . . . . . .
Prescribed Fire Planning . . . . . . . . .
Annual Activities . . . . . . . .
Prescribed Burn Plan . . . . .
Strategies and Personnel . .
Monitoring and Evaluation Required Reports . . . . . . . .
Prescribed Burn Critique . .
AIR QUALITY / SMOKE MANAGEMENT GUIDELINES . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
I-32 FIRE RESEARCH . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
I-32 PUBLIC SAFETY . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
I-33 PUBLIC INFORMATION AND EDUCATION . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
I-34 FIRE CRITIQUES AND ANNUAL PLAN REVIEW Fire Critiques . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Annual Fire Summary Report . . . . . . . . . . . .
Annual Fire Management Plan Review . . . . ... ....
....
.... . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
I-3 I-3 I-3 I-3 5 5 5 5
CONSULTATION AND COORDINATION . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
I-36 Appendices . . . . .
Appendix Appendix Appendix Appendix Appendix Appendix ..
A: B: C: D: E: F: .................................
References Cited . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Definitions . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Special Status Species on the Refuge . .
Fire Dispatch Plan/ Contact List . . . . .
Delegation of Authority . . . . . . . . . . . .
Notification List for Prescribed Burning . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
I-3 7 I-3 7 I-3 8 I-4 1 I-4 5 I-4 7 I-4 9
I-ii
Appendix G: Cultural Resource Compliance . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
I-50 Appendix H: Sample WFSA . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
I-51 Appendix I: Sample Burn Plan . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
I-57
LIST
OF
FIGURES
Figure 1: Vegetation . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
I-7 Figure 2: Heavy equipment use areas . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
I-18
I-iii
I-iv
EXECUTIVE SUMMARY When approved, this document will become the Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge fire management plan.
Major components include: B updated policy for prescribed fires at Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge, B reference to and inclusion within the Refuge's 2001 Comprehensive Conservation Plan, B format changes under the direction of Fire Management Handbook (Release Date 6/1/00), and B establishes a Prescribed Fire Program for management of sensitive habitat and reduction of hazardous fuels.
This plan is written to provide guidelines for appropriate suppression and prescribed fire programs at Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge.
Prescribed fires may be used to reduce hazard fuels, restore the natural processes and vitality of ecosystems, improve wildlife habitat, remove or reduce non-native species, and/or conduct ecological research.
I-1
I-2
INTRODUCTION Salinas River National Wildlife Refuge (Refuge) is a valuable natural resource supporting a diversity of habitats and a great variety of aquatic and terrestrial biological resources.
The Refuge provides important habitat to many endangered and threatened species as well as species that are candidates for federal listing.
Historically, many factors have contributed to the decline of endangered, threatened and rare species present in the Refuge, including historic loss of habitat, human disturbance, exotic vegetation encroachment, and increased predation.
The history of fire at the Refuge including fire regimes is not documented or well known.
The primary purpose for which the 367-acre Refuge was established in 1973 was for its "particular value in carrying out the national migratory bird management program."
It was acquired by the Service through a transfer of surplus military land from the U.S. Army and U.S. Coast Guard.
From 1974 through 1991, the area was operated as a Wildlife Management Area under a cooperative agreement with the California Department of Fish and Game.
By the mid-1980's, the growing importance of the Refuge to sensitive species prompted the need for more active management and protection of its resources.
In 1991, the Fish and Wildlife Service began managing the area as a National Wildlife Refuge under the National Wildlife Refuge System Administration Act and the Refuge Recreation Act of 1962.
Management emphasis is on threatened and endangered species and sensitive migratory birds.
The Fire Management Plan (FMP) for the Refuge is written as an operational guide for managing the Refuge's wildland fire and prescribed fire programs.
It defines levels of protection needed to ensure safety, protect facilities and resources, and restore and perpetuate natural processes, given the current understanding of the complex relationships in natural ecosystems.
It is written to comply with a servicewide requirement that refuges with burnable vegetation develop a fire management plan (620 DM 1).
The FMP will be used to help achieve resource objectives of managing unplanned fire and using prescribed fire to control non-native vegetation and restore native upland grassland habitat.
The Department of the Interior policy requires that all refuges with vegetation that can sustain fire must have a Fire Management Plan that details fire management policies, the use of prescribed fire for attaining resource management objectives, and fire program operational procedures.
This plan is evaluated under NEPA in chapter five of the Draft Comprehensive Conservation Plan/Environmental Assessment.
The FMP outlines procedures for wildland suppression and prescribed fires.
The fire plan furthers the mission of the Refuge by providing increased protection for Refuge resources and by establishing the framework for a prescribed fire program designed to enhance and maintain native grassland habitat on the Refuge.
Increasing coordination and preparedness will help ensure quick response for suppression of fires which have the potential to be devastating to Refuge resources.
There is no dedicated fire staff at Salinas River NWR or San Francisco Bay NWRC.
All wildland fires will be suppressed by local cooperating agencies with the oversight of the Project Leader and Zone Fire Management Officer (FMO).
All prescribed fires will be coordinated through the Zone FMO.
I-3
COMPLIANCE WITH USFWS POLICY The Refuge was established in 1973 by authority of 16 U.S.C. subsection 667b (An Act Authorizing the Transfer of Certain Real Property for Wildlife, or other purposes, 16 U.S.C. subsection 667b-667d, as amended) for wildlife conservation purposes and, in particular, for "carrying out the national migratory bird management program."
Values to be considered in the FMP include: protection of Refuge property and historical sites, protection of neighboring private properties, protection of endangered/threatened/and rare species, and enhancement and protection of Refuge habitats.
There are currently 40 special status species known or believed to use habitat at the Refuge (Appendix C).
Endangered species include the Smith's blue butterfly (Euphilotes enoptes smithi), California brown pelican (Pelecanus occidentalis), and the Monterey gilia (Gilia tenuiflora ssp. arenaria); threatened species include the Western snowy plover (Charadrius alexandrinus nivosus) and Monterey spineflower (Chorizanthe pungens var. pungens).
This Fire Management Plan has been completed in conjunction with the Refuge's 2001 Comprehensive Conservation Plan (CCP).
The following goals for Salinas River NWR were developed by Refuge staff and are outlined in the CCP.
These goals further define the purpose and direction of the Refuge.
· Protect, restore, and enhance populations of migratory birds and other native species and their habitats.
· Protect and enhance populations of endangered, threatened, and rare species, and promote their recovery by restoring and enhancing their natural habitats.
· Provide opportunities for safe, unique, wildlife-dependent recreation when compatible with other Refuge goals.
Several operational plans are used by the Refuge to meet these objectives.
These include the CCP, recovery plan for the endangered Smith's blue butterfly, recovery plan for coastal plants which includes the Monterey spineflower and Monterey (sand) gilia, predator management plan, hunt plan, and internal Section 7 endangered species consultations.
The FMP is a detailed program of action to implement fire management policies and objectives, and addresses policy on prescribed burning to control non-native vegetation and restore native grassland habitat.
The FMP meets the objectives of the Refuge's operational plans by supporting strategies which rely upon fire as a management tool and by identifying where and when fire should be applied.
The Department Manual, DM 910 (USDI 1997) states the following regarding wildland fires: "Wildfires may result in loss of life, have detrimental impacts upon natural resources, and damage to or destruction of man-made developments.
However, the use of fire under carefully defined conditions is to be a valuable tool in wildland management.
Therefore, all wildfires within the Department will be classified either as wildfire or as prescribed fires.
Wildfires, whether on lands administered by the Department or adjacent thereto, which threaten life, man-made structures, or are determined to be a threat to the natural resources or the facilities under the Department's jurisdiction, will be considered emergencies and their suppression given priority over normal Departmental programs.
I-4
Bureaus will give the highest priority to preventing the disaster fire - the situation in which a wildfire causes damage of such magnitude as to impact management objectives and/or socioeconomic conditions of an area.
However, no wildfire situation, with the possible exception of threat to human survival, requires the exposure of firefighters to life threatening situations.
Within the framework of management objective and plans, overall wildfire damage will be held to the minimum possible giving full consideration to (1) an aggressive fire prevention program; (2) the least expenditure of public funds for effective suppression; (3) the methods of suppression least damaging to resources and the environment; and (4) the integration of cooperative suppression actions by agencies of the Department among themselves or with other qualified suppression organizations.
Prescribed fires...may be used to achieve agency land or resource management objectives as defined in the fire management plans....Prescribed fires will be conducted only when the following conditions are met: a.
Conducted by qualified personnel under written prescriptions.
b. Monitored to assure they remain within prescription.
Prescribed fires that exceed the limits of an approved prescribed fire plan will be reclassified as a wildfire.
Once classified a wildfire, the fire will be suppressed and will not be returned to prescribed fire status."
The authority for funding (normal fire year programming) and all emergency fire accounts is found in the following authorities: Section 102 of the General Provisions of the Department of Interior's annual Appropriations Bill provides the authority under which appropriated monies can be expended or transferred to fund expenditures arising from the emergency prevention and suppression of wildland fire.
P.L. 101-121, Department of the Interior and Related Agencies Appropriation Act of 1990, established the funding mechanism for normal year expenditures of funds for fire management purposes.
31 US Code 665(E)(1)(B) provides the authority to exceed appropriations due to wildland fire management activities involving the safety of human life and protection of property.
Authorities for procurement and administrative activities necessary to support wildland fire suppression missions are contained in the Interagency Fire Business Management Handbook.
The Reciprocal Fire Protection Act of May 27, 1955 (42 USC 815a; 69Stat 66) provides Authorities to enter into agreements with other Federal bureaus and agencies; with state, county, and municipal governments; and with private companies, groups, corporations, and individuals regarding fire activities.
Authority for interagency agreements is found in AInteragency Agreement between the Bureau of Land Management, Bureau of Indian Affairs, National Park Service, US Fish and Wildlife Service of the United States Department of the Interior and the Forest Service of the United States Department of Agriculture@ (1996).
I-5
FIRE MANAGEMENT OBJECTIVES General Fire Management Objectives for this Refuge are: 1.
Protect life and resources/property.
2. Use prescribed fire as a tool to accomplish Refuge habitat management objectives.
Specific Refuge Fire Management Objectives include: 1.
Safely suppress all wildland fires using strategies and tactics appropriate to safety considerations and values at risk.
2.
Minimize the impact and cost of fire suppression actions.
3.
Prevent human-caused wildland fires.
4.
Educate the public regarding the role of fire within the Refuge.
5. Use prescribed fire to reduce abundance and limit the spread of non-native plant species and enhance habitats for other species.
DESCRIPTION OF REFUGE Salinas River NWR is located 11 miles northeast of the City of Monterey at the confluence of the Salinas River and Monterey Bay.
The entire Refuge is located within Monterey County.
The area is composed of one unit totaling 367 acres (Figure 1).
The western boundary ends at the mean high water line of Monterey Bay, with the tidal lands reserved by the State Lands Commission.
The northeast boundary lies in the Salinas River channel.
The Refuge is bordered to the east and south by private lands, comprised of agricultural fields and coastal sand dunes.
The Salinas River and Salinas River State Beach border the Refuge to the north.
The Monterey Bay area has a moderate maritime climate, with warm to hot, dry summers and moist, mild winters.
July and August are virtually without rainfall while January and February are usually the wettest months.
The amount of rainfall varies not only year to year but also on opposite ends of the Bay.
Monterey averages about 15 inches (38 cm) annually while Santa Cruz receives an average of 28 inches (69 cm) (Monterey Bay National Marine Sanctuary Draft EIS, 1990).
CULTURAL RESOURCES Under Federal ownership, archaeological and historical resources within the Refuge receive protection under Federal laws mandating the management of cultural resources, including, but not limited to, the Archaeological Resources Protection Act; the Archaeological and Historical Preservation Act; the Native American Graves and Repatriation Act, and the National Historic Preservation Act of 1966.
To date, there are WWII concrete remnants from the foundation of three buildings of the "old U.S. Coast Guard LORAN structure" and a one room above ground concrete bomb shelter (U.S. Army Corps of Engineers, 1999).
The Refuge's CCP includes an in depth review of the cultural setting, as well as a strategy to conduct a formal Refuge-wide cultural resource survey.
FISH AND WILDLIFE Despite its small size, the Refuge is an important wildlife area in central coastal California (Habitat Restoration Group 1991).
This is due to the lack of available wetland habitat elsewhere on the central
I-6
Figure 1: Vegetation
I-7
coast as well as the unique wildlife, diversity of habitats, and many significant biological resources the Refuge supports.
The diverse habitats within the Refuge include: ocean beach, saline pond, riparian, sand dunes (includes foredunes and coastal scrub dunes), salt marsh, grassland, coastal river lagoon, and formerly farmed upland.
Wildlife of dune and beach habitats are able to live under harsh conditions.
They survive with little or no fresh water, limited cover and forage.
Three federally listed species are reported to occur in these areas of the Refuge: Smith's blue butterfly, western snowy plover, and California brown pelican.
Other specialstatus species found in this habitat include globuse dune beetle (Coelus globosus), black legless lizard (Anniella pulcha nigra), American white pelican (Pelecanus erythrorhynchos), merlin (Falco columbarius), peregrine falcon, long-billed curlew (Numenius americanus), California gull (Larus californicus), elegant tern (Sterna elegans), and Caspian tern (Sterna elegans) (Appendix C).
There are also a variety of non-status species present including: western fence lizard (Sceloporus occidentalis), gopher snake (Pituophis melanoleucus), deer mouse (Peromyscus maniculatis), gray fox (Urocyon cinereoargenteus), red fox (Vulpes fulva), and longtail weasel (Mustela frenata).
The Salinas River Lagoon contains both fresh and salt water aquatic species.
Native freshwater fish include: Sacramento blackfish (Orthodon microlepidotus), Sacramento sucker (Catostomus occidentalis), Sacramento squawfish (Ptychocheilus grandis), California roach (Lavinia exilicauda), threespine stickleback (Gasterosteus aculeatus) and the federally threatened steelhead/rainbow trout (Oncorhynchus mykiss).
Introduced freshwater fish include: carp (Cyprinus carpo), white bass (Morone chrysops), bluegill (Lepomis macrochirus), green sunfish (Lepomis cyanellus), mosquitofish (Gambosia affinis), and threadfin shad (Dorosoma petenense).
Saltwater fish found year round at the Refuge include: starry flounder (Platichthyes stellatus) and staghorn sculpin (Leptocottus armatus).
Some of the saltwater fish that can be found in the Lagoon include: Pacific herring (Clupia harengus), topsmelt (Atherinops affinis), northern anchovy (Engralis mordax), and at least 5 species of surfperch.
(Refer to Chapter 4, Salinas River NWR CCP for a more complete list of species).
The upland areas contain grassland, coyote brush scrub, and previously farmed habitats and are used by a variety of wildlife.
Reptiles present in these habitats include the western skink (Eumeces skiltonianus), racer (Coluber constrictor), gopher snake, common king snake (Lampropeltis getulus), and western terrestrial garter snake (Thamnophis elegans).
Typical upland mammals include gray and red fox, longtail weasel, western harvest mouse (Reithrodontomys megalotis), black-tailed jackrabbit (Lepus californicus), deer mouse, and California ground squirrel (Spermophylis beecheyi).
Songbirds and raptors forage in this habitat.
Special status species include: white-tailed kite (Elanus leucurus), northern harrier (Circus cyanus), Cooper's hawk (Accipiter cooperii), merlin, short-eared owl (Asio flammeus), Monterey ornate shrew (Sorex ornatus salarius), and Salinas harvest mouse (Reithrodontomys megalotis: Appendix C).
Wetland habitat found at the Refuge provide shelter, forage, and cover for a wide variety of herpetofauna, birds, crustaceans, insects, and mammals, including many special status species.
The Refuge's federally listed species include the western snowy plover and the California brown pelican.
Other special status species include: California brackish water snail (Tryonia imitator), Southwestern pond turtle (Clemmys marmorata pallida), steelhead, American white pelican, double-breasted cormorant (Phalacrocorax auritus), bufflehead (Bucephala albeola), osprey, white-tailed kite, northern harrier, sharp-shinned hawk (Accipiter striatus), Cooper's hawk, merlin, long-billed curlew, California gull, elegant tern, Caspian tern, Forster's tern (Sterna forsteri), short-eared owl, willow flycatcher (Empidonax traillii), California yellow
I-8
warbler (Dendroica petechia brewsteri), salt marsh wandering shrew (Sorex vagrans halicoetes), Monterey ornate shrew, and Salinas harvest mouse (Appendix C).
Some non-status herpetofauna include the western fence lizard, common garter snake (Thamnophis sirtalis), sharp-tailed snake (Contia tenuis), California slender salamander (Batrachoseps attenuatus), and western toad (Bufo boreas).
Some mammals include muskrat (Ondatra zibethica), red and gray fox, Virginia opossum (Didelphis virginiana), vagrant shrew (Sorex vagrans), and coyote (Refer to Salinas River CCP for a more complete list of species).
The many bird species present are listed below.
This unique diversity of habitats supports an enormous variety of wildlife, including many species of migratory birds.
The Refuge provides breeding, wintering, foraging, and roosting habitat for shorebirds, waterfowl, raptors, neotropical migrants, terns, gulls, and seabirds.
Shorebirds occur at the Refuge year round.
The ocean beach and exposed mud flats found along the pond, river and island edges, provide excellent feeding and roosting habitat.
Numbers peak during the spring and fall migration periods when thousands of shorebirds use the Refuge.
Large wintering populations consist of a variety of species including western snowy plover , western sandpipers (Calidris mauri), American avocets (Recurvirostra americana), black-necked stilts (Himantopus mexicanus), dunlin (C. alpina), other small sandpipers (Calidris sp.), sanderlings (C. alba), dowitchers (Limnodromus sp.), and phalaropes (Phalaropus sp.).
Three species of shorebirds are known to nest on the Refuge.
They include the Federally threatened western snowy plover, American avocet, and black-necked stilt.
All three species have been documented nesting on Refuge islands occurring in the Salinas River.
They also nest on saline flats that form as the saline pond evaporates throughout the summer.
In addition, snowy plover nests within the foredune habitat.
The Refuge has been one of the most productive snowy plover breeding areas in central coastal California (SFNWRC 1998) and traditionally has supported a significant proportion of the remaining breeding population in Monterey Bay.
Breeding plovers were once abundant on beaches in San Diego, Los Angeles, Orange, Ventura, and Santa Barbara Counties; however, loss of habitat and increased human disturbance have eliminated the birds from some or all of these areas.
This loss of breeding habitat (and plovers) in southern California has made remaining breeding areas, particularly the Monterey Bay area, crucial to maintaining a stable plover population.
Since the mid-1980's, increased human disturbance and predation by non-native red fox (Vulpes fulva) have greatly reduced the nesting success of plovers in the Monterey Bay area and at the Refuge (SFNWRC 1998).
Major threats to the snowy plover include human disturbance, loss of habitat, exotic vegetation encroachment, and increased predation (SFNWRC 1998).
Presently, exotic vegetation control and predator management (avian and mammalian) are being conducted at the Refuge and at other lands throughout the Monterey Bay area to alleviate some of the pressures affecting snowy plovers.
A variety of waterbirds use the Refuge for foraging, roosting, and bathing.
It provides one of the last freshwater roost sites in central California for as many as 1,400 endangered California brown pelicans.
This freshwater roost is especially significant as it may aid the pelicans in ridding their pouches of saltwater lice (SFNWRC 1998).
Also, the roost site allows the pelicans to successfully winter, building resources in preparation for the breeding season.
Loss of the Moss Landing roost site, due to prolonged disturbance from restoration activities, has likely increased the importance of this Refuge roost site.
One of the objectives of the California brown pelican Recovery Plan (USFWS 1983) is to ensure the long-term
I-9
protection of important roosting locations.
Historically, the Federally endangered California least tern (Sterna antillarum browni) and Caspian tern nested at the Refuge.
Caspian terns nested on the Refuge in 1996 after a failed attempt at Moss Landing Ecological and Estuarine Research Reserve.
This breeding attempt on the Refuge was unsuccessful.
Some of the eggs were abandoned while others were incubated to hatching.
Indications are that the hatched chicks had been predated by avian predators.
Prior to this attempt in 1996, the last nesting attempt by Caspian terns occurred in 1986 but that attempt also failed, probably due to human disturbance (SFNWRC 1998).
In 1992, five California least terns were seen on the Refuge and may have been nesting in the vicinity.
The Refuge also provides roosting and foraging habitat for elegant terns, Forster's terns (S. Forsteri), double-crested cormorants, ring-billed gulls (Larus delawarensis), California gulls (L. californicus), Bonaparte's gulls (L. philadelphia), western gulls (L. occidentalis), great blue herons (Ardea herodias), green-backed herons (Butorides striatus), blackcrowned night-herons (Nycticorax nycticorax), snowy egrets (Egretta thula), and great egrets (Casmerodius albus).
The Refuge provides important wintering and breeding habitat for waterfowl in the Monterey Bay area.
Wintering waterfowl populations vary from 500 to 3,000 on the Refuge depending on water availability.
Primary species include ruddy duck (Oxyura jamaicensis), mallard (Anas platyrhynchos), green-winged teal (A. crecca), American wigeon (A. americana), northern shoveler (A. clypeata), cinnamon teal (A. cyanoptera), gadwall (A. strepera), northern pintail (A. acuta), scaup (Aythya sp.), bufflehead, common goldeneye (B. clangula), scoters (Melanitta sp.), and canvasback (A. valisineria).
Wintering waterfowl use the Salinas River as well as the saline pond.
This 15-acre pond and associated salt marsh is unique as there is no other pond of this type in central coastal California.
It receives heavy use by dabbling ducks during spring migration, with as many as 500 ducks foraging and roosting there.
Mallards, cinnamon teal, and gadwall have been documented nesting at the Refuge in recent years.
These species nest throughout the Refuge in upland and wetland habitats.
In addition, American coots (Fulica americana) are seasonally abundant, with as many as 600 present during winter months.
Coots also nest at the Refuge in emergent wetland vegetation along the Salinas River.
Numerous species of raptors are supported by the Refuge.
Northern harriers (Circus cyaneus), American kestrels (Falco sparverius), white-tailed kites (Elanus leucurus), and short-eared owls (Asio flammeus) have been known to nest on the Refuge.
Peregrine falcons , barn owls (Tyto alba), red-tailed hawks (Buteo jamaicensis), golden eagles (Aquila chrysaetos), ospreys (Pandion haliaetus), and merlins have also been observed on the Refuge.
VEGETATION The biological environment of the Salinas River and surrounding areas (including the Refuge) has been altered drastically from pristine conditions.
Historical accounts describe the area as supporting shallow lakes, sloughs, vernal pools, marsh vegetation, expanses of grassland, and riparian corridors.
The Salinas River was a part of an enormous wetland ecosystem that included Elkhorn Slough and the Pajaro River.
This wetland ecosystem was highly productive as wildlife habitat, especially as wintering habitat for a magnificent number and diversity of waterbird.
This area also supported California grizzly bear (Ursus californicus) and tule elk (Cervus elaphus nannodes).
Since the time of early European settlement in California, extensive areas have been converted for agricultural purposes.
By the early 1900's, much of the land within the lower Salinas Valley had been converted to agricultural production.
For example, a series of large finger lakes and associated wetlands had been drained, vernal pools were converted, riparian habitat was removed, and the Salinas and Pajaro rivers were channelized and associated wetlands drained.
The mouth of the Salinas River was redirected
I-10
to its present location.
The highly productive Salinas Valley wetland ecosystem that included the Salinas River, Elkhorn Slough and the Pajaro River had been fragmented and greatly reduced in size.
As a result of agricultural conversion, the area's wildlife has been severely impacted (SFNWRC1998).
The extensive conversion of wetlands resulted in a significant reduction of birds (particularly waterbirds and neotropical migrants), the elimination of tule elk from the region and the probable loss of many vernal pool species.
Over 90 percent of the Salinas Valley wetlands have been lost to agricultural conversion (SFNWRC 1998).
A portion of the Refuge once contained an artichoke field.
It has now returned to shrub and grassland habitat, through restoration efforts.
As such, the Refuge provides important habitat as it is one of just a few places where remnant wetland and riparian habitats remain from the original Salinas Valley wetland ecosystem.
This area was spared from being totally converted for agricultural purposes due to its close proximity to the ocean, susceptibility to flooding, and its former military ownership.
There is also a fragile sand dune system on the Refuge that supports a number of sensitive plant species.
These dunes include foredunes and coastal scrub dunes.
The foredunes are just above the high tide line and have stabilized to some degree, while the dune scrub just beyond the foredunes are more established.
Plant species diversity in the foredunes is low.
Species commonly found in the foredunes include yellow and pink sand verbena (Abronia latifolia and A. umbellata), silky beach pea (Lathyrus litoralis), beach primrose (Casmissonia cheiranthifolia), sea rocket (Cakile maritima), beach morning glory (Calystegia sordanella), and beach bur (Franseria chamissonis ssp. bipinnatisecta and F. c. ssp. chamissonis) (Appendix C).
Dune scrub occurs in the more stabilized areas.
The most common species include beach bur, mock heather (Ericameria ericoides ssp. ericoides), branching phacelia (Phacelia ramisissima), blue beach lupine (Lupinus chamisonis), coast buckwheat (Eriogonum latifolium), and dune buckwheat (Eriogonum parvifolium).
While neither species of buckwheat is rare or endangered they are hosts to the endangered Smith's blue butterfly.
This habitat also supports federally listed plants, Monterey gilia (endangered) and Monterey spineflower (threatened), as well as, sensitive species like the coast wallflower (Erysimum ammophilum), Monterey paintbrush, (Castlleja latifolia var. latifolia), and branching beach aster (Corethrogne leucophlla: Appendix C).
Central coast riparian scrub occurs along the Salinas River and on islands within the River.
Dominant plant species include willows such as arroyo willow (Salix lasiolepis), red willow (S. laevigata), sandbar willow (S. hindsiana), and yellow willow (S. lasiandra).
Understory is typically dense and consists of young trees and shrubs, such as coyote brush (Baccharis pilularis), poison oak (Toxicodendron diversilobum), Himalayan blackberry (Rubus ursinus), and California rose (Rosa californica).
The Watershed Institute of California State University have been conducting intensive restoration activities in this habitat to reestablish native riparian scrub vegetation and to slow bank erosion.
Species planted include willows, box elder (Acer negundo), creekside dogwood (Cornus serica ssp. occidentalis), red alder (Alnus rubra), and black cottonwood (Populus trichocarpa).
Coyote brush scrub represents a successional community that has developed following the abandonment of agriculture fields that were in operation prior to Service occuaption.
The dominant species is coyote brush (Baccharis pilularis), which forms dense stands in some places.
Grassland, with native and nonnative species, is interspersed throughout this habitat.
The Watershed Institute has recently restored a large portion of the grassland to native grasses.
In 1996, they drill-seeded 80 lbs. of a native grass mix composed of wild rye (Elymus glaucus), California barley (Hordeum brachyantherum), annual hair grass
I-11
(Deschamsia caespitosa), and California brome (Bromus carinatus).
These native grasses have been maintained by intensive weed pulling, weed wacking, and mowing.
STRUCTURES AND FACILITIES The only structure on the Refuge is a World War II era concrete bunker near the parking lot.
Because the structure is made entirely of concrete, it is of little concern in a fire situation.
No buildings exist offsite in the vicinity of the Refuge.
A wooden fence is located on the eastern boundary along the artichoke field.
A disced line is maintained on the Refuge adjacent to the fence.
Most of the Refuge is closed to the public due to the sensitivity of the habitat.
However, there are two trails, the River Trail and the Ocean Beach Trail, open to the public (Figure 1).
These trails enable visitors to see a variety of habitats and the wildlife that inhabit them.
The River Trail begins at the parking lot, runs north through upland habitat and leads to the south bank of the Salinas River.
It continues northwest along the south bank of the River for approximately 1/4 mile where it loops back to the southwest through upland habitat to the Beach Trail.
This trail is open for walking, hiking, wildlife observation, and wildlife photography.
It is also used by hunters to gain access to the hunt area.
The Ocean Beach Trail begins in the parking lot, winds through upland habitat, skirts the saline pond, and cuts through the coastal dunes to end at the ocean beach.
This trail is open for hiking, wildlife observation, wildlife photography, and access to the ocean and ocean beach.
The upper beach habitat, except on the designated trail, is closed along the foredune boundary to protect the western snowy plover.
In addition, the saline pond, salt marsh, and coastal dunes are closed to visitor use due to the extreme sensitivity of these habitats.
Since parts of the Refuge are open to the public, public use may be impacted for a short duration during fire activities.
During prescribed fire activities, certain parts of the Refuge (i.e., trails and area to be burned) would be closed to the public to ensure their safety.
Wildland fire suppression and the use of prescribed fire could affect neighboring landowners by altering adjacent habitats and/or potentially escaping onto their properties.
However, the escape risk is minimal due to the nature of the adjoining properties.
Dune areas along the northern and southern boundaries are sparsely vegetated and would not carry fire under most circumstances.
Prescribed fires will be conducted in the grassland habitats of the Refuge.
This area is separated from the eastern property by a 15' disced line.
In addition, the artichoke plants on the adjacent property are succulent and would not burn.
Within the Refuge itself, the judicious, conservative use of prescribed fire will greatly increase the efficiency and effectiveness of grassland/upland management.
I-12
WILDLAND FIRE MANAGEMENT SITUATION HISTORIC ROLE OF FIRE Pre-settlement Fires Historical information on natural or anthropogenic fire is not readily available.
Fire history does not generally apply directly to wetlands or riparian areas due to the nature of the wetlands.
Post-settlement Fire History There is no record of wildland fires to date.
When contacted, the MCFD said they had not responded to a call at the Refuge in the past 10 years (I. Larkin, pers. comm.).
The period of high fire danger is from June 1 through October 31, determined by CDF Monterey-San Benito County Unit.
Damage from any small fires that might occur include the potential effects on resident or nesting wildlife depending on the time of year.
Generally, damaged areas return to their original condition after one or two years.
Prescribed Fire History The prescribed fire season at the Refuge is from May to June (I. Loredo, pers. comm).
Fires during this period allow non-native weeds to sprout but prevent them from going to seed.
Two small prescribed fires were conducted in the Refuge when the property was managed by CA Department of Fish and Game (B. Elliott, pers. comm.).
To date, prescribed fire management has not been used on the Refuge by USFWS personnel.
RESPONSIBILITIES Salinas River NWR does not have on-site fire management staff or any on-site fire suppression equipment.
There is a Service fire crew stationed part-time (late spring to early fall) at San Luis NWRC and a limited number of fire qualified personnel stationed at San Francisco Bay NWRC.
Both of these sites are approximately 100 miles from the Refuge.
Because the unit is an un-staffed satellite Refuge, Refuge personnel presence is limited to periodic surveys.
Wildland fires in this area are generally reported by the public and suppressed by firefighters from the Monterey Bay Fire Department before Service staff can respond.
Responsibilities for fire management at Salinas River are shared by: the Salinas River Refuge Manager, Refuge Biologist, SFBNWR Complex Project Leader, and the SLNWR Complex Fire Management Officer (Appendix D).
Primary wildland fire management responsibilities are to: C provide overall management of the Refuge including the fire program, C ensure collateral duty fire personnel are meeting Service standards, C conduct prescribed fire activities in support of Refuge habitat management programs, · establish and maintain appropriate fire-related agreements/contracts, · monitor results of wildland and prescribed fires, · update fire management and associated plans (dispatch, training, etc.), call-out lists, and mobilization guidelines, and · maintain the Refuge fire cache and fire equipment in a ready state.
Agency Administrator/ Project Leader (PL) C Is the primary line officer responsible for implementation of all Fire Management activities within the Complex and will ensure compliance with Department, Service and Refuge policies.
I-13
C
Selects the appropriate management responses to wildland fire.
Deputy Project Leader (DPL) C Coordinates Complex programs to ensure personnel and equipment are made available and used for fire management activities including fire suppression, prescribed burning and fire effects monitoring.
C Ensures that the fire management program has access to Refuge and Complex resources when needed.
C Ensures that Refuge Managers and Complex Staff consider the fire management program during Refuge related planning and implementation.
Refuge Manager (RM) C Identifies prescribed burn units and biological objectives to Fire Management Officer (FMO) and Prescribed Fire Specialist (PFS), notifies FMO of prescribed fire project constraints, and ensures that Refuge resources are available to accomplish prescribed fire and fire suppression objectives.
C Acts as the primary Refuge Resource Management Specialist during fire management planning and operations.
C Prepares an annual report detailing fire occurrences and prescribed fire activities undertaken in each calendar year.
This report will serve as a post-year's fire management activities review, as well as provide documentation for development of a comprehensive fire history record for the Refuge.
C Is responsible for planning, coordinating, and directing preparedness activities including fire training, physical fitness testing and Interagency Fire Qualification System (IFQS) data entry, fire cache and equipment inventory accountability, maintenance, and operation, cooperation with cooperative agencies.
Biologist C C C C
Coordinates through Refuge Managers and Deputy Project Leader to provide biological input for the fire program with the FMO and PFS.
Ensures fire effects monitoring is being implemented and drafts wildland fire Rehabilitation Plans for Deputy Project Leader.
Assists in design and implementation of fire effects monitoring, with FMO and PFS.
Participates, as requested, in prescribed burning and wildland fire suppression.
Zone Fire Management Officer (FMO) C Responsible for all fire related planning and implementation for the Refuge.
C Integrates biological Refuge objectives into all fire management planning and implementation.
C Solicits program input from the RM and Biologist.
C Supervises prescribed fire planning.
C Coordinates fire related training.
C Coordinates with cooperators to ensure adequate resources are available for fire operational needs.
C Decides when to request overhead or additional firefighting personnel and equipment.
I-14
C
C C C C C C
Is responsible for implementation of this Plan.
This responsibility includes coordination and supervision of all prevention, pre-suppression, detection, wildland fire, prescribed fire, suppression, monitoring, and post-fire activities involving Refuge lands.
Is responsible for preparation of fire reports following the suppression of wildfires and for operations undertaken while conducting prescribed fires.
Submits budget requests and monitors FIREBASE funds.
Maintains records for all personnel involved in suppression and prescribed fire activities, detailing the individual's qualifications and certifications for such activities.
Updates all fire qualifications for entry into the Fire Management Information System.
Nominates personnel to receive fire-related training, as appropriate.
Designates the person to serve as Incident Commander (IC) for initial attack purposes.
The FMO may assume the position of IC at his/her discretion or designate other personnel to take over that position at his/her discretion.
Prescribed Fire Specialist (PFS) C Responsible for the planning and implementation of a program, which collects information for the documentation, analysis, and prediction of fire behavior and effects.
C Develops and recommends, plans, and schedules management ignited fire activities for the Refuge.
C Implements and directs burns.
C Plans and develops a program to collect information on the effects and behavior of prescribed fire.
C Plans and directs studies to monitor and analyze fire behavior parameters, then uses these data to support the development of fire plans.
C Plans and directs surveys for the collection, analysis and documentation of data relating to fire effects on biotic and abiotic resources.
C Organizes and performs studies to develop fire management prescriptions for prescribed burns.
C Is responsible for ensuring a cadre of qualified prescribed fire overhead by recommending personnel for training, through both formal in-house and field training assignments.
C Is responsible for record keeping associated with burn planning, fire occurrence reporting and fire weather.
C Identifies areas of fire management requiring research and works with research scientists in the development of project statements to accomplish this research.
Fire Management/Suppression Personnel C Consist of all Refuge personnel, whether permanent or seasonal, who meet the minimum standard set by the National Wildfire Coordinating Group (NWCG) for firefighters.
C Are fully equipped with proper personal protective equipment, have taken and passed the minimum classroom training, and meet physical fitness standards required.
C Undertake fire management duties as assigned by the Prescribed Fire Burn Boss on each prescribed fire project.
C Are responsible for their personal protective equipment and physical conditioning, qualifying annually with the work capacity test before May 31.
I-15
Incident Commander Incident Commanders (of any level) use strategies and tactics as directed by the Refuge Manager and WFSA where applicable to implement selected objectives on a particular incident.
A specific Limited Delegation of Authority (Appendix E) will be provided to each Incident Commander prior to assuming responsibility for an incident.
Major duties of the Incident Commander are given in NWCG Fireline Handbook, including: C Brief subordinates, direct their actions and provide work tools.
C Ensure that safety standards identified in the Fire Orders, the Watch Out Situations, and agency policies are followed at all times.
C Personally scout and communicate with others to be knowledgeable of fire conditions, fire weather, tactical progress, safety concerns and hazards, condition of personnel, and needs for additional resources.
C Order resources to implement the management objectives for the fire.
C Inform appropriate dispatch of current situation and expected needs.
C Coordinate mobilization and demobilization with dispatch and the Collateral FMO.
C Perform administrative duties; i.e., approving work hours, completing fire reports for command period, maintaining property accountability, providing or obtaining medical treatment, and evaluating performance of subordinates.
C Assure aviation safety is maintained to the highest standards.
Initial Attack Teams Initial attack teams will consist of fully-qualified firefighters and leaders.
Teams will be prepared and equipped with hand and power tools as needed and will be dispatched with a day's supply of food and water, so they can continue work for 24 hours without additional support.
Employees participating in any wildland fire activities on Fish and Wildlife Service or cooperator=s lands will meet fitness requirements established in PMS 310-1, except where Service-specific fitness requirements apply.
Exceptions to fitness requirements on Initial attack activity are available from the Regional Fire Management Coordinator per guidelines in Chapter 1.5 of the Fire Management Handbook (USFWS 2000a).
INTERAGENCY OPERATIONS There are no formal cooperative fire agreements in place at this time, however a Memorandum of Understanding is currently being established between the Refuge and the Monterey County Fire Department (MCFD).
The MCFD has traditionally responded to wildland fires at the Refuge because of their legal fire protection responsibility to the property surrounding the Refuge.
Thus, any wildland fire originating on Refuge lands is considered a threat to their property.
Salinas River NWR will use the Incident Command System (ICS) as a guide for fireline organization.
Qualifications for individuals is per DOI Wildland Fire Qualifications and Certification System, part of NIIMS and the National Wildland Fire Coordination Group (NWCG) Prescribed Fire Qualification Guide.
Depending on fire complexity, some positions may be filled by the same person.
The County of Monterey Fire Department has the responsibility for preventing, controlling, and extinguishing fire throughout unincorporated portions of the County.
The County responds to fires near
I-16
the Refuge border because of their protection responsibilities for County property.
Any fire starting on Refuge lands would be suppressed by County resources because of their interest in preventing fires from spreading onto their Local Responsibility Area.
While no formal agreement is currently in place, the County has expressed a willingness to respond to emergency suppression activities (Appendix F).
Monterey Bay Unified Air Pollution Control District (MBUAPCD) is responsible for all non-point and point source air degradation within their designated area of responsibility.
Burn permits and smoke management concerns from prescribed burning on the Refuge must be coordinated through them.
Like all air polluction control districts, MBUAPCD has regulatory authority and enforces all District, state and federal laws relating to the emissions of air pollutants (Appendix F).
A listing of key interagency contacts can be found in the Fire Dispatch Plan.
The plan is an annual assembly of information required to facilitate a rapid response to a fire report and to coordinate the initial attack.
(Appendix D).
There are no formal fire related agreements in place at this time.
All agreements at this time are informal.
PROTECTION OF SENSITIVE RESOURCES Aggressive attack of all unplanned ignitions with minimum acreage burned is the suppression goal.
Heavy equipment shall not be used due to the sensitivity of the habitat, except in cases where life or firefighter safety is threatened or when the Refuge Manager determines necessary.
Dozer lines should only be constructed, when necessary, in Coyote Scrub/Grassland Habitat, preferably along highlighted established trail lines, but also allowed within the shaded area on map (Figure 2).
The Regional Archaeologist and/or his/her staff will work with fire staff, project leaders, and incident commanders to ensure that cultural resources are protected from fire and fire management activities.
The "Request For Cultural Resource Compliance" form (Appendix G) will be used to inform the Regional Archaeologist of impending activities, thereby meeting the regulations and directions governing the protection of cultural resources as outlined in Departmental Manual Part 519, National Historic Preservation Act (NHPA) of 1966, Code of Federal Regulations (36CFR800), the Archaeological Resources Protection Act of 1979, as amended, and the Archaeological and Historic Preservation Act of 1974.
The NHPA Section 106 clearance will be followed for any fire management activity that may affect historic properties (cultural resources eligible to the National Register of Historic Places).
Impacts to archaeological resources by fire and suppression resources vary.
The four basic sources of damage are (1) fire intensity, (2) duration of heat, (3) heat penetration into soil, and (4) suppression actions.
Of the four, the most significant threat is from equipment during line construction for prescribed fires or wildfire holding actions.
I-17
Figure 2: Heavy equipment use areas
I-18
The following actions will be taken to protect archaeological and cultural resources: Wildland Fires C Minimum impact fire suppression tactics will be used to the fullest extent possible.
C Resource Advisors will inform Fire Suppression personnel of any areas with cultural resources.
C The Resource Advisor should contact the Regional Archaeologist and /or his/her staff for more detailed information.
C Foam use will be minimized in areas known to harbor surface artifacts.
C Mechanized equipment should not be used in areas of known cultural significance.
C The location of any sites discovered as the result of fire management activities will be reported to the Regional Archaeologist using the RCRC.
Prescribed Fires C The Refuge Fire staff will submit a completed RCRC to the Regional Archaeologist and/or his/her staff as soon as the burn area is identified (i.e., as soon as feasible).
C Upon receipt of the RCRC, the Regional Archaeologist and/or his/her staff will be responsible for consulting with the FMO and evaluating the potential for adverse impacts to cultural resources.
C When necessary, the Regional Archaeologist and/or his/her staff will coordinate with the State Historic Preservation Officer (SHPO).
The SHPO has 30 days to respond.
The Refuge will consider all SHPO recommendations.
C Mechanized equipment should not be used in areas of known cultural significance.
C The location of any sites discovered as the result of fire management activities will be reported to the Regional Archaeologist
.
I-19
WILDLAND FIRE ACTIVITIES Fire program management describes the operational procedures necessary to implement fire management at Salinas River NWR.
Program management includes: fire prevention, preparedness, emergency preparedness, fire detection, communication, step-up staffing plan, pre-attack plan, fire behavior predictions, fire suppression, minimum impact suppression, minimum impact rehabilitation, documentation, and fire investigation.
All fires not classified as prescribed fires are wildland fires and will be appropriately suppressed.
Suppression operations will generally be conducted by the Monterey County Fire Department (MCFD).
Records show that fire season is typically from June 1 to October 31.
Depending on the specific weather of any particular year, the seasons may be shorter or longer and, therefore, may start earlier or last longer.
FIRE MANAGEMENT STRATEGIES All unplanned wildland fires will be suppressed in a prompt, safe, aggressive, and cost-effective manner to produce fast, efficient action with minimum damage to resources using appropriate management strategies.
Wildland fires will not be used as a resource management tool.
The following strategies will be employed to meet fire management objectives: · Suppress all unplanned ignitions in a safe and cost-effective manner consistent with resources and values at risk.
Minimum impact strategies and tactics will be used when possible, particularly in areas with high densities of endangered species.
However, use of heavy equipment remains an option for control of high intensity fires and fires threatening critical values such as endangered species and private lands.
C Maintain formal and informal cooperative relationships with local fire agencies to provide immediate response to wildfires.
C Conduct all fire-management programs in a manner consistent with applicable laws, policies and regulations.
C Initiate cost-effective fire monitoring which will ascertain if objectives are being met.
Monitoring information will also be used to refine burn prescriptions to better achieve objectives.
C Use prescribed fire as a management tool for achieving hazard fuel reductions and resource management objectives.
To the extent possible, hazard fuel prescribed fire will be used to accomplish specific objectives established for individual land units.
Prescribed fires are fires which are deliberately set to burn under prescribed conditions in order to achieve pre-determined resource management objectives.
C Integrate fire ecology and management themes into future information programs.
Although resource impacts of suppression alternatives must always be considered in selecting a fire management strategy, resource benefits will not be the primary consideration.
Appropriate suppression action will be taken to ensure firefighter safety, public safety, and protection of the resources.
Critical protection areas, such as dune and marsh habitat, will receive priority consideration in fire control planning efforts.
In all cases, the primary concern of fire suppression personnel shall be safety, and if needed, all individuals not involved in the suppression effort may be evacuated.
I-20
Suppression strategies should be applied so that the equipment and tools used to meet the desired objectives are those that inflict the least impacts upon the natural and cultural resources.
Minimum impact suppression strategies will be employed to protect all resources.
Natural and artificial barriers will be used as much as possible for containment.
When necessary, fire line construction will be conducted in such a way as to minimize long-term impacts to resources.
Vehicle access to normally closed areas of the Refuge, except dune and beach habitat, will be made using existing roads when possible.
When off-road travel is determined to be necessary, vehicle access will be allowed in designated areas of the Refuge with approval of the Project Leader or Delegate (Figure 2).
Heavy equipment such as crawlers, tractors, dozers, or graders will not be used within the Refuge boundaries unless their use is necessary to prevent a fire from destroying privately-owned and/or government buildings and historic resources.
Heavy equipment will only be used in designated areas (Figure 2).
The use of any heavy equipment requires approval from the Refuge Manager or Delegate.
Sites impacted by fire suppression activities or by the fire will be rehabilitated as necessary, based on an approved course of action for each incident.
PREPAREDNESS Preparedness is the work accomp directed by the Fire Management planning, equipment acquisition, expanded), equipment inventory, have a well trained and equipped Refuge.
Preparedness efforts are dates.
lished prior to fire occurrence to ensure that the appropriate response, as Plan, can be carried out.
Preparedness activities include: budget equipment maintenance, dispatch (i.e. initial attack, extended, and personnel qualifications, and training.
The preparedness objective is to fire management organization to manage all fire situations within the to be accomplished in the time frames outside the normal fire season
The Fish and Wildlife Service has minimum training requirements for all fire positions.
The Service is a member to the National Wildfire Coordinating Group (NWCG) and accepts its standards for interagency operations.
There is a required refresher training for all personnel that are involved with wildland fire activities.
These requirements are found in the USFWS Fire Management Preparedness and Planning Handbook, Section 1.5; Training, Qualification, and Certification (USFWS 2000b).
The traditional approach to a step-up plan does not work in this situation.
Due to the availability of a large number of local fire department resources, it would be a rare situation if Service fire crews were deployed to the Refuge during a step-up situation.
Historical weather analysis The fire season generally begins with the curing of annual grasses in early June and extends until the first rains in late-October.
In general, fire does not apply directly to wetlands or riparian habitats due to the hydrology.
Salinas River NWR does not operate a weather station and does not monitor the weather at the Refuge.
Monterey County Fire Department does not have any weather data that reflects the conditions at the Refuge.
The closest weather information can be obtained from a hotline provided by the Monterey Peninsula Airport but mentions no specifics for the weather conditions at the Refuge.
I-21
Fire Prevention An active fire prevention program may be conducted in conjunction with other agencies to protect human life and property, and prevent damage to cultural resources or physical facilities.
Firelines are disked by adjacent farm personnel along the eastern one-third of the southern boundary of the Refuge.
The Salinas River forms the northeast boundary of the Refuge, and the Pacific Ocean forms the western boundary.
The southern boundary abuts agricultural fields of artichokes and other gardentype produce.
A program of internal and external education regarding potential fire danger may be implemented.
Visitor contacts, bulletin board materials, and interpretive programs may be used to increase visitor and neighbor awareness of fire hazards.
Employees need to relate to the public the beneficial effects of prescribed fires as opposed to unwanted human-caused fires, with emphasis on information, essential to understanding the potential severity of human-caused wildland fires and how to prevent them.
During periods of extreme or prolonged fire danger (Red Flag Warnings), emergency restrictions regarding Refuge operations may become necessary.
No heavy machinery, ATV's, lawnmowers, etc. will be permitted in the coyote brush scrub/grassland at these times.
Such restrictions, when imposed, will usually be consistent with those implemented by cooperators.
The Refuge Manager or FMO will recommend when such restrictions are necessary.
Staffing Priority Levels There are no fire-funded staff stationed at the Refuge.
Fire suppression response is provided by MCFD, therefore MCFD will adjust staffing levels based on current fire danger.
Because the Refuge headquarters is located 100 miles from the Refuge, MCFD will be first responders.
The Refuge has no facilities located within the boundaries and will not require any closures (except to machinery previously mentioned) during Red Flag Warnings.
Training Departmental policy requires that all personnel engaged in suppression and prescribed fire duties meet the standards set by the National Wildfire Coordinating Group (NWCG).
Salinas River NWR will conform strictly to the requirements of the wildland fire management qualification and certification system and USFWS guidelines.
Basic wildland fire training refreshers are offered annually for red-carded firefighters and records kept in a centralized database.
Additional training is available from surrounding agencies in pump and engine operation, power saws, firefighter safety, fire weather and fire behavior, helicopter safety and prescribed fire objectives and activities.
On-the job training is encouraged and will be conducted at the field level.
Whenever appropriate, the use of fire qualification task books
